
https://www.psychologytoday.com/us/blog/shadow-boxing/201605/be-or-not-be-philosophical-serial-killers
	In Crime and Punishment, the character of Raskolnikov seeks to prove that he is “superior” to laws that govern others. He believes he can kill someone without consequences. This inspired Brady, who believed that he, too, was morally superior.

	After meeting Hindley, Brady convinced her that morality was relative. He proposed that they enrich themselves with crime. One day, Brady suggested that they kill a child. She complied. Then she complied again, and again.

	After their arrest and convictions, Brady wrote The Gates of Janus, a book in which he describes crime as an exciting venture for the solitary explorer, "consciously thirsting to experience that which the majority have not and dare not." As for murder, "viewed scientifically, the death of a human being is of no more significance than that of any other animal on earth."

	Serial killers, he thought, had chosen to “live a day as a lion, rather than decades as a sheep.” They are "unavoidably a failure in many normal walks of life." Such people lack patience and eschew boredom. Once they have committed homicide, they accept the act as “normal,” and the rest of humanity becomes "subnormal."


https://people.howstuffworks.com/serial-killer.htm
	How Serial Killers Work

	The Zodiac Killer. John Wayne Gacy. The BTK Killer. Ted Bundy. Son of Sam. Jeffrey Dahmer­. The names and pseudonyms of these killers are burned into the collective consciousness of Americans, thanks to massive coverage in newspapers, books, films and TV specials. Many of those who have been captured appeared average -- attractive, successful, active members of the community -- until their crimes were discovered.

	This kind of killer doesn't just "go crazy" one day and kill a lot of people. He doesn't kill out of greed or jealousy. So what makes a person not only murder, but murder multiple people over periods of days, weeks and years? There's a special name for these types of murderers: serial killers. In this article, we'll learn about what makes them tick.

	...According to a recent FBI study, there have been approximately 400 serial killers in the United States in the past century, with anywhere from 2,526 to 3,860 victims [source: Hickey]. However, there's no way to really know how many serial killers are active at any point in time -- experts have suggested numbers ranging from 50 to 300, but there's no evidence to support them.

	Serial murders also appear to have increased over the past 30 years. Eighty percent of the 400 serial killers of the past century have emerged since 1950 [source: Vronsky]. Why this is happening is a question of some debate; there is no answer, just as there is no simple answer as to why some people become serial killers.

	...Process-focused serial killers get enjoyment from torture and the slow death of their victims. These include three different types of hedonists -- lust, thrill and gain -- and power-seeking killers. Lust killers derive sexual pleasure from killing. Thrill killers get a "kick" from it. Gain killers murder because they believe they will profit in some way. Power killers wish to "play God" or be in charge of life and death.

	...America's First Serial Killer

	H.H. Holmes, who was convicted of nine murders, is often considered to be the first serial killer in the United States. Holmes confessed to 27 murders, and some investigators thought he may have actually murdered hundreds. He began by killing guests at the massive "castle" hotel that he opened to host visitors to the 1893 World's Fair in Chicago. Holmes' crimes were discovered in an inspection after a custodian told police that he was not allowed to clean certain floors of the hotel. He was convicted and hanged in 1896. Interest in the Holmes case was revived in 2003 with the publication of "The Devil in the White City," a book juxtaposing the murders with the construction of the World's Fair.

	...The majority of identified serial killers are organized and nonsocial. Most of them also follow some other basic patterns. More than 80 percent of serial killers are male, Caucasian and in their 20s or 30s [source: Hickey]. Serial killers are generally intelligent, and they usually kill Caucasian women. There's no way to "tell" a serial killer simply by his appearance -- most of them look like everyone else. Ted Bundy, who was convicted of 30 murders, was often described as attractive, charismatic and articulate. John Wayne Gacy was a popular figure in his community and often performed as a clown at block parties. He met with first lady Rosalynn Carter when he was precinct captain of his local Democratic Party. He was also convicted of the murders of 33 boys and men.

	...One of the most studied aspects of serial murder is “why?” A number of theories have been set forth as potential explanations. But “unraveling the making of a serial killer is like aligning a Rubik's cube” [source: Vronsky]. In other words, there is no one answer. Let's take a look at three possible theories: childhood neglect and abuse, mental illness and brain injury.

	...Serial killers were often physically or sexually abused as children or witnessed the abuse of family members. This pattern of neglect and abuse, some researchers say, leads serial killers to grow up without a sense of anyone other than themselves. But at the same time, many children grow up neglected and abused, but do not become violent criminals or serial killers.



https://listverse.com/2015/07/23/10-chilling-glimpses-into-the-minds-and-lives-of-serial-killers/


where does "abuse excuse" come from, and why did it get popular? Leopold and Loeb case an early example of "blame the parents"

should look into James Fallon and Graeme Fairchild


https://people.howstuffworks.com/serial-killer.htm
	...For some people, the only way to explain serial murder is to say that serial killers are "insan­e." Some serial killers do plead "not guilty by reason of insanity" as a defense, but are all of them "insane" or even mentally ill? According to the U.S. Code, an insanity defense means that "at the time of the commission of the acts constituting the offense, the defendant, as a result of a severe mental disease or defect, was unable to appreciate the nature and quality or the wrongfulness of his acts. Mental disease or defect does not otherwise constitute a defense" [Source: U.S. Code].

	Basically, a serial killer arguing "not guilty by reason of insanity" must prove that he did not understand right from wrong at the time that he killed. But it can be difficult to prove that he really did not understand that his actions would result in the death of the victims. Only two serial killers have successfully pled insanity.

	...Some serial killers have been diagnosed by psychologists and psychiatrists as psychopaths. The official term in the Diagnostic and Standard Manual of Mental Disorders, fourth edition (DSM-IV) is antisocial personality disorder (APD). According to the DSM-IV, a person with APD follows a pattern of "disregard and violation of the rights of others occuring since age 15 years." This pattern includes seven factors (three of which must be met for diagnosis), such as "failure to conform to social norms," "irritability and aggressiveness" and "lack of remorse" [source: Vronsky]. Psychopaths are not insane -- they do know right from wrong. But this diagnosis may explain their behavior during their killing cycles.

	...Some researchers theorize that serial killers have brain damage or other biological abnormalities that contribute to their actions. Damage to areas like the frontal lobe, the hypothalamus and the limbic system can contribute to extreme aggression, loss of control, loss of judgment and violence. Henry Lee Lucas, who was convicted of 11 murders, was shown to have extreme brain damage in these areas, probably the result of childhood abuse, malnutrition and alcoholism. Arthur Shawcross, another 11-time serial killer, was found to have had several brain injuries, including two skull fractures. While in prison, he suffered from headaches and often blacked out. Bobby Joe Long, convicted of nine murders, stated at one point, "After I'm dead, they're going to open up my head and find that just like we've been saying a part of my brain is black and dry and dead" [source: Scott].

	...Focus on Some Infamous Serial Killers

    Gary Ridgway, the “Green River Killer,” confessed to killing four women, all of whom were prostitutes. Ridgway was a missionary killer. In his plea statement, he said, “I hate most prostitutes” [source: CNN.com].
    Many of the most publicized cases are lust killers, including Jeffrey Dahmer, Ted Bundy and John Wayne Gacy. All three killers found sexual gratification in the torture and murder of their victims.
    David Berkowitz, the “Son of Sam,” was a thrill killer who enjoyed the excitement of the kill. He did not touch any of his 15 victims (six of whom died -- nine were injured), but followed and shot at them from a distance.

    ...According to FBI profiler John Douglas, a signature "is a ritual, something the subject does intentionally for emotional satisfaction -- something that isn't necessary to perpetuate the crime” [source: JohnDouglas.com]. Some serial killers pose their victims in a certain way or leave them in a certain place after killing them. Another signature might be a method of torture or mutilation. It's what the killer does to fulfill his fantasies, and it can tell investigators a lot about his personality.

	Investigators also look at the MO, or modus operandi, of the crime. The MO reflects what the killer had to do to commit the crime. This includes everything from luring and restraining his victim to the way that he actually murders her. A serial killer's MO can change over time. Essentially, he learns from past mistakes and improves with time.


------


media coverage of leopold and loeb


https://www.biography.com/people/richard-loeb-227821
	Upon returning to the University of Chicago for graduate work, Loeb reunited and developed a deeper connection with Leopold. The two were an excellent match psychologically: The brilliant but socially inept Leopold was enthralled by the handsome and vivacious Loeb, who in turn found an excellent alter ego for his fantasy world. Their relationship became sexually intimate. Loeb continued to embroil Leopold in a number of different criminal pursuits, becoming increasingly obsessed with the development and commission of the "perfect crime" that would make headlines.


was it Loeb who dragged Leopold into this or the other way around?

Leopold said publicly he thought of himself submissive to Loeb, but privately he threatened to kill him and blackmailed him while trying to teach him about Neitszche

what actually happened?


	...The two young men were interrogated by police and eventually confessed to the murder, although Loeb claimed that Leopold had struck the fatal blow on Franks, while Leopold insisted the opposite was true. 


each blamed the other for the act itself, but a lot of articles blame Leob. Why? 


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Leopold_and_Loeb#Murder_of_Bobby_Franks
	The precise sequence of the events that followed remains in dispute, but a preponderance of opinion placed Leopold behind the wheel of the car, while Loeb sat in the back seat with the chisel. Loeb struck Franks, sitting in front of him in the passenger seat, several times in the head with the chisel, then dragged him into the back seat, where he was gagged and soon died.


http://chicagocrimescenes.blogspot.com/2009/09/nathan-leopolds-home.html
	Years of speculation by researchers about whether Leopold or Loeb originally hatched the murder plan have never turned definitive, but Leopold’s cruelty and lack of conscience, and Loeb’s fascination with crime and detective stories mean it easily could have been either.


...


https://loebandleopold.wordpress.com/teenage-years/

interesting but no sources


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Albert_Henry_Loeb
	Albert Henry Loeb (February 18, 1868 – October 27, 1924) was a Chicago attorney and an executive of Sears, Roebuck and Co. Loeb was also the father of convicted murderer Richard Albert Loeb of the infamous Leopold and Loeb.

	...Loeb and Julius Rosenwald, the Chairman of Sears, maintained a close relationship throughout their professional lives. It has been said that Rosenwald never made an important decision without asking Loeb's advice.[5]





https://webcache.googleusercontent.com/search?q=cache:YJNI6lHLEeMJ:https://www.stitcher.com/s/player.php%3Feid%3D53251293+&cd=16&hl=en&ct=clnk&gl=us&client=firefox-b-1-ab
	Nathan F. Leopold Jr. was born on November 19th, 1904 in Chicago, Illinois to Nathan and Florence Leopold. The elder Nathan was the son of Samuel and Babette, Jewish immigrants from Germany who had brought their family to Michigan. He worked in shipping and had made a fortune. Their son Nathan had moved to Chicago and married Florence Foreman in 1892. Nathan Leopold Sr. was already wealthy but had a gift for making more. He started up many successful enterprises in Illinois, such as Leopold & Austrian, a lending firm, the Manitou Shipping Company, a copper mining company, as well as the Fiber Can Corporation, a paper mill in Morris, Illinois. Leopold Sr. was an active member of the community. He was president of the Young Men’s Hebrew Association in Chicago, one of the Chicago’s first bankers, and when he married Florence, he married into one of the most prestigious families in Illinois


https://www.findagrave.com/memorial/83123051/nathan-freudenthal-leopold
	Nathan F. Leopold, Sr., wealthy financier died last night at the Michael Reese Hospital. He was operated on ten days ago by Dr. Solomon Strauss and his condition had been reported improving until yesterday afternoon. He had been in the lake transportation business since 1876, but retired recently.

	Mr. Leopold’s life was saddened in 1925 in the discovery that his son, Nathan F. Leopold, Jr., had killed little Bobby Franks, a crime to which young Leopold and Richard Loeb pleaded guilty.

	Nathan Leopold, Sr., was a respected and well liked business man.


parents loaded and well-connected

...


https://www.history.com/this-day-in-history/leopold-and-loeb-gain-national-attention
	Leopold and Loeb gain national attention

	...Both were convinced that their intelligence and social privilege exempted them from the laws that bound other people. In 1924, the pair began to put this maxim to the test by planning to commit a perfect murder. They each established false identities and began rehearsing the kidnapping and murder over and over.

	...Clarence Darrow agreed to defend Leopold, and the trial soon became a national sensation. Darrow, who didn’t argue the boys’ innocence, directed one of his most famous orations against the death penalty itself. The judge was swayed and imposed life sentences. Apparently unsatisfied with the attorney’s work, Leopold’s father later reneged on his contract to pay Darrow.

	In January 1936, a fellow inmate killed Loeb in a bloody razor fight in the prison’s shower. Leopold was released on parole in 1958 with help from noted poet Carl Sandburg, who testified on his behalf. He lived out the rest of his life in Puerto Rico, where he died in 1971.


why was Leopold Sr. apparently upset with Darrow saving his kid's life?

why w Carl Sandburg want this guy free


...




http://articles.chicagotribune.com/2005-08-18/news/0508180276_1_leopold-and-loeb-armand-deutsch-nathan-leopold
	LOS ANGELES — Armand Deutsch, a Chicago-born film producer who believed he was the intended target in the 1924 Leopold and Loeb murder case, has died at 92.

	..."It was no mystery why Richard Loeb and Nathan Leopold had singled me out as a prime prospect for their heinous crime," Mr. Deutsch wrote in 1996 for the Chicago Tribune Magazine. "My grandfather, Julius Rosenwald, was the chairman of the board of Sears, Roebuck and Co. His prominence made me an ideal choice."

	"In addition," he wrote, "Loeb's father was a Sears vice president. Our families were friends. . . . So I knew and trusted both older boys, a great plus as they formulated their plans for what would become the first `crime of the century.'"

	On May 21, 1924, Mr. Deutsch wrote, Leopold and Loeb "cruised around the Harvard School looking for me or another acceptable candidate."

	Instead of himself, Mr. Deutsch wrote, they "found my 14-year-old schoolmate Robert Franks. Like me, Bobby knew and trusted both of them." Shortly after picking up Franks in their car, the two killed him and then dumped the body in Illinois near the Indiana state line (this sentence as published has been corrected in this text). Police found a pair of glasses that fell from Leopold's pocket near the body. The wealthy teenagers eventually pleaded guilty and were sentenced to life in prison after a spectacular trial involving Clarence Darrow.

	"How had I avoided certain death?" Mr. Deutsch wrote in the Tribune. "My daily routine was to walk home from school. Had I followed it on May 21, I surely would have accepted [the] invitation for a ride. Instead, I was picked up by the family chauffeur for a dental appointment."

	...Mr. Deutsch, who came to Hollywood in the mid-1940s to work in films, produced a number of movies. They included "Ambush" (1949), a Western starring Robert Taylor; "The Magnificent Yankee" (1950), a biography of jurist Oliver Wendell Holmes starring Louis Calhern;

	...In addition to his production work, he had served on the board of directors at Warner Bros. He also wrote a book, "Me and Bogie, And Other Friends and Acquaintances From a Life in Hollywood and Beyond" (1991).

	Mr. Deutsch met the Reagans before they were married, and they quickly became friends.


well-connected guy, grandson of Sears guy Rosenwald and friend of Leob's father, writes "it could have been me" in Chicago Tribune in 1996:

http://articles.chicagotribune.com/1996-06-23/features/9606230337_1_leopold-and-loeb-nathan-leopold-richard-loeb
	Leopold possessed the greater intellectual capacity. In addition to his ornithological prowess, he was multilingual, conversant in 15 languages. He was a disciple of the Nietzschean superman philosophy. Loeb was bright, witty and superficial. Physically attractive, he was an obsessive conversationalist to whom lying came as naturally as breathing.

	Loeb and Leopold hardly arrived at the "perfect murder" concept as newcomers to crime. Although they denied it, their story often has included accusations of culpability for a series of college fraternity burglaries, followed by several cases of arson as wells as other murders. I've read that the prosecution of one crime, in which a young boy was castrated before being killed, was mysteriously halted. In another case, the victim's family sued Loeb's and Leopold, who were already in prison. Their families settled out of court.


not their first murder?


	...Inevitably the planning of a wealthy boy's murder was concluded. On May 21 Dickie and Babe, as they were familiarly known, in their rented Willys-Knight, cruised around the Harvard School looking for me or another acceptable candidate. They found my 14-year-old schoolmate Robert Franks. Like me, Bobby knew and trusted both of them. He was picked up halfway home on his walk from school. (Who drove and who sat in the back seat remains an unsolved mystery. Loeb and Leopold both steadfastly claimed to be the driver.)


article sounds genuine

what's his angle? is it that murder is wrong, or murdering other elite?


	...The "perfect crime" had unraveled in 10 days. That afternoon prosecutor Crowe told the press that Loeb and Leopold had revealed my selection as a likely victim. This revelation was highlighted in the newspapers. One ran a front-page photograph of my mother, and under it were the words: "Her Son Escaped."


the real trial?

	...From the beginning Crowe was in the position of a club fighter up against Joe Louis. Darrow knew that it would be impossible to find a jury that would not vote for hanging. Crowe's strategy was based on a trial by jury. On the first day of the trial Darrow changed the arraignment plea from "not guilty by reason of insanity" to "guilty." This maneuver allowed him to waive a jury trial. The decision would be in the hands of the judge. "I would rather try to convince one man than 12, " he said.

	...The trial created riotous media attention. Huge throngs, held back by mounted police, converged on the courthouse demanding public hanging. Courtroom watchers were aghast watching Loeb and Leopold snicker and exchange coded glances, oblivious of the waves of revulsion that swept through the courtroom.

	Darrow described his clients as two defective machines. He said they had been deprived since birth of an emotional system and were not to blame for their genetic failure. Appropriate punishment would be life sentences without parole, separating them forever from society. Darrow had considerable help from his opponent. Crowe insisted that Franks had been murdered for ransom by two high-stakes gamblers deep in debt and afraid to admit it to their parents, a strategy that badly misfired. Darrow's gentle, masterfully delivered closing argument contrasted sharply with the prosecution's shrill cry for blood. Many in the courtroom wept.


a show trial...


	...Leopold confounded everyone by his immediate adaptation to prison life. He conducted classes, upgraded prison libraries and participated in malaria experiments. The phrase "model prisoner" began to filter outside the walls.


Leopold media attention in prison


	...When Leopold was paroled, I received several calls from newspaper reporters asking how I felt about it. Since I mistakenly pictured him restricted to Puerto Rico and performing worthwhile work, it did not disturb me. Years later I was angered to learn that he was permitted to travel at will. He frequently visited family in Chicago. These trips gave him pleasure, an emotion denied the Franks family from the day of their son's grisly death.

	...Today murder has become so commonplace that it has lost its ability to horrify us. Not so with crimes of the century. We have never become immune to them. The reaction to the murders of Nicole Brown and Ronald Goldman was identical to that of the murder of Bobby Franks. After the verdicts, a vast majority felt that Loeb and Leopold should have been executed and that O.J. Simpson was wrongfully acquitted.

	The color of a great defense in a crime of the century is green-money.

	The Loeb and Leopold families could afford Darrow. O.J. Simpson could afford Johnnie Cochran and the "dream team." Darrow was able to change the Loeb-Leopold case to a trial against capital punishment. Cochran was successful in changing the Simpson case to a trial against the Los Angeles police department and detective Mark Fuhrman.

	At 83 now, I probably will not live to see the first crime of the 21st Century. My life experience leads me to two predictions: The media and the public will be mesmerized; the defendant, if rich, will avoid the death penalty, and perhaps even conviction.


sounds like he's against rich people getting away with murder


...

http://www.chicagonow.com/chicago-history-cop/2015/09/charles-heath-the-forgotten-victim-of-child-killers-leopold-and-loeb/
	Charles Heath - The Forgotten Victim of Child Killers Leopold and Loeb

	Charles Ford Heath is a name that few remember when discussing the “Crime of the Century”

	...Nathan Leopold, 19 and Richard Loeb, 18 were extremely intelligent sons of wealthy Chicagoans and both were pursuing post graduate work at the University of Chicago.  They became inseparable friends and Loeb believed that wealthy, intelligent people were above the law.  Loeb believed that they could commit the “perfect crime” and convinced Leopold that they could get away with it.

	...They had sent a typed ransom note to Bobby’s father, Jacob Franks, using the alias George Johnson but young Bobby’s body was found by a construction worker before they could extort $10,000 from the Franks family.

	The hunt for “George Johnson” was underway and they police had put together a likely description of the culprit based on the educated style of prose used in the ransom letter.

	The police received an anonymous letter from a person claiming to be the killer of Bobby Franks that said he planned on killing himself.  Chief of Police Collins then issued the order to keep all attempted suicides under surveillance and that is where 35 year old druggist Charles Heath enters the scene.


while hunting for killer, police got anonymous letter confessing to crime and saying planned to kill himself. So the police where on the look out for suicide attempts to find killer.


	...Charles was at Mercy Hospital after his wife, Anna Vetter, found him in a stupor in the bedroom of their home at 6251 Harper Avenue with mercury and Veronal (barbital) pills by his side.  This was only two days after the disappearance of Bobby Franks.

	Charles and Anna had been married since April 17, 1913.  Anna had one daughter, Marian, who was 16 years old from a previous marriage and they had one daughter together, Charlotte, who was 8 years old.

	Charles had lost his job on the same day that Bobby Franks disappeared and his wife had explained that he had not been in the best of health since he went bankrupt two years ago and lost the druggist business he had at 1524 E. 64th St.

	Police stationed themselves at Charles’ bed at Mercy Hospital and his wife believed that they had already come down pretty hard on her husband because their home was only one block away from the drug store that the kidnappers had told Jacob Franks to proceed to with the ransom money.


Charles had appeared to have tried to commit suicide two days after murder, had lost his job same day of murder, and lived next to the drug store that Leopold and Loeb said to drop the money near (or part of that process). So they suspected Charles. His wife thought they "came down hard" on him while stationed outside his hospital bed.


	Police were shocked when they discovered that even though he was under surveillance he had somehow left Mercy Hospital undetected.

	On Tuesday May 27th, Charles Heath checked into the Coker’s Hotel in Louisville, Kentucky.  He had a cousin in Louisville named C.C. Krause.  He showed up at Krause’s house at 2620 Portland Street and told him that he sold his business in Chicago and that he was there looking for a job.  Krause said he seemed like he was in good spirits and left his house on Tuesday night at about 10:30pm to return to the hotel.

	When he checked into the hotel he told the clerk that he had to leave Chicago because he was beaten up by a group of men due to the fact that he was named in the newspaper as a dead ringer for the killer of the Franks boy.


Somehow, Charles evaded police surveillance and left the hospital. He went to his cousin's house, told him he sold business and looking for a job and seemed in good spirits, then went to hotel there. He told hotel clerk left Chicago because he was beaten up for a being a dead ringer for the murders.


	On the Morning of the 28th a maid entered Heath’s room saw him motionless in bed but presumed him asleep.  She did not return until the next morning where she found him in the same position and called the authorities.  The police transported him to Louisville City Hospital where he was kept under surveillance.  He had taken another dose of Veronal and was alive but unresponsive.   Newspaper clippings of the Franks case with his name listed as a suspect were found in his pockets.  There was also a note.

	“Please notify Mrs. C.F. Heath, 6251 Harper Ave. Chicago.  Please give me full Masonic rites.  Tell them that I will not be with them anymore.”


Next morning, a maid found him motionless. Charles had taken more Veronal but was alive. Found newpaper clippings of Franks case with his name on him. Though he was said to have been in good spirits earlier, he was found with a suicide note. The suicide note implicated him in Freemasonry.


	While police officers waited at Charles’ bedside in Louisville for him to regain consciousness, Nathan Leopold was sitting in Chicago talking to police about a pair of glasses that were found with the Franks body.  Only three people in Chicago were sold glasses with a very special hinge mechanism and one of them was Nathan Leopold.

	Richard Loeb was the first to confess blaming Leopold for everything but eventually both came clean and the “Trial of the Century” was in motion.


The police were still interested in Charles. However, only three people in Chicago had the special glasses that were sold to Leopold, and a pair was found at the crime scene. Because of this, a parallel investigation led police to Leopold, who confessed to the murder. Loeb confessed first and blamed Leopold for everything.


	Tragically, at the same time the confessions were taking place in Chicago a young druggist was dying in Kentucky.  On June 1, 1924 Charles Heath died at the City Hospital in Louisville Kentucky thinking that he was the main suspect in a child murder and not one newspaper covered the story of his death.


Charles would later die. No newspaper covered the story of his death.

	
	Chicago had their killers and a young druggist’s widow and mother of two moved back to Porter County Indiana to live with her family.




Leopold and Loeb's family were well-connected, and their lawyer participated in other active measures

They were sued for another murder, which was settled out of court

They believed they should get away with murder, on account of their perceived superiority to the "slave class"

Multiple media personalities contributed to fame and fascination of Leopold and Loeb, including newspapers and "poets" rehabiliting Leopold's image after his incarceration

A man Charles Heath fit as the murderer, on account of the letters Leopold and Loeb wrote. A newspaper outed Heath as a "dead ringer", and his death was ruled a suicide under suspicious circumstances.

Meanwhile, a pair of glasses found at the crime scene lead police to Leopold, unusual on account of their ability and planning and the luck that they enjoyed before and after the murders (maybe more going on with this? Leopold confesses "glasses fell from my pocket" http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html . He also says he was wearing glasses earlier "in order to disguise myself")

long after the murders, well-concected people and journalists are still split on their disposition toward Leopold and Loeb


here's a theory:

Leopold and Loeb thought they should enjoy the "happiness of the knife" in dominating the slave class, and many people who thought like them agreed. So, they helped get away with this and continue this, the elite "predators" hunting their "prey" for sport. One way they could help them is plant evidence and frame others for the murders.

One day, Leopold and Loeb took it too far: they targeted children at their own wealthy school, coming dangerously close to hunting the same members of the "elite" who were protecting them.

Some elite thought this permissible and continued to help them, others not so much. Just as evidence could be planted by agentura to help them get away with it, evidence could be planted to incriminate them.


...


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/opinions/1982/07/11/the-ordeal-of-testifying-in-a-murderers-defense/491ceb48-d949-49eb-bfe4-29b7c3468d6b/
	 The Ordeal of Testifying In a Murderer's Defense

	 By Meg Greenfield; Meg Greenfield is the editorial page editor of The Post.

	 July 11, 1982

	 I HAVE BEFORE ME photostats of the front pages of a couple of newspapers, The New York Times and The New York Herald Tribune for Aug. 8, l924. The story that engages my attention concerns the Loeb-Leopold murder case, then in court.

	In the Herald Tribune it is headlined this way: "Girl Friend Swears Loeb Was Childish. Lorraine Nathan, 18, and 4 Boy Chums Corroborate Alienists on Condition of Minds of Murderers." The Times headline tells more: "State Accuses Girl of Lying for Loeb; Four Chums Testify. Crowe Cries 'Perjury' as Former Sweetheart Declares Youth 'Irrational and Infantile.' " On the inside page where the story continues, one of the papers carries a photograph of the girl, of whom it says, "She made a pretty though somewhat nervous picture on the stand."

	The girl is wearing one of those daffy headache bands of the period, and she looks very young to me. She is my mother. 


mother of Meg Greenfield of the Washington Post was called to testify on behalf of Loeb

	
	I never discussed her role as a defense witness in the Loeb-Leopold case with my mother. She died when I was 12, and it was only years later that my brother and I, growing up in another city, even heard of the famed Chicago murder (someone had made a movie about it) and then heard, from a family friend, to our astonishment, that our mother had had some part in the court proceedings. But the tight wall of shame that surrounded the whole affair, from murder to sentencing, remained so strong among those associated with it -- no matter how tangentially -- that even then we were unable to get answers to the questions we put to our elder relatives. "Why bring all that up now?" came the stock response. "Why do you want to talk about it? . . . I don't really remember . . . It was so long ago." Eventually we went to the microfilm section of a library and dug the story out of old newspapers.


"Why talk about it now?" Greenfield sees a "wall of shame" around the murder and trial, and never got a chance to talk to her mother about it. She dug up old newspapers to find out more.


	The uproar over the Hinckley case has caused me to retrieve those photostats from a drawer, inspect them again and consider again some of the aspects of that earlier case which, in slightly different form, we are arguing about now.


background on Hinckley case:


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/John_Hinckley_Jr.
	John Warnock Hinckley Jr. (born May 29, 1955) is an American citizen who, on March 30, 1981, attempted to assassinate U.S. President Ronald Reagan in Washington, D.C. Hinckley wounded Reagan with a bullet that ricocheted and hit him in the chest. Hinckley also wounded police officer Thomas Delahanty and Secret Service agent Timothy McCarthy, and critically wounded Press Secretary James Brady. All of the shooting victims survived, although Brady's 2014 death was later ruled a homicide 33 years after he was shot.

	Reported to have been driven by an obsessive fixation on Jodie Foster, he was found not guilty by reason of insanity and remained under institutional psychiatric care until September 2016. Public outcry over the verdict led to the Insanity Defense Reform Act of 1984, which altered the rules for consideration of mental illness of defendants in Federal Criminal Court proceedings in the United States. Hinckley was released from institutional psychiatric care on September 10, 2016, and lives with his mother.[1]

	...John Warnock Hinckley Jr. was born on May 29, 1955 in Ardmore, Oklahoma,[2][3] and moved with his wealthy family to Dallas, Texas, at the age of 4. His late father was John Warnock Hinckley Sr., president of World Vision United States, and chairman and president of the Vanderbilt Energy Corporation. His mother is Jo Ann (Moore) Hinckley. He has two older siblings: sister Diane and brother Scott. After graduating from Vanderbilt University, Scott Hinckley became vice president of his father's oil business. Their sister, Diane, graduated from Southern Methodist University in Dallas.[2]

	Hinckley grew up in University Park, Texas,[4] and attended Highland Park High School[5] in Dallas County. During his grade school years, he played football, basketball, hockey, soccer and baseball, learned to play the piano, and was elected class president twice.

	...At his trial in 1982, in Washington, D.C., having been charged with 13 offenses, Hinckley was found not guilty by reason of insanity on June 21. The defense psychiatric reports portrayed him as insane while the prosecution reports characterized him as legally sane.[12] Hinckley, Federal Bureau of Prisons (BOP) number 00137-177, was released from BOP custody on August 18, 1981.[13] Soon after his trial, Hinckley wrote that the shooting was "the greatest love offering in the history of the world" and was disappointed that Foster did not reciprocate his love.[14]

	The verdict resulted in widespread dismay. As a consequence, the United States Congress and a number of states revised laws governing when the insanity defense may be used by the defendant in a criminal prosecution. Idaho, Montana, and Utah abolished the defense altogether.[15] In the United States, prior to the Hinckley case, the insanity defense had been used in less than 2% of all felony cases and was unsuccessful in almost 75% of those trials.[12] Public outcry over the verdict led to the Insanity Defense Reform Act of 1984, which altered the rules for consideration of mental illness of defendants in federal criminal court proceedings in the United States.[2] In 1985, Hinckley's parents wrote Breaking Points, a book detailing their son's mental condition.[12]


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/opinions/1982/07/11/the-ordeal-of-testifying-in-a-murderers-defense/491ceb48-d949-49eb-bfe4-29b7c3468d6b/
	True, the two rich Chicago boys -- Nathan Leopold Jr., 19, and Richard Loeb, 18 -- who plotted and carried out the murder of young Bobby Franks in a spirit of coldblooded intellectual play, pleaded guilty to the crime, at the recommendation of their lawyer, Clarence Darrow. So there was nothing precisely comparable to the Hinckley lawyers' effort to persuade a jury that a defendant was not guilty by reason of insanity. And in fact there wasn't even a jury, once the guilty plea had been entered. It was for the sentencing Judge, John R. Caverly, and in the hope of getting the death penalty mitigated in favor of life imprisonment, that Darrow organized his psychiatric pitch. This pitch was that despite the obviously rational calculation and control that had gone into the perpetration of the crime, the "boys," as Darrow called his clients, though not "insane," weren't quite right in the mind at the time they committed it. Rather, they had been driven to their act by an accumulation of psychological and emotional deformities not of their own making.

	My mother, who described herself on the stand as "just a schoolday friend" of Loeb, was one of the witnesses Darrow called to help establish this point. Darrow, in his wisdom, declined to call her younger sister, my beloved Aunt Rolly -- then described as "Miss Rosalind" -- notwithstanding, as we learn from the papers, that Miss Rosalind stood ready with a medical finding that Loeb was "plain cuckoo." Her sister's diagnosis, it is explained by my mother in the news account, was based on the fact that Loeb had "stuck his thumb into all the chocolates on a plate passed to him at a dance at the Nathan home as he sought a soft-centered candy."


Greenfield's aunt was prepared to testify that Loeb was insane, but Darrow didn't call on her. Greenfield says Leopold and Loeb carried out the murder with "obvious calculation and control."


	My mother, who testified along with four other young friends of the defendants, used rather more clincial-sounding language, for which she was to be reprimanded by the judge. But in swearing to the recently aberrant behavior of the the two killers, she and the other school friends were far from being Darrow's heavy guns. They followed, they did not lead -- and they followed the doctors.


Greenfield says her mother and her friends followed the doctors in their testimony.


	Darrow countered with a distinguished group of the newfangled Freudians, including one who was president of the American Psychiatric Association and superintendent of St. Elizabeth's Hospital. (Two Chicago newspapers, nothing loathe to get into the act, invited Sigmund Freud to do an analysis of the murderers for them. Freud sent his regrets.)

	There were soon complaints, as there were to be in the Hinckley case almost 60 years later, that the wealthy families of these young men were, in effect, "buying" them out of the consequences of their crime with an ability to pay for expert testimony and counsel. There was unprecedented courtroom discussion of overbearing governesses, childhood sexual fantasies, glandular disorders. And there was despair then, as now, that respected experts could argue such utterly different versions of the psychiatric case.


Darrow invited some distinguised Fruedian psychologists, including APA president, and some newspapers tried to invite Freud himself.

Greenfield points out there were "complaints" that the wealthy could buy their way out of murder, and "despair" that so many respected experts would lie for them.

	
	I can't tell from the news accounts whether my mother actually perjured herself as the prosecutor, Robert Crowe, charged. He pointed out that her testimony that Loeb's conduct had changed and that in the past year he had seemed newly "infantile" and "irrational" directly contradicted earlier sworn statements she had made in the prosecutor's office that Loeb was "manly" and "sane." There was a quarrel among lawyers over that, some maneuvering, aacountercharge that in that earlier session an assistant state's attorney had tried to influence her testimony and that parts of her testimony had been deleted and so forth.

	I don't know what to make of any of that; the court evidently didn't pursue it. And I can't know how closely her own genuine perception of Loeb's conditon paralleled that of the three leading psychoanalysts the defense had already called. She certainly used all their terminology, and it has an odd, forced, unaccustomed ring to it in the news account. The prosecutor responded, in a savage cross examination, by addressing her sarcastically as "doctor."


not sure, but I think Darrow's argument shifted during trial? he teeters on calling them insane in his argument--maybe arguing they were rational but mislead wasn't working. Greenfield says she's not sure if her mother lied like the "respected experts"


	It must have been terrifying. That's the part that interests me. But I have very little to guide me in understanding how she felt, or even why she was there. She was not, incidentally, the "sweetheart" of the moment or the one who was written about in the semi-fictional accounts. She was a friend who had known him long, once been a girl friend and now remained close.

	I do know now from family that she insisted on testifying when asked, very much against the will and judgment of her parents. They wanted to avoid any connection with the terrible scandal and forsaw what it would be like -- not just on the stand, but after. My mother gained an unwanted celebrity. Along with others who followed the trial's revelations, she learned of a breathtakingly brutal, degenerate side to her friend. She was to suffer something that sounds today like a nervous breakdown when the case was completed and to be packed off "to forget" at a kind of junior college/finishing school in the East.


Greenfield's mother knew Loeb and offered to testify, against the wishes of her parents who predicted the scandal. Greenfield says her mother learned a dark side of her friend. The scandal followed her and she had something like a nervous breakdown later.


	...To me this moment has it all -- innocence and experience, revulsion and compassion, incredulity and understanding. We were in the babyhood of our experience with this particular kind of analysis of criminal behavior. I go back to the case of the poked-in chocolates. In a way, as usual in our family, Aunt Rolly was out there ahead of the curve. For her the chocolate-squashing represented a lapse in decorum so grave as to constitute, on its face, evidence of insanity. In fact, the presiding judge was to make a comparable observation: "had they (Loeb and Leopold) been normal, they would not have committed this crime." Although his eventual decision to forego the death penalty was not, he claimed, based on the psychiatric case, but on the youth of the defendants, Judge Caverly here gave expression to a sentiment -- crime equals derangement -- that, whatever its merit in some instances, has been overextended, debased and reduced to absurdity in our own age.


Pointing to "this method of criminal analysis," in its "infant stages" at the time of the case (and relevant to the Hinckely case?) Greenfield says the idea that crime equals derangement has been overextended and reduced to absurdity.

	
	And surely the same may also be said of another aspect of the case and one which was novel: the introduction of all this lore about the defendants' upbringing and state of mind, not as evidence of insanity or of an inability to know right from wrong, but rather as evidence of a diminished responsibility for their actions, which in turn was said to argue for a sentence of diminished severity.


Greenfield takes issue with the idea that lore about a defendents' upbringing and state of mind is an excuse for diminished responsibility and lesser sentencing


	Since those early days, it seems to me, this search for determining causes, this assumption of "no fault" behavior has been carried to a mad place too. Increasingly, even mindlessly, we have overlaid all our actions with a vaguely psychological, exculpatory, morally confusing wash. Nowadays there is not even "temptation." We call temptation "pressure," the implication being that the crime or lapse is hardly the fault of the one who succumbs; it is the fault of the temptation itself, the fault of the "pressure."

	And we have so vastly expanded the application of this doctrine since Darrow's day that the act of corruption or cynicism has yet to be invented that does not somehow get mitigated by it. I sometimes think we may even be tending, in our judgments of public venality, toward a new verdict of "not greedy by reason of insanity."


Greenfield says the search for external causes for individuals actions has gone to a "mad place." She says it's hard to find to find an act of corruption or cynicism that the doctrine of blaming external causes can't be used to excuse (reminiscent of Neitzsche's idea that there's no free will and blame made up to limit strong, or "structural interpretations" in Marxist theory that decisions are inevitable consequences of the trends in society)


	The woman who was my mother was pretty old-fashioned and rigorous. Reflecting on what I know of her -- remember and have been told -- I think she would in fact have been shocked by where that pioneering legal case helped to bring us. But that is speculation, and I am interested in the girl. I look at the news photo of the young face, the earnest eyes, the damned-fool headband. What did she believe? That Loeb was evil? That he was mad? How much did she buy of the view apparently held by those close to each of the murderers, that the other boy had been the true culprit and had corrupted her friend?


Greenfield says her mother wouldn't have liked where the case got them. Wonders what she believed, if she bought the view that Leob was innocent. Says each group of friends of Leopold and Loeb blamed the other for being the corrupting influence.


	How hurt, how betrayed, how shocked was she? Did she finally decide that she must do what she could to save his life? Was that the moral and emotional nub of the matter for her, an unwillingness not to help save him, an inability to refuse to testify? Was she repelled by him? Moved by his plight? Both? Did it add up to some dim faith in the psychiatric theory before the court, to a need to believe that thissold and treasured "schoolday friend" had been in some way possessed -- and thus not fully responsible for his barbarous act?


wonders Mother's motive--did she want to help her friend, and ended up drawn to the idea that external factors to blame out of sympathy?


	You will see I am myself working toward a theory of what motivated her. I sense in hes gir decision to testify -- I want to sense in it -- an element of humility, compassion. Never mind the overreaching and the intellectual arrogance of some of those who claim power these days to explain every human act of love and grace, not just of depredation, as nothing more than the automatic working of some psychological law they understand. Surely, we can step back from the excesses without abandoning what is of value here. For there is humility, not arrogance, in yielding to the possibility and accepting the thought that others are driven by devils we cannot see and might not ourselves resist.


Greenfield wants to believe her mother was motivated by compassion. She resents some who "claim power" and explain every act of love, grace, deprediation as "nothing more than the automatic working of some psychological law they understand." (examples might be: justice is just ressentiment of the slave mindset)

Greenfield sees excess but value here, in that there is humility in "yielding to the possibility and accepting the thought that others are driven by devils we cannot see and might not ourselves resist."


	I like to think that some largeness of spirit and understanding is what motivated the nervous girl they ridiculed as "doctor" on the stand, that, painful as it was, she was acting instinctively, intuitively in the spirit we need to retain today -- no matter where our much- needed discussion and revision of the criminal law may take us.



------

What did the press say about the Leopold and Loeb case and Darrow's defense?

what did the say about Leopold while in prison?

what do they say today?



https://www.newspapers.com/image/355037981/

Chicago Tribune on day of sentencing


a large image of a man in front of Lady Justice, holding a peice of paper labeled "slayers." The man is saying "After this, I don't see how I can ever ask you to hang anybody"



NYTimes and Chicago Tribune on Franks murder:


May 23, 1924

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/23/101598745.html?pageNumber=1

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/23/101598745.pdf

	KIDNAPPERS SLAY RICH CHICAGO BOY

	 Body of 13-Year-Old Robert Franks Is Found in a Culvert as $10,000 Demand Is Made.

	 CHICAGO, May 22. — Kidnappers whose identity at present is unknown and who demanded $10,000 ransom early today brutally murdered Robert Franks, 13-year-old son of Jacob Franks, wealthy retired watchmaker, of 5,052 Ellis Avenue, and threw his body into a culvert beside the Pennsylvania Railroad tracks at 118th Street. 


says rewards total $10k offered for arrest

father offered $5k and a local newspaper another 5
`
parents and Senator Sam Ettelson, friend of theirs, "negotiated with the kidnappers" and "made a secret report to the Detective Bureau"

were about to pay when boy's body was found

	
	...Stuck grotesquely on the boy's face was found a pair of spectacles, placed there apparently by the kidnappers in an effort to make identification harder, for the boy, according to his parents, never wore glasses.


from Simaon Baatz "for the thrill of it" pg 25

	...As his fellow workers were carrying the body to a second handcare on the tracks, Paul Korff, a signal repairman for the railroad, glanced over the scene. He wondered if any of the boy's clothes were lying around; if so they should gather them up and take them along. Korff could see nothing--no shirt or trousers, or even shoes and socks--but he did find a pair of eyeglasses with toroiseshell frames, lying on the embankment, just a few feet from the culvert. Perhaps they belonged to the boy; Korff put them in his pocket and joined his comrades waiting by the handcars.

	...At around ten o’clock that morning, Anton Shapino, the sergeant
	on duty at the Hegewisch police station, took charge of the body. Paul
	Korff had handed him the tortoiseshell eyeglasses, and Shapino, as-
	suming that they belonged to the boy, placed them on the child’s fore-
	head. Later that morning, at the morgue at 13300 South Houston
	Avenue, the undertaker, Stanley Olejniczak, laid the body out; as he did
	so, he noticed the unusual discoloration of the boy’s face and genitals
	and the bruises and cuts on the head—someone had obviously beaten
	the child violently


from Leopold's confession:

http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html
	"Having arrived at our destination we placed the body in the robe, carried it to the culvert where it was found.  Here we completed the disrobing, then in an attempt to render identification more difficult we poured hydrochloric acid over the face and body.  Then we placed the body into the drain pipe and pushed it as far as we could.  We gathered up all the clothes, placed them in the robe and apparently at this point the glasses fell from my pocket.  I carried the robe containing the clothes back to the automobile, a distance of some 300 yards, and one of the socks apparently dropped from the bundle. 


The glasses were the key evidence leading to Leopold. They weren't found on Franks body but lying on the ground. Why does NY times report that the glasses were found on Frank's face? 



https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/23/101598745.pdf
	Yellow Taxicab Is a Clew

	The spectacles were considered an important clew, and a hunt was on for a Yellow Taxicab driver who drove cab No. 1,492, or No. 1,942, to the Franks home at 3:45 in the afternoon, saying he had been sent by a stranger in a drug store "on Sixty-third Street to bring Mr. Franks and the package"--meaning the $10,000 ransom money--to him.

	On this driver lay the only hope of obtaining a description of a mysterious "Mr. Johnson," one of the kidnappers, who did all the negotiating by telephone and by letter with Mr. and Mr. Franks and with Senator Ettelson during the tedious twenty-four hour vigil.


a cab driver drove to Franks home and told them a stranger at a drug store "on sixty-third street" sent him for the money

NY Times said this cab driver was "the only hope" for a description of the kidnappers

"Mr. Johnson" also communicated with Senator Ettelson


	...When the boy did not arrive home for dinner Mr. Franks told the police he had a vague persentiment that something was wrong, that something tragic had happened. The feeling grew so strong upon him that he called in Senator Ettelson and asked him what to do.


goes on to describe Mrs. Franks "Mr. Johnson" call

	...Senator Ettelson at once called on the supervisor of the telephone company to trace all incoming calls from that time on. But no further calls came

	...At 2 o'clock in the morning Mr. Franks and Senator Ettelson went to the Detective Bureau and consulted an officer. They decided, however, not to have a police search made then.

	The east side police, who had charge of the body, knew nothing of a missing Franks boy. They knew only that a boy's body had been found in the dismal swamp beside the railroad tracks near the forest preserve. Off-hand, it was presumed the boy had drowned.


How is it possible to "presume he had drowned?" his face and genetals were melted with acid, he had a gash in his head.

	
	So the message of the finind of a boy's body beside the tracks went unheeded when it was received at the Detective Bureau at 10 o'clock in the morning.


did they start to care when a wealthy family and a Senator got involved?

	Mr. Ettelson and Mr. Franks had not come back to tell of the missing boy and the police had no report on him.

	Meanwhile negotiations between "Johnson" and the anxious, waiting party in the Franks home went on. That, it was admitted later, was the reason no second visit to the Detective Bureau was made.


first visit was shortly after Franks was kidnapped due to a "vaugue feeling." Later Franks parents decided to contact Ellison. After this, Franks body was found and "presumed drowned." Frank's parents didn't call back on police until later.

who is this cab driver? he isn't found in contemporary accounts of the murder


...


May 23, 1924, Chicago Tribune, pg 1

https://www.newspapers.com/image/354880363/
	ROBERT FRANKS IS VICTIM OF MYSTERY DEATH

	Question 3 of His Instructors

	
	...The police in their efforts to solve the mystery questioned three Harvard school instructors closely last night and early today. Walter Wilson, an instructor in mathematics, was first examined in his home, 4757 Ingieside avenue.

	Shortly before 3 a. m. Lieut Michael Grady took R. P. Williams, athletic instructor, 4829 Dorchester avenue, and Mott Mitchell, instructor in English, 2955 Euclid avenue, to the Wabash avenue police station. There they were asked many questions and then permitted to go to their homes, after being told to report ot the police again today.

	Meantime the police had take advantage of the temporary detenion of Williams and Mitchell to search their rooms. Several pads of paper found in them were siezed to be compared with the paper on which had been written the letter in which the threat that young Franks would be killed unless $10,000 was forthcoming.

	Hope to Obtain Clews

	The police make no charges against the instructors, but were interested in the fact that the Enlish in the threatening letter was so good that it must have been written by a man of more than ordinary education.	They thought it possible the instructors might furnish clews.


interrogated teachers and searched homes, some names made to press


	...Death Cause Mystery

	Examination of the body by Coroner's Physicians Joseph Springer and F. N. Benson late in the evening set the murder down as one of the most baffling in the city's annals, in that neither of the experienced doctors could assign a cause for death.

	"He was neither strangled nor chocked," Dr. Springer said. "He had been hit on the head several times with a blunt instrument, but none nor all of these blows were sufficient to cause death. I can only say that he has a nasty stomach and lungs."

	Both physicians indicated that the boy might have been murdered through a sponge or rag saturated in acid of some sort pressed to his mouth. The eyes, nose, and lips indicated this; they were blue, and a bit of brown coloring clung about the mouth.


initially, neither coroner could assign a cause of death. Springer said hit in head several times, but wasn't enough to cause death. Both said might have been murderd with acid rag.


	...The boy's body was found half extending out of a culvert under the railroad tracks. It had apparently been tossed into the water and floated into the two foot main in the shallow water between Wolf lake and Hyde lake.

	The head was inside the culvert, the feet extended out.


found half-way in culvert head first. Chicago Tribune offers that he floated into the culvert this way.

	
	...No clothing is near the scene. Only one stocking, identified as worn by Robert floated in the swamp 200 feet away. On the bank lay a pair of horn rimmed eyeglasses. These were boys' size and fitted the lad, but his father said he had never worn spectacles.


found glasses and stocking nearby, father said never wore glasses


	...Instructor Talks of Boy.

	The police early turned for possible light on the case to INstructor Wilson. They visited his home early in the evening, but were told that he was out.

	After they left a Tribune reporter found Wilson at home. He admitted he had taken Robert Franks and his younger brother, Jacob Jr., to River-view park a year ago, adn that on that occasion Mr. and Mrs. Franks had been worried because he did not return with them until 1 o'clock in the morning.

	...Knows No Young Women.

	"Have you a sweetheart?" he was asked, and he replied: "No, I don't know any young ladies around Chicago."

	He was attired in a bathrobe and appeared nervous. He said he had no theory about the murder--had had no time to think about it.


goes over quote by him saying maybe done for money then says police returned and Wilson told them same story.

they incinuated he was the murderer at first I guess by suggesting he was a homosexual


	...Would it not be well to call the police into the matter He was willing, anxious, he said, to pay any demand to get his boy back safe.

	They discussed it; and finally Mr. Ettleson agreed it might be well to go to the detective bureau and tell the affair in confidence to Chief of Detectives Hughes or to Lieut. William Schoemaker. He knew both of these detectives personally, he said. Their advice would be sound.


Ettelson said he knew detective Hughes and Lieut Schoemaker personally

goes on to say at first Ettelson and Franks father thought Franks might be alive, and didn't go to the police the next morning, that Hughes and was going to keep it secret

	...And in the morning, even while the lad's body was being lifted out of the muddy water in the culvert under the railroad tracks between Wolf lake and HYde Park, the kidnapers, now murderers, started their negotiations again as though nothing had happened to the boy.


goes on to say cab driver called in "regular way" "as if it was from Franks home"


...


May 24, 1924 pg 14

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/24/104699801.html?pageNumber=14

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/24/104699801.pdf
	TOPICS OF THE TIMES.
	As there was no advantage for the blackmailers, and a great and obvious risk, in the death of ROBERT FRANKS, the Chicago boy, the chances are that his death was in some way or degree accidental, or at least was not intended when the plot was formed. That probability, or possibility, does not decrease in the slightest the atrocity of the crime or the guilt of the criminals.

	The boy's fate was a natural consequence of such acts as theirs, and it is easy to recall the cases of the Varotta boy, found drowned in the Hudson shortly after he was stolen here in 1921, and of the Coughlin baby, in Morris-town, a year before, who was held so tightly under the abductor's coat as to die of asphyxiation or pressure. The case of the Pickelny boy, found dead in a cellar here last October, was not of the same kind, but no doubt was a murder.


NY times allows more charitable motive to killers


	...Nothing is as yet certain except that the police would not, and should not, "keep faith" with child stealers to the extent of granting them immunity from punishment in case of the little victim's safe return.


points out that parents being willing to allow kidnappers escape from punishment does not mean police should

says police should not "keep faith" with child stealers

this is true in many ways depending on your perspective, including that the police would look pretty bad if they covered up for Leopold and Loeb

	
	...In the Coughlin case the State police did magnificent work in hunting down and capturing the kidnappers: but the baby was dead long before they did it, and the villain's sentence to life imprisonment was poor consoluation to the parents.


...


May 24, 1924 pg 1

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/24/104699682.html?pageNumber=1


	THINKS BOY DIED FIGHTING CAPTORS

	Chicago Coroner Holds This Theory of Death of Young Franks.

	RANSOM SOUGHT AFTERWARD

	Extortioners, Expecting Father to Bring $10,000 to Drug Store, Still Followed Plot.

	CHICAGO, May 23. — Struggling with kidnappers caused the death of Robert Franks, the fourteen-year-old son of a millionaire, and whose naked body was found in a swamp yesterday while the father waited to pay a $10,000 ransom, according to the latest acceptable theory. After a day in which neither motive nor positive clues were established, the following hypothesis was evolved by Coroner Oscar Wolff: 

	At least two men decided to to kidnap Robert Franks and hold him for ransom. They captured him as he was leaving the fashionable private school where he was in a grade equivalent to first year high. They lured the boy into an automobile and struck him over the head with something to quiet him.

	"The boy resisted with all his youthful strength and when it appeared likely he would cry out they stuck a handkerchief into his throat or perhaps just held a hand over his mouth. The boy then struggled so violently as to cause an internal hemmorrhage which brought death within two or three minutes, if the suffocation itself did not kill him, as it undoubtedly would a boy of 14 years, within a few minutes."


from confession:

http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html
	[Loeb]: "We proceeded south on Ellis Avenue, turned east on 50th Street, and just after we turned off of Ellis Avenue, Leopold reached his arm around young Franks, grabbed his mouth and hit him over the head with a chisel.  I believe he hit him several times, I do not know the exact number.  He began to bleed and was not entirely unconscious. 

	...[Leopold]: As soon as we turned the corner, Richard placed his one hand over Robert's mouth to stifle his outcry, with his right beating him on the head several times with a chisel, especially prepared for the purpose.  The boy did not succumb as readily as we had believed so for fear of being observed Richard seized him, and pulled him into the back seat.  Here he forced a cloth into his mouth.  Apparently the boy died instantly by suffocation shortly thereafter. 

	...[Loeb:] This was around five o' clock, I don't know the exact time.  At this time Leopold grabbed Franks and carried him over back of the front seat and threw him on a rug in the car.  He then took one of the rags and gagged him by sticking it down his throat, I believe.  We proceeded down Dorchester, and then at Leopold's direction drove into the country. 

	...We turned around, and as we turned around, he seeing that Franks was unconscious, climbed into the front seat.  Up to that time he had been watching him from the back seat.  He had covered him up with the robe that we had brought along, the robe also belonging to Leopold. 


Why did the coronor decide Franks hemmorrhage was from "struggling" and not being hit on the head? Leopold told police "apparently the boy died instantly by suffocation shortly thereafter"--did he get this from news reports? Why did Loeb say Franks was unconcious at that time but Leopold said he died?



https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/24/104699682.html?pageNumber=1

	"Then, having a body to conceal and the primary purpose of the kidnapping--ransom--not yet even under way, one of the plotters wrote the letter to Jacob Franks, who is said to be worth $4000,000, and the other undertook to dispose of the body."

	"The latter called Mr.s Franks, the distracted mother, on the telephone a few hours after her boy was killed, telling her he was alive and would be returned when the money was paid. That was to render certain the getting of the money."

	"In hiding the boy's body in the drain pipe in the old swamp near Wolf Lake it was the purpose of the murderers to get as much money as possible out of the father, in the belief the body would not be found for many months, perhaps never. To guard against identification they removed the clothing so that if, after considerable time, the body were found it would be only a skeleton and there would be nothing about it to make it certain it was the Franks boy."


from confession:

http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html

	[Leopold:] Having arrived at our destination we placed the body in the robe, carried it to the culvert where it was found.  Here we completed the disrobing, then in an attempt to render identification more difficult we poured hydrochloric acid over the face and body.

	..."After your started out there Nathan, did you remove your clothes at all while you were placing the body?"

	"My coat, yes."

	"Just how did you place the body in the drain pipe, just explain how you placed the body there?"

	"I think it was head first.  I had a pair of rubber boots." 

	..."At the time you had taken your coat off did you lay it on the ground some place?"

	"Yes, right by my shoes."

	"That is not the time you lost your glasses?"

	"No, that is not the time.  Dick had run across the railroad track to see if anybody could be seen from the other end, and I went up to the top of the railroad track, for some reason or other, to put on my shoes, and he brought my coat to me.  I think we struck a match -- no, we had a flashlight with us, and it must have been at that time that the glasses fell out." 

	...[Loeb:] Captain Shoemacher asked, "Was it dark at that time?"

	"Yes.  Stuck it head first into the culvert.  I might say that at this time it was fairly dark, but still not pitch black, so that we were able to work without a flashlight." 


Leopold had a story for how he lost his glasses, but it differed from Loeb's


	[Leob:] We turned around, and as we turned around, he seeing that Franks was unconscious, climbed into the front seat. Up to that time he had been watching him from the back seat.

	...We went down this road a ways, and then turned off the road on another deserted road, this deserted road leading north.  We followed that for only a short distance, then turned down another deserted road, leading west.  We stopped the car, got out, removed young Franks' shoes, hid them in some bushes, and removed his pants and stockings, placing them in the car.  We did this in order that we might be saved the trouble of too much undressing him later on. We also left his belt buckle and belt with his shoes, not in the same place, but very near there.  We then proceeded to drive around back and forth and back and forth."

	"Waiting for it to get dark?"

	"Waiting for it to get dark. 


Loeb says he and leopold were watching Franks and saw him unconcious

Leob said they removed Franks shoes, pants, and "stockings" first so it would be easier to undress him later


	..."We dragged the body out of the car, put the body in the road (robe) and carried it over to the culvert.  Leopold carried the feet, I carried the head.  We deposited the body near the culvert,and undressed the body completely.  Our original scheme had been to etherize the body to death."

	"Where did you pour the hydrochloric acid on him?"

	"Right there.  The scheme for etherizing him originated through Leopold, who evidently has some knowledge of such things, and he said that that would be the easiest way of putting him to death, and the least messy.  This, however, we found unnecessary, because the boy was quite dead when we took him there.  We knew he was dead, by the fact that rigor mortis had set in, and also by his eyes, and then when at that same time we poured this hydrochloric acid over him, we noticed no tremor, not a single tremor in his body, therefore we were sure he was dead.


Loeb said they found out he was dead when the poured acid on him, since he didn't react when it was poured


They poured hydrochoric acid on Franks' genitals, although the reasons why aren't clear:

http://moses.law.umn.edu/darrow/trialpdfs/LEOPOLD_LOEB.pdf
	They poured hydrochloric acid on Bobby Franks’ face
	, a surgery scar on his abdomen and his genitals in an attempt to prevent identification.
	17

	...17  At least one account says Leopold had been told by someone that a person could be identified by their  genitals. Other accounts state that this was done to prevent Franks from being identified as Jewish because  it would obscure evidence of circumcision. 


Leopold's story on how he lost his glasses is suspect, Loeb thought Franks was concious while in the trunk, they removed his pants and underwear first before the rest of his clothes, and poured acid on his genetalia. According to this, the police suspected rape from an early stage:

https://kcjohnson.files.wordpress.com/2012/12/larson-article.pdf
	At first, the police investigation focused on teachers at Harvard School, the elite prep school that Franks attended in Kenwood and near where he was last seen alive.4^ Finding Franks' naked, scratched and discol ored body so quickly after the abduction led police to suspect pedophilia (rather than ransom kidnapping) as the main motive for the crime 47 After examining the body, the coroner stated publically that the boy's body was neither mutilated nor molested4? but he left open the possibility of rape in his final report, leading the prosecutor to raise the issue in courts. 49

	...49

	Fass, supra note 8, at 924, 939. The scratches on the body were probably caused by shoving it in the culvert; the discoloration came from the acid used to by the killers to render the body more difficult to identify. The coroner's report noted, however, "the  rectum was dilated and would admit easily one middle finger." Baatz, supra note 2, at 21.  In relating the killing of Bobby Frank during the prosecution's closing argument to the court, Crowe noted:

		Immediately upon killing him, they took his trousers off. And how do you undress a child? First the little coat, the collar, the tie, the shirt, and the last thing, the trousers. And yet im mediately after killing this poor little boy, his trousers alone came off, and for three hours that little dead boy, with his other clothes on him, remained in that car; and they did not take the balance of the clothes off until they pulled the body into the culvert.

	Speech of Robert E. Crowe, in The Loeb-Leopold Case, supra note 4, at 247. When defense counsel objected to Crowe's subsequent mention of the coroner's finding regarding the vic tim's distended rectum, the States' Attorney protested, "The Coroner's report says that he had a distended rectum, and from that fact, and  the fact that the pants were taken off, and the fact that [the defendants] are perverts, I have a right to argue that they committed an act of erversion." Baatz, supra note 2, at 381.  After considering the objection raised by the de fense, the judge admonished Crowe not to speculate on the matter beyond the contents of the coroner's report. 


The coronor and investigators found signs of rape, but the coronor "left open" this possibility in his final report. When prosecution brought this up on court, Darrow objected, and the judge told Crowe not to "speculate outside the contents of the coroner's report."


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/24/104699682.html?pageNumber=1
	This was as near as certain any detective or official came to a solution of the crime. The police were hopelessly seeking clues all day, without any certainty as to why the lad was killed. Physical examination showed that death was not due to any external violence. A post-mortem examination determined the boy had not drowned, was not the victim of a fractured skull or any concussion of the brain, and that it was almost a certainty that he had not been poisoned.

	That the boy was not the victim of any mistreatment by a degenerate was also established. Every one connected with the Harvard School has been examined and investigations made into their pasts. This led to a complete vidication of the instructors.


NY Times suggests that "it was established" Franks wasn't raped since they investigated all of his teachers.


	...Then Thursday afternoon came the telephone call to Mr. Franks, telling him to get into a taxicab that was sent to him and go to a drug store in Sixty-third Street, where he would meet the men to whom he was to give the money. He had the money prepared, but in his distracted state of mind forget the address and did not go. Within a few minutes he learned his son's body had been recoevered in the swamp.

	It developed today that the kidnappers really expcted him to go to the address given. A check-up of drug stores in Sixty-third Street led to one where a clerk said he was called to the telephone at 3:30 P. M. by a man he judged to be young because of his voice. The caller asked for Mr. Franks and requested the druggist to see if he were in the store. Ten minutes later the same voice made the same request.


"a voice judged to be young"--NY Times does Leopold and Loeb some favors, but not consistently

	...The pair of spectacles found near the body and at first believed to be the property of the lad presents a peculiar phase of the case. They are horn-rimmed and narrow in width, made for a person of narrow head but with a large nose and for one near-sighted, the police deduce. Finding of the owner of the spectacles will go far toward solving the mystery, they believe.


iirc Leopold and Loeb said once they knew the glasses were discovered they were in trouble, and they were reading press reports about the case

worth looking at the murder their family was sued for--what did the press say then?


	...more tangible clues. The writer has not been traced, but the letter was one a well educated person would compuse and was written on a small typewriter of the folding type

	...The missive demanding payment of $10,000 ransom, received by Mrs. Franks, is similar in many respects to one in a detective story in a recent issue of a magazine

	..Oculists expressed the belief that the eye glasses were intended for a woman. Search was made for the boy's clothing or the ashes if it had been burned.

	...The lettering on the envelope containing the demand for $10,000, despite obvious effort to disguse drafting ability, shows the uniform slant, spacing and character of skilled workmanship.

	In general, experts say, the handiwork is not that of one trying to letter well, but that of an adept attempting to letter poorly.


How might Leopold and Loeb read this? maybe "we know you did it, but we won't charge you for rape and murder."

If Leopold were under this assumption, it wouldn't explain why he admitted to planning on killing Franks to the police. It might have been that he was willing to admit a lesser crime in order to avoid charges of a greater one.

later, Leopold would tell police that he was looking for someone to kill:


http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html
Leopold:

	...The next problem was getting the victim to kill. This was left undecided until the day we decided to pick the most likely-looking subject that came our way. The particular case happened to be Robert Franks. 



what's up with deciding glasses were for a woman?


...


May 24, 1924, pg 1 Chicago Tribune


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354880634

headline "KIDNAPPEND BOY DIED FIGHTING"

a large picture entitled "THE MURDERER", with a man reading newspaper stories entitled "Brutal Murder," a loudly ticking clock and eyes on the walls and furnature. Subtitle "As he knows the circle is closing in."


	RANSOM MOTIVE IN FRANKS CASE: CHIEF HUGHES

	Wolff Agrees; Others Seek Perverts.

	...By JAMES DOHERTY.

	...Varied Theories of Death

	...Some of the police and some persons close to the Laddy believe the boy the victim of a degenerate who sought to cloak his act and the boy's presumed accidental death by the demands for money.

	Again, some officials were seeking an enemy of the father, one whom perhaps, in his former business of pawn broker, he had caused to be seen to the penitentiary or one whom he had bested in a financial deal that may have beggared the loser. But Franks' reputation in the old days as in recent years was good.


why do these paragraphs follow each other? not sure what we are supposed to read into from this unless author likes non-sequetors

	...Died of Suffocation

	...The boy had struggled so violently with his captors, presumably in an automobile, he had sustained an internal hemorrhage, which accounted for the discoloration of his heart, lungs, liver, and other organs, the coroner believed.


Doherty presumes Franks struggled in an automobile and died that way


	What Autopsy Showed

	The external examination as well as the autopsy led to the report to the coroner that young Franks had not been the victim of a pervert. Neither had he been drowned, though found in water, nor had the bruises on his head been of such chracter as to cause either a fracture of the skull or concussion of the brain, the coroner's advisers stated.


the coroner found evidence of rape, but his advisors told the Chicago Tribune that Franks "had not been the victim of a pervert" 


	If the belief that the boy's death came while in the hands of men whose on and only object was extortion is correct, the police have nothing on which to work except the tracing of the typewriter, and a few other odds-and-ends clews, it was admitted.


Doherty reports police "admit" that the typewriter and "odds and ends" are the only clues



goes on to report Coronor Wolff's theory that Franks died struggling in a car after being gagged, and that Hughes agrees with Wolff

	
	...Some of his lieutenants though differently, however, and acted accordingly.

	Chief Hughes also advanced as a possible theory that the death of young Franks might have been the result of hazing. He said he had learned that there was a considerable feeling engendered against young Franks during the ball game he had umpired just before his disappearance. He suggested that the defeated boys might have decided to get even with the umpire and that Franks might have died accidentally while they were subjecting him to rough horseplay. This, Hughes said, was based on nothing more than a surmise.


Why are they telling all their theories to the press?


goes on to have large section on "hunt for morons" and police theory that killers were morons


also pushes theory that glasses belonged to a woman, apparently missing that a boy could have carried out the crime

another story headlined "GLASSES NEAR BODY NOT SUCH AS MAN WEARS SMall Lenses and Frame, Opticians Say"


...


May 25, 1924, pg 1

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/25/101599057.html?pageNumber=1

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/25/101599057.pdf

	NOW THREATEN LIFE OF FRANKS' SISTER

	Slayers of Chicago Boy Say in Letter She Will Be the Next — Police Guard Home.

	"CONFESSION" TO POLICE

	Man Shoulders Crime, Says he Plans Suicide -- Woman Sought in Spectacles Clew


	CHICAGO, May 24. — Terror stricken, the kidnappers and murderers of 13-year-old Robert Franks sought today to stop the hunt for them by threatening the life of Josephine Franks, sister of the slain boy, in a letter sent to the father, Jacob Franks, millionaire watchcase manufacturer. 

	The threat was sent in a special delivery letter unsigned, which was received at 10 o'clock this morning. It read:

	"You dirty skunk. Your daughter will be next."

	Samuel Etelson, former Corporation Counsel, was at the Franks home when the threat was received.

	...Mr. Ettelson then came to the door and made the following statement to newspaper men:

	"A letter to Mr. Franks purporting to be from the kidnapper was recieved this morning. It threatens the members of the family with death unless the investigation into the boy's disappearance and death is discontinued We expect developments."


someone threatens Franks family unless investigation stopped

	
	"A short time before the letter was received a woman called up and I spoke to her. She told me she had been living with a confidence man whom she suspected might have engineered the plot to steal the boy. She said he had spoken to her a number of times about kidnapping and that one time, she understood, he was mixed up in such an affair."

	"She said she left him because of his actions. She said he also was in the habit of having various persons around their home and that he had been frequenting a poolroom at Sixty-third Street and Cottage Grove Avenue. The woman gave me her name and also that of the man."

	"We will not make these known until we have investigated the information. She  told us that he had a typewriter."


shortly before the letter, a woman called Ettelson to say she suspected an ex of hers, a con-man, of the murder. Said frequented poolroom at 63rd street and gave name.

"will not make these known until we have investigated"


goes on to say Robert E. Crowe and Police Cheif collins were now taking charge of the investigation


	...Chief Collins received a letter today purporting to be from the man who killed the boy, in which the writer said he was sorry and would probably be dead when the letter was received. The Chief said he believed it was written on the same typewriter as the letter demanding ransom written last Thursday.

	"Dear Chief," the letter said. "I am the murder and kidnapper of the Franks boy. When you get this letter I will probably be dead. I intend to commit suicide. I am very sorry I did that inhuman piece of work."

	"A SORRY MAN."

	The letter was mailed last night at an outlying sub-station.

	The body of an unidentified man was recovered from Lake Michigan today and the police started an immediate investigation to determine his identity and if he might have been the author of the missive.


somebody trying to cover up for Leopold and Loeb? NY Times seems to go along with it.


	A woman was being sought today as one knowing something of the crime. This fact and an automobile license number were all that the police allowed to become known of their plans. Four men, one an instructor and another a former instructor at the private school which the boy attended, were detained for further examination.

	At least two slight clues previously had pointed to the possibility that a woman was involved. The first was the pair of heavy rimmed spectacles picked up near the culver where the boy's nude body was found on Thursday. These were of straight bows, such as are usually worn by women, and, narrow from the temple to temple, and were worn by a man of narrow frontal or a woman. The second clue was the statment of a woman living near the swamp by the culver, who told of seeing in the neighborhood a man and a woman in an automobile apparently in a disagreement.

	The spectacles were made to order from a prescription, a Chicago optician declared. The wearer, the optician believed, was of a nervous, perhaps neurotic tendency, rather intellectual and temperamental, and one leading a sedentary life.


say a woman was wearing the glasses, and someone say a man and woman in a car arguing near culvert where body is found

building up toward different suspects from Leopold and Loeb, a man and a woman, with the man having already committed suicide

	
	Coroner Oscar Wolff announced that the boy was a victim of suffocation, after his chemists had found no external couse of death, and no metallic poisons, and concluded that a hand or cloth pressed over the lad's mouth brought death.


if the woman were to testify, could give an account where it would be easy for jury to believe she didn't murder Franks herself


	The instructors held are Fred Altwood, who formerly was a science teacher at the private school, and Walter Wilson, instructor in mathematics there. The others are Fred Cretors and his son, Joseph, friends of Kenneth Booth, until recently a room mate of one of the instructors. One of the men held lives two blocks from the Sixty-third Street drugstore, where Thursday afternoon two telephone calls were received from a man asking if Jacob Franks, the father, was there.


had some teacher in custody, mentioned one close to the 63rd street drug store


	At the Franks home there was fear that a bomb would be throw and one police guard thrown around the house was instructed to be exceptionally vigilant, to allow nothing to escape their sight or hearing in the neighborhood. Occupants of every automobile that passes or approaches close to the Ellis Avenue building are undergoing scrutiny.


NY times offers that a bomb may be thrown at Franks house and the police officer there will be espeicially vigilant


	All the authorities apparently agreed tonight that the boy was kidnapped for money alone and not through any motive of revenge, and that he was probably suffocated by his captors, possibly accidentally.


speaks of an agreement that Franks was killed accidently


	...Plans were made at the stricken home today for the funeral of the lad who was slain. It probably will be held Monday morning with only the family and immediate relatives in attendance. The mother is near collapse.

	In a statement issued early in the day Mr. Franks said that money meant nothing to him now and that he was ready to spend $1,000,000 to bring the slayers of his son to justice.


...

May 25, 1924, Chicago Tribune, pg 1

https://www.newspapers.com/image/354880848/


	...A chauffeur, Phillip Van De-voorde, said he had seen it Tuesday afternoon in front of the school, and again Wednesday afternoon, a few minutes before 'Bobbie's" last ball game ended.

	The chauffeur says he saw two men in it.


Doherty writes that "a chauffer" had seen a car in front of Franks' school day of and before kidnapping

"saw two men in it"

reports he saw it day of kidnapping, the 21st


Doherty writes of the two letters threatening Franks family and saying killer committed suicide

	...Whether the ltters were only added indications that subnormal persons are trying mischievously to muddle the strange crime mystery had not been determined last night. The helephone at the home of the distracted and terror-stricken father, Jacob Franks, multi-millionaire and former pawn-broker, had been ringing all day with suggestions, hints of threats, consoltation messges from strangers and "tips," the callers being mostly "bugs " int he opinion of the persons answering.

	...Cheif Collins seemd to take some stock in the authenticity of the letter giving notice of the murderer's impending suicide. A casual inspection, however, indicatd that it had not been written on the same typewriter as had the letter demanding $10,000 ransom for Robert.

	...The other letter suggesting an attempt to intimidate the already bereaved father was taken seriously It was assumed to hav ebeen written for the purpose of halting th eintesive man hunt started Thursday, when Robert's body was found.


goes on to repeat story of woman who called up Ettelson


Doherty reprints threatening letter and says it points to "revenge theory" against elder Frank


pg 2


	Police Deluged with Tips on How to Trap Boy's Slayer

	A deluge of tips in the Franks kidnapping and murder mystery--some ridiculous, some of possible importance--poured into the detective bureau yesterday and last night by telephone. So many came, in fat, taht Liet Ernest Mueller was assigned to do little else except to receive and catalogue them.

	...Then there was a woman on the northwest side who gave the name of a young man, who, she had heard, had bought a portable typewriter recently. This young man, she said, read dime novels and detective storis and once, she had been told, had been arrested for stealing an automobile tire. She was sure his bent ran to kidnapping.

	A travelling man called up from the Hotel L Salle to offer his theories free of charge. No man who would be brutal enough to kill a young boy, he contended, could have written such a letter as that recieved by Chief of Police Collins. Therefore he reccomended somebody was just playing horse with the chief. 




...

May 26, 1924, pg 1

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/26/104038385.html?pageNumber=1

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/26/104038385.pdf
	WREATH FOR VICTIM SENT BY BOY'S SLAYER

	Chicago Florist Describes Purchaser Who Gave Name Signed to Franks Ransom Note.
	
	HUNT FOR HIM FRUITLESS

	Funeral Is Held Under Police Gurad, Which Also Accompanies Body to Cemetery.

	CHICAGO, May 25. — The supposed kidnapper and slayer of Robert Franks, 13 years old, sent a wreath for the funeral of his victim, held today at the millionaire father's residence. 

	"Sympathy of George Johnson" was inscribed on the card attached to the floral piece. ...The wreath was discovered among other flows as the lad's body was about to be taken to the cemetery.


taking a page from Beria

goes on to describe car and build of man who delivered the wreath

NY times writes of interview with flourist who sold wreath and suggests this was the man who wrote the ransom letter


	...Mrs. Franks, who has been frantic with anxiety and grief since her son's disappearance last Wednesday, sat in a dazed quiet throughout the service. She had sat for three hours alone in the room with her son's body.

	The parents and their 17-year-old daughter Josephine were escoted by one of the police guards stationed at the home.




...


May 26, 1924, Chicago Tribune, pg 1

https://www.newspapers.com/image/354882215/


headine 'GIRL VANISHES AS FRANKS DID'

	DISSAPPEARS ON SAME DAY NEAR KIDNAPPING SPOT

	Paths from School Must Have Met.

	BY JAMES DOHERY.

	Accounts of the disappearance of Gertrude Barker, 17 year old student of St. Xavioer's academy, led the police to believe last night she may have been kidnaped jointly with Robert Franks last Wednesday.

	She had been missing since the time Robert, the 14 year old boy killed by his abductors, was last seen alive at Ellis avenue and 49th stret. Her usual course from the school to her home at 4866 Blackstone avenue would have taken her past the kidnaping corner; she left St. Xavier's at 49th and Cottage Grove avenue about 5 p. m. Wenesday--the same time Robert left his school at 4731 Ellis avenue, homeward bound--and from that time the girl has been listed as "missing."

a previous report by doherty mentioned an eyewitness saying a woman was in the back seat of the car seen near Franks' school


https://books.google.com/books?id=kROWe7LFLDQC&pg=PA58&lpg=PA58&dq=Gertrude+Barker+St+Xavier&source=bl&ots=xdC3aND16f&sig=fvL0ueEsjP8fNabL6Nxd7uURAps&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwiRuvLb5YHaAhVKMqwKHbUSCREQ6AEIKTAA#v=onepage&q=Gertrude%20Barker%20St%20Xavier&f=false

	...The girl's relatives believed she may have seen the Franks abduction and had become a victim herself. Newspapers printed a detailed map: "Where the Kidnapping Trails Met?" Miss Barker eventually appeared safe and sound a few days later. She said she became tired of school and wanted an "adventure." Police found her keeping house for the owner of a Kenwood stable on Forty-Ningth Street, where several wealthy men kept their horses.


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354882215/
	...Miss Barker's aunt fears that Gertrude might have been a chance witness to the seizure of Robert, and was therefore taken along by the kidnapers.

	...When the assembled detectives and state's lawyers learned of the injection of the strong possibility that Gertrude was in the clutches of the slayers of Robert there was a hurried change of tactics in an effort to prevent harm to the girl if, as is feared, she has not already suffered such harm.

	There were other circumstances to bear out the belief Gertrude set her foot into the network of the plot, and was taken along to prevent her ever identifying Robert's kidnapers.


maybe she was a witness?

	
	New Drive Under Way.

	So convincing were these circumstances that intensified efforts to apprehend the plotters were launched last night.

	...Saw Woman in Car.

	That verified Irvin Hartman's statement, establishing almost to a certainty that Robert had been whisked away in the Winton car with two men. Later, Mrs. Alfred Anderson, 11248 Parnell avenue, said she had seen an automobile of the same description at 113th and Michigan avenue Wednesday night about 8 p. m.

	"An excited woman" was in the automobile, she said, as well as an excited man and a bundle in the rear that might have been a huddled human form. That gave rise to the theory that perhaps a woman was among the kidnapers.

	Last night that statement had a new significance. The "excited woman" might very probably have been Gertrude Barker.

	William Lucht, 339 East 40th street, ...a voluntary witness last night, said he had seen two human forms on the floor of a Winton automobile that was passing a street car on which he was a passenger Wednesday night at Cottage Grove and 67th street. He thought both were male, but it was believed likely he couldn't distinguish whether one was Miss Barker, the other RObert Franks.


a witness appears saying he saw two "human forms" in the back of a Winton auto. Doherty offers that one was Barker and the other Franks


	Car Easily REcognized

	The significance of the Winton automobile, nambed by all, police said, is because of the scarcity of machines of that make and their peculiar shape that renders them readily distinguishable to any oe familiar with automobiles.


could the police have investigated who rented a Winton?


	...When it was established that Miss Barker had left her school about 5 p. m. Wednesday and that she would walk east on 49th street past Ellis avenue to her home on Blackstone avenue, the police admitted having grave fears. When they stopped to consider for a few minutes, the regarded the girl's disappearance as quite possibly due to her arrival on the scene when one of the men was in the act of grabbing Robert.

	...Any other theories to account for her disappearance were dropped.


goes on to say Lt grady ordered arrest of man 30-32 years old and giving description as given by the florist W. Laube

Doherty goes on to speculate that the man fitting Laubes description, who bought the wreath, was Franks killer

says theory that killer was a moron and theory that killer was bitter enemy of franks was dropped

last part says 'STILL TRACE SPETACLES' and that either fit woman or a "man with an extremely narrow head"


pg 3

	GIRL, 17, MISSING; FEAR HER VICTIM OF FRANKS PLOT

	Path May Have Crossed That of Dead Boy.

	...Miss Kelly, a graduate nurse, alarmed over the continued absense of the girl, yesterday asked police to redouble their attempts to locate her niece.

	..."Gertrude was always a girl of irreprochable tastes," Mis Kelly said last night. "She had preffered her home and her books to the school friends she had made. She loved to fish and ride, and expected to take up horse-back riding as soon as the weather got warmer and her school closed."

	"I feel sure something untoward has happened to her. She always walked home from school, and would have been on 49th street just about the time that poor little Franks boy was kidnaped. I have talked to the school authorities, and they said she left home shortly before 5 o'clock. Coming over 49th street, she would have been very near Ellis avenue, and I am afraid she saw those terrible kidnapers and they abducted her also, fearing she might tell the police the license number of their automobile."

	...Aside from several schoolmates of the missing girl who remember seeing her start east in 49th street, no witnesses have been found who were able to help the police trace her closer to her home.



...




http://moses.law.umn.edu/darrow/documents/LeopoldAndLoeb.pdf

this has a chronology of events


news may 23 to may 26 1924 summary


Franks night of murdered May 21

according to NY Times report, Franks father got a "strange feeling" his son is in trouble when he doesn't come home the night of the murder and called Senator Ettelson for advice

NY times report says Ettelson and Franks parents got a call 10:30 that evening from kidnappers, Ettelson called telephone company to trace calls

At 2 AM May 22 Ettelson and Franks wen to Detecive Bureau. NY Times says "They decided, however, not to have a police search made then."

Chicago Tribune reported May 23 that Ettelson "told the affair in confidence" to Detective Hughes and Liuet. Schoemaker, whom he knew personally. Tribune reported that Hughes at first intended to keep this secret, in agreement with Ettelson.

body discovered morning May 22, in charge of police	around 10 o'clock that morning

NY Times reports that the police weren't communicating about the kidnapping of Franks, and when they found Franks they assumed he had drowned. Franks body had a large gash on his head, a scar down his back, and discoloration on his face and genitals. He was found nude with a stocking and a pair of glasses nearby.

On may 23 issue NY Times reports a pair of glasses were "stuck grotesquely on the boy's face" "apparently by the kidnappers in an effort to make identification harder"

Chicago Tribune in May 23 issue reports that by 3 am the 22nd or 23rd police were questioning Franks' teachers and searching their rooms. Chicago Tribune reported their names and said the police "hoped to obtain clews"

Chicago Tribune reported May 23 that two coroners Benson and Springer examined the body, but "neither ... could assign a cause for death." According to https://kcjohnson.files.wordpress.com/2012/12/larson-article.pdf
, a coronor found Franks rectum was dilated, which was noted in the final report, but spoke publicly that the body was neither mutilated nor molested. The police initially suspected pedophilia and questioned Franks' teachers.

same article reported Franks was found half-way in a culvert, head first, with a stocking floating in the swamp and a pair of glasses on the bank. Reported "apparently had been tossed into the water and floated into" the culvert. Leopold would later tell the police he shoved Franks into the culvert as far as he could, apparently with some effort. The coronor also found that the scratches on Franks' body were likely from being shoved into the culvert.

The tribune reported that the police visited "instructor wilson," but he wasn't home. A Tribune reporter interviewed him shortly afterward, then the police after that. The tribune reported that Wilson once took Franks out too late and "knows no young women". Around this time, the Tribune would report that the police interrogated many of Franks' teachers.


On may 24, NY Times reported that Franks death was probably accidental. A page 14 article says police "should not 'keep faith' with child stealers." A page 1 article said that "after a day in which neither motive nor positive clues were established," Coronor Wolff developed "the latest acceptable theory" that Franks was killed accidentally by kidnappers seeking ransom money. Wolff's theory was that Franks caused his own death by struggling in the car, or died from suffocation. Wolff says Franks clothes were removed to guard against identification.

In the same report, NY times says "that the boy was not the victim of any mistreatment by a degenerate was also established," apparently citing the thorough investigation of Franks teachers to bolster this point.

The same report says the caller to the druggist was judged young, the letter was by a "well educated person," the ransom demand mimicked a detective story, the eyeglasses were too small for a man. All of these pointed to Leopold and Loeb as the killers.

The Chicago Tribune on May 24 reported similarly: "Random motive in franks case: cheif hughes." The Tribune said some police "seek perverts" in a section on "varied theories of death." The article favored strongly the ransom theory, but mentioned other theories include revenge and hazing. The Tribune also pointed out the glasses wouldn't fit a man, reporting theory that they belonged to a woman.


On May 25th, the NY Times front page reported two letters sent to the Franks--one threatening their daughter and one claiming to be from the murdurer and saying he was suicidal. NY Times mentions Ettelson was there when letter recieved, and that shortly before the letter, a woman called Ettelson saying she suspected her ex of the murder.

The letter said "I'm verry sorry," signed "A SORRY MAN." NY times reported Cheif Collins and Crowe took over the investigation around this time, and reported that Collins thought the "sorry"/"I will soon be dead" letter was typed on the same typewriter as the earlier ransom note. NY times followed this with a paragraph saying the body of a man was recovered that same day.

The report continued that a woman was being sought by police for information, then cited an eyewitness saying she say a woman and a man arguing in a car and the previous report that the glasses would fit a woman. The report said more intstructors were being questioned. Previously it was said that the investigations of the instructors were thorough and proved their innocence. The  said "all authorities apparently agreed" on the ransom motive and that a bomb may be thrown at the Franks' house. The report ended alluding to a statement that Mr. Franks was ready to spend 1 million dollars "to bring the slayers of his son to justice."

The same day, the Chicago Tribune reported on the letters, but said they might be from "subnormal persons" trying to mess with the investigation. The NY Times report on the same emphasized the danger to the Franks. The Tribune said a "Chauffer" had seen a car in front of Franks' school the day of the kidnapping. Later, it was revealed Leopold's chauffer had seen them cleaning blood stains from the car, to which they gave the excuse that they were cleaning wine stains. This Chauffer (Sven Englud) would later be important to the case.

The Chicago Tribune reported that Collins had inspected the letter, but differed from the NY Times, saying "a casual inspection" showed it was not written on the same typewriter as the ransom letter. The Tribune (Doherty) in the same report said the threatening letter pointed to the "revenge theory" against elder Frank.

A page 2 story on the Tribune was on a "deluge of tips" on the murder, some "ridiculous," including one that a young boy who read detective stories might be the murderer.


On May 26, the NY Times reported that a wreath had been sent to Franks' funeral signed "Mr Johnson," a name the kidnappers used. The report leaned heavily on the theory the man who bought the wreath was the killer, relying on a testimony of a flourist

The Chicago Tribune reported that day that 17 year old Gertrude Barker might have been taken by the kidnapers. Dohert and another report emphasized that the timing and path she takes back from school would have put her at the time and place when Frank got into the kidnapers car and that the kidnapers motive was to stop her from telling the police. Later, it would be found that Barker was alive and well. The report emphasized the danger to Barker and that police took this seriously. Multiple witnesses now came forward saying they saw a woman in the back of the kidnapers car.

Doherty's report continued that Lt Grady ordered a search and arrest of a man fitting the description given by the flourist. Dohert speculates this is the killer. The last part of Doherty's report was entitled "still trace spectacles"

A page 3 report cited Barker's aunt saying "I am afraid she saw those terrible kidnapers and they abducted her also, fearing she might tell the police the license number of their automobile." The report pointed out there were no witnesses to Gertrude's dissaperance. 


...

May 27, 1924, pg 23

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/27/119039296.html?pageNumber=23

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/27/119039296.pdf
	PURSUE FUGITIVE AS SLAYER OF BOY

	Fitting Description of Supposed Kidnapper of Franks, He Eludes Chicago Police.
	
	SOUGHT REFUGE IN HOTEL

	Like Man Who Ordered Wreath Sent for Murdered Lad's Funeral

	MISSING GIRL UNTRACED

	Fate of Student Who May Have Seen Kidnapping Now Linked With Crime.

	CHICAGO, May 26. — Detectives hunting the kidnappers and slayers of Robert Franks were searching tonight for a man who answers in nearly every detail the hypothetical description of one of the criminals, built up by the police from various fragments of evidence. 

	For a time today it was thought that the man sought was surrounded in an apartment hotel building on the south side, where he applied for a room. Squads of detectives were rushed to the building and made a thorough search, but the man eluded them.


if this is Charles Heath doesn't match up with the 2015 report (said he was in a hotel in Kentucky)

	
	The suspected person, slim, exceedingly nervous, about 5 feet 9 inches tall and weighting 140 or 145 pounds, aroused the suspicion of the apartment hotel clerk when he applied for a room. The clerk said he appeared about 35 years old and wore tortoise shell spectacles.


goes on about detectives searching building, spectacles "fitting man with a thin face or by a woman"


	...THe description of the fugitive also fits that of the operator of a gray automobile whom a chauffeuer said he saw driving slowly over the route taken by the Franks boy to and from school two afternooons previous to his disappearance.


NY times reports apparently that the same chauffeur who saw the car near Franks dissapearance says the man in question fits his description, although no description was provided before until the flourist gave one.

goes on to describe search for same type of auto, a search for people with same glasses, and a search for degenerates


says belief that Gertrude Barker was kidnapped "to prevent her from revealing the crime" "gained ground today"


	...This angle of what is still an unsolved mystery caused the temporary detention tonight of a man and two women close to one of the instructors at the Harvard Schoo, which Franks attended. The police were told that an automobile had been seen about two miles from wehre Franks's body was found, at midnight Wednesday, and that two women were in it, one holding a shovel.

	As Franks was not buried but placed in a drain pipe under the Pensylvania Railroad, it was assumed that the shovel was not for digging his grave. The possibility was considered that the shovel might have been for preparing a place to secrete the bdy of Miss Barker if she had seen the kidnappers dragging Robert into the automobile and they had decided to make away with her for fear she would later recognize them.

	Twenty detectives were digging today in various places in the swampy land surrounding the spot where the boy's body was rocovered. All wer esilent when asked if the real purpose of the digging was a search for Miss Barker's body.


a witness now tells the police they saw a car near Franks body with a man, two women, one holding a shove. NY Times suggests this was for a grave for Barker "if she had seen the kidnappers" take Frank, and incinuates that detectives were digging to find Barker's body.

goes on to say Willson and another, Mitchell were still in police custudy, and that Wilson had been whipped with a rubber hose to make him confess. A judge refused to agree on a habeas corpus hearing.


	...Early today three men riding in an automobile answering the description of a machine said to have loitered near the Harvard School were seized at Summit, Ill., and brought here for examination. THey gave a good account of themselves, but will be examined again.

	A story that he had assisted two other men yesterday to lock in a New York Central box car a girl in a blue dress whom he recognized from newspaper pictures today as the Barker girl, was volunteered to the police by Geroge Stray, a farmhand. His story was being investigated by detectives who placed little or no credence in it.


police siezed three men who were in a car near Franks' school. One told police he helped lock up Barker. NY times said police "placed little or no credence in it." The Chicago Tribune had previously published a picture of Barker.


	The police learned today that a telephone call from a man giving the name of "Bryce" was recieved at the home of the girl's aunt twenty-four hours after her disappearance, asking if relatives were looking for her. THe caller declared he knew where she was at the time and then disconnected. In the girl's notebook was found the name of "Josephine Bryce."


someone called Barker's aunt saying he knew where she was 24 hours after Franks dissappearance. NY times says the police learned this today.


	The Chicago Tribune will make the following announcement in tomorrow's paper:

	"The Tribune offers a reward of $5,00 for the exclusive information resulting in the arrest and conviction of the perpetrator of the kidnapping and slaying of the Franks boy."

	"We furthermore guarantee not to use or publish knowingly any clues or tips, te publicity of which would impede the police and other authorties in their efforts to cearl up this unprecedented crime."


NY Times says tomorow the Chicago Tribune will announce that the won't publish any more "tips" that will "impede the investigation"



...


May 27, pg 1, Chicago Tribune

https://www.newspapers.com/image/354882535/?terms=Franks

"we furthermore gurantee not to use or publish knowingly any clews or tips"

they published it like NY Times said

another article pg 1:


	BARKER GIRL IS DISCOVERED; NOT KIDNAPED

	Police ORder Sewer Investigated

	...Detectives spent half the night in a fruitless search for the slain boy's clothes in the vicinity of the 105th street and the Panhandle tracks on a top supplied by two men who saw two women standing beside a darkened Dodge car cleaning off a spade the night of the kidnaping.


Chicago Tribune says they were looking for boy's clothes, NY times made it sound like they were looking for Barker's body

goes on to say polie ordered to dig up a sewer near Mitchell's home to look for evidence

also searching "old ice house" were someone named Eckstein said he saw car

says a curios "party of motorists" found a peice of sheeting with a note on it signed by "George Johnson" near the culvert


	...Gertrude Barker, thought for a time to have been the victim of kidnapers, was discovered at the end of a "romantic adventure."


Barker found this day


	...Swamped by "Tips."


says swamped by tips about the winton car, held two cars


	...Detectives were drive nearly frantic with the other "tips" coming into police headquarters. Because of one such tip they surrounded the Tyson apartments, Grand boulevard and 43d street, and searched every room seeking the mysterious "Mr. Johnson," the man who in letters and phone calls admitted being the murderer of Franks.


The Tribune reports this as a spurious tip, while the NY times reported this as "the man eluded them" and took the tip more seriously


goes on to say a cap driver "William Perry" was hired by "two well dressed men" to stake out Franks' home ahead of the murder. Says one 24 and the other 22.


	...Missing GIRL FOUND

	Gertrude Barker, 17 years old, 4848 Blackstone avenue, a student at St Xavier's academy, who disappeared last Wednesday afternoon and who, it was feared, had been kidnaped, was found last night. The police had been searching for her since Sunday night when they were notified by her aunt, Miss Gertrude Kelley, with whom she lived, that the girl had vanished after leaving school on the same day that Robert Franks was kidnaped.

	The girl was found keeping house for Bert H. Jeffery, keeper of a stable at 1030 East 49th street, where several wealthy men keep their riding horses. Over the stable is a seven room apartment. It was here the girl had taken up the duties of sweeping and cooking in preference to her school work at St. Xavier's.

	Seeker After Adventure.

	Miss Barker gave as her reason for leaving the home of her aunt that she was tired of school work and wanted some "adventure." She said that in her home in Yakima, Wash., she had had the freedom of the great outdoors and couldn't stand the cramped quarters of the schoolroom.

	During the day many false reports concerning the girl had come to the police. One was made by George Steight, a farm hand, who said he had been paid a $1 for aiding a man to close a freigh car door in which there was a woman. He identified a picture of Miss Barker as that of the woman he saw in the boxcar.


Chicago Tribune reports that Barker went on an adventure to sweep rooms above a stable, and that it was a "false report" that she had been locked in a boxcar.



pg 2 story:

	Franks Crime Motive Is Ransom Solely; Detective Sutherland Asserts After Survey


	...After a painstaking review of known facts and a careful inspection of the entire vicinity of the crime yesterday William J. Sutherland, nationally known detective, who has been instrumental in running to earth many criminals, gave it as his opinion that Robert Franks was the victim of kidnapers operating solely for gain.

	"Of course the moron angle must not be entirely overlooked," said Mr. Sutherland, "In fact, I was considerable 'sold' to that possible solution myself until I came out here and looked the ground over. But the lay of the land, and other pertinent circumstances, lead me to believe this lad died fighting the efforts of a cold blooded gang to extort what they could from his wealthy father."


goes on to describe two eyewitness and accounts of Winton car driving around the area before the murder

Sullivan describes theory that the kidnapers staked out the boarding house near the culvert as the "ideal hiding place" for Franks while negotiating with Franks parents, and the culvert is hiding place for body if necessary.

Says kidnappers might have picked up a woman "planted" somehwere on the way to boarding house

Sullivan says Franks was probably suffocated at the boarding house then dragged to culvert.

Theorizes that a "member of the gang" didn't know Franks was dead, and this is why he calld Franks parents and asked them to take a taxi. Says the kidnappers were paniced when they realized Franks was dead, and this is why one dropped his clothes. "It was bt the work of amoment" to strip off the clothes "in an effort to conceal the victim's identity."



...


May 28, 1924, pg 1

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/28/104252146.html?pageNumber=1
	SEEK 3 MEN, A WOMAN AS FRANKS SLAYERS

	Chicago Police Get Story of Switchman Who Saw Four With a Bundle.

	PARKED CAR NEAR SWAMP

	Party Seemed Anxious to Escape Observation--Reward for Kidnappers now $16,000

	CHICAGO, May 27. — Continuance of the search for the kidnappers and slayers of Robert Franks today centred on a search for three men and a woman who drove a dark-colored sedan into the lonely Wolf Lake Forest Preserve on the night of the boy's death and were seen to deposit a bulky package near the railroad culvert where his body was found. 


says state attorney crowe got this tip for a switchman in Indiana


	"...Three men and one woman jumped out. ONe of the men was carrying a bundle under his arm. At the time I thought it must be a tent. The four disappeared in the woods. I na few moments they reappeared--this time without the bundle.


saws he helped them out from being stuck in the mud, the seemed in a hurry to leave, and they gave him $5. Says "I am confident now the four were the slayers and that the bundle contained the boy's clothes."

NY times says Mitchell and Wilson still in detention and "certain statements attributed to Mitchell and said to have been verified by another instructor have resulted in their detention."

	
	...Earlier in the day Samuel A. Ettelson, former State Senator, friend and adviser of the Franks family, was publicly quoted as saying:

	"ONe instructor at the Harvard School killed Robert Franks. Another wrote the polished letter demanding $10,000 from the family."

	Mr. Ettelson denied making the statement, although he appeared with the State's Attorney's forces in Judge de Young's Court at the hearing of the habbeas corups writ and admitted he was interested in seeing that the movements of Mitchell and Wilson on the night of the crime were checked.

	Mr. Ettelson, the article stated, had declared his intention of appearing as the "friend of the Court" and demanding that Judge De Young refuse the writ.

	"I shall say, 'your honor, you wouldn't let a man who has admitted he is a moron go free when such an atrocious crime has been committed,'" ran the quotation. "The instructor who wrote the letter was a cultured man--a man who committed the actual crime is a man who needed money and who had a mercenary motive."


NY times putting words in Ettelson's mouth? not sure what's going on here but apparently they wanted the instructors blamed and Ettelson to go along with it.


	Discovery was made that a semi-anual interest payment on a $10,000 mortage on the Mithcell home was due on the day of the kidnaping. The records show that Mitchell and his wife jointly gave a promissory note for the amount in September, 1922. Some of the theorists recalled the coincidence that the ransom demanded of Franks's father was $10,000.


points to profit motive of Mitchell due to him having a mortgage payment due day of kidnapping.

goes on to say man matching flourists description was arrested "while driving a gray automobile." Says gray car was seen near Harvard School before kidnaping. real name is "Adolph Papritz."

Papritz denied knowing about the kidnapping and said he was motoring with a young woman that afternoon

next p says Mitchell's sewer drained in search for clothes, giving imrpession zeroing in on Mitchell

mentions finding Barker in one paragraph. Said Bert H. Jeffery, the stable keeper there, "was held"



book summarizing some of the "dead ends" police followed: https://books.google.com/books?id=MDR7qQbEnRoC&pg=PA61&lpg=PA61&dq=%22Adolph+Papritz%22&source=bl&ots=o87mmTPs9w&sig=7U8rAl5hrKKvbqcUWkau_mtEeI0&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjRlrLX24PaAhUp5oMKHXJCC2AQ6AEIQzAF#v=onepage&q=%22Adolph%20Papritz%22&f=false


...


May 28, Chicago Tribune, pg 1

https://www.newspapers.com/image/354882962/?terms=Franks


headline "Raid Dope Rings for Franks' Slayers"

article

	SEE WORK OF DRUGGED MIND IN KIDNAPING

	Two Taken at North Side Hotel


	Evidence that cocaine addicts, at the behest of a well-informd "master-mind" slew young Robert Franks, has been in the hands of the police for several days, it became known last night.

	This developed when it leaked out that State's Attorney Crowe and Chief Collins, acting in cooperation, have ordered a general search for dope fiends, expecting that through a process of elimination to single out those who acted in the murder conspiracy.


Tribune reports police had evidence for several days that cocaine addicts killed Franks, and that Crowe and Collins ordered rounudp of dope fiends


	...Explains His Theory.

	State's Attorney Crowe reluctantly outlined the plan through whic it now is expected to round up the slayers of young Franks.

	"It is apparent from the investigations thus far," said the state's attorney, "that the killing of the Franks boy was not accomplished by professional criminals. The professional criminal would not take such chances. He would not kill a boy and then undertake all the foolish risks of sending letters, making telephone calls, and sending taxicab chaufeurs on wild goose chases. If a professional had killed young Franks he would have disposed of the body and fled. He would not have spent his time in contriving fanciful hoaxes.


Crowe says must be a dope fiend because a professional wouldn't risk himself sending letters, making calls, sending a cab

what happened to Sullivan's theory?


	Drops Pervert Theory.

	"It is not to be considered tenable that the boy's attackers were perverts. They wouldn ot have bothered about sending letters and chauffeurs to complicate the matter. I have discussed this phase with eminent psychiatriats and they tell me that this type of crime is most likely to have been committed by amateurs in great need of money."


Crowe says "not tenable" that pervers did it, since they wouldn't have bothered with the letters and cabs, and "eiminent psychiatriats" said usually this type of crime committed by amatuers who need money


	"We shall, by a process of elimination, try to find some one user of drugs who was sufficiently well aquianted with the habits and movements of the Franks family to have contrived a kidnaping plot. That some one would not have attempted the crime himself. He would have enngaged some on else to do it for him. The killing was an accident, and everything that followed was undertaken to cover the accident. Dope will be found at the bottom of it all."


Crowe asserts that "dope will be found at the bottom of it all."


	SEIZE TWO YOUTHS

	Police inquiry into the Franks murder case was suddenly diverted into an entirely new channel last night with the arrest of two young men at the Sheridan Plaza hotel, on Sheridan road.


two arrested were De Witt White 23 and Edward Wellington 38. "Both admitted recent bootleggin activites in Chicago."


	...Quiz More Witnesses

	...Act Today on Teachers


goes over mortage thing with Mitchel and purported statement by Ettelson on teachers

	...Ettelson heatedly denied making the statement.


pg 2

	
	Harvard School Not Hurt by Franks Case, Principal Says


has some quotes in support of Mitchell


another article:


	...EVEN DOGS BARK AT GRAY CARS


implies everyone driving a gray Winton being stopped and questioned for murder, with some humorous quotes, including one by the "first man to go insane trying to solve the Franks case"



...


May 29, 1924 pg 16

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/29/104038814.html?pageNumber=16

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/29/104038814.pdf
	FREED IN FRANKS CASE.

	Two Instructors Fail to Give Chicago Police Clues.

	CHICAGO, May 28. — Admissions were made tonight by the police and State prosecutors that the kidnapping and murder of Robert Franks is still a mystery to them and that there is not a definite "lead" for them to follow. Whatever expectations they had of connecting Walter Wilson and Mott K. Mitchell, instructors at the Harvard School, with the crime were shattered when both were released on a writ of habeas corpus today. 


NY times says teachers freed and they failed to give "clues"


Wilson held seven days and Mitchell three

on delay of habeaus corpus:

	
	...One of the reasons which led the State to ask for delay was a desire to have a gardener see Mrs. George D. Chase, Wilson's landlady. Robert Orr, gardner for Harold Swift, had told of seeing a woman who was "visibly pertured" searching about the shrubbery near the Harvard School about the time of Franks's disappearance. Mr.s Chase denied being near the Harvard School on that date.

	...The police began a round-up of drug addicts today folowing information that the kidnappers were users of narcotics.



...


May 29, 1924, pg 1 Chicago Tribune


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354883425/?terms=Franks


	Jail Policeman in Franks Quiz; Tutors Freed

	"SLAYER KNOWS ME," DECLARES FATHER OF BOY

	Gives First Story of His Theories.

	DEVELOPMENTS

	1. Thomas Gilfoyl, a former policeman, is being held incommunicado in the detective bureau for questioning. He has made no statement and Chief of Detectives Hughes has refused to say what connection Gilfoyle is supposed to have had with the mystery.

	2. Mott K. Mitchell and Walter E. Wilson, Harvard school instructors, are released on writs after bieng held for days on suspicion in connection with the slaying of young Franks.

	3. Jaco Franks gives out first statement at length on his views of the kidnaping and murder of his son. He declares the slaying is as mysterious now as when it was first discovered.

	4. Cheif of detectives requests the arrest of two men and a woman in a sedan "somewher ein Missouri." This followed a lengthy telegram describing the motor party supposd to have been seen in the vicinity of the death culvert.

	5. A crowd of moron suspects and dope addicts are jailed at the close of a day of raids conducted in the hope of getting evidence to support the dope-murder theory.


	...THE FATHER'S THEORY

	BY JOHN HERRICK


opens with some peotry about grey ghosts whispering in Jacob Franks ear

	
	...While he waits he tortures his memory for faces and names, the faces and names of murderers.

	"They are persons Robert knew. They are persons I know," he says. "I have been racking my brains trying to think who they could be."

	...He has not the solace of activity. He must stand aside and wait, and grope for that name, while the man hunt goes on. 


	..."And since Robert knew them, I must know them. Whoever it was who kidnaped my boy, did so for the ransom. It was the money they were after. They knew his habits. They knew my love for him, and that I would willingly pay any sum to have him back. But Robert recognized them, and they grew afriad, and strangled him."

	Again, there was no tremulousness as he lit a cigaret and puffed at it until it glowed. But the fingers of the hands folded in his lap stirred restlessly when he came upon the word "baby."


funny, wasn't Leopold known as "Babe"?


	...Always Considered as "Baby."

	Robert was always "baby" to his father and mother...


pg 3


	EX-COP SEIZED; SECRET INQUIRY IN FRANKS CASE

	Teachers Freed WhenNo Charge Is Made.

	Thomas Glifoyle, a discharged policeman, developed as a mysterious entry in the mazes of the Robert Franks kidnaping murder case when it became known late last night that for the last twenty four hours he had been held in detecive burea cell.

	Until recently Gillfoyle had served in the office of Sil Mayer, secretary of the police department. He was summarily dismissed following investigation of charges made by a young woman.

	Word was sent out for Gilfoyle's arrest on Turesday, and since then he has been held incomunicado as part of his pregrilling "treatment."

	Won't Discuss HIs Case.

	How he is connected with the investigatino of the Franks murder, State's attorney Crowe and Chief of Detective Hughes refused to state. That will develop in good time, they intimated mysteriously.


former cop Gilfoyle arrested, Crowe and Hughes mysterious about why

Gilfoyle had apparently done something untoward to a young woman and was fired before

goes on to say a Mr.s Bemon reported that she had been beaten by someone matching description of Johnson, and police were investigating

writes that the theory that it must have been a dope fiend was "taking firmer hold"

says a former instructor who was dismissed "after several pupils accused him" was being "particularly sought." "That man wrote letters to a boy." (1924 Anthony Weiner?)

reported on story about gardner seeing Mrs. Chase looking around bushes from NY times before. Reports Chase says she was chasing a cat named Wilson.


another pg 3 story:

	Try to See Franks Slayer Through His Sepctacles

	When all their theories, inquisitions and hunts after slayers had ended either in circles or landed them in blind alleys, the police last night came back to their only clew to the murder of Robert Franks--the zylonite, toric spectacles dropped on the dreary railroad embankment fifteen feet from the culvert into which the body was stuffed.

	This seemingly slender clew took MICHEAL HUGHES on a new importance. Cheif of Detectives Michael Hughes and his men this morning will turn their entire attention to it in an effort to accomplish the almost impossible task of tracing their ownership.

	The chief of detectives believes the solution of the baffling mystery lies in the ownership of the eyeglasses.

	"I am convinced," he said, "that if we can find the owner of those spectacles we will have the case cleared up in a few hours."


poitns out all of the theroies and hunts had ended in dead ends, and that Hughes came back to the spectacles, believes now that this is the solution


	At the same time he pointed out the difficulty of this task in that the spectacles are not unusual, but a common prescription such as might have been purchased from any of a hundred opticians without the taking of any very definite or direct records as to the identity of the purchaser.


The glasses ended up being the official story of what led them to Leopold. iirc it was said only three people in Chicago purshaed a similar pair.


article goes on to say however owned the glasses must have been a non-physical laboring and intellectual person


if they could trace the owner of the glasses, why did the round up every single, pervert, teacher, drug fiend, and driver of a gray Winton in Chicago before then?


...


Friday, May 30, 1924 pg 14



https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/30/issue.html
	TOPICS OF THE TIMES.

	Baffled as Yet Completely

	It is too soon to conclude that the Chicago police are going to fail to discover the murderer or murderers of the little FRANKS boy, but it is a fact that in a whole week they have accomplished nothing except to bring suspicion of the most terrible sort on persons against whom they can have no real evidence And yet, in the beginning, the case did not look particularly difficult.


NY Times suggests they might fail to discover the murderer.

Points out all they did this week is raise suspicion of people they don't have real evidence on yet, even though case didn't look difficult


	The detectives were able to get to work on it only a few hours after the boy was killed. Their search was confined within a narrow area, and clues apparently valuable were numerous. The letter demanding ransom was peculiar enough, both as a speciimen of type-writing and as indicative of the author's education status, to promise help. There were telephone messages, too, that gave hints along the same line as the letter.


Also had glasses, them being too small for a man, druggist saying caller young, letter being plagarized from a detective story, and rental of a gray Winston that was never reported looked at in press if it was ever looked at.

actually they didn't rent a gray Winton, they rented a blue Willys-Knight... why were there so many eyewitness accounts of two men and "human forms" in the back of a gray Winton?


	...Sending the wreath looks more like the act of somebody whose mind had been unbalanced by brooding over the mystery than like anything the murder would do on any theory of his mental quality, and probably it can be dismissed as irrelevant.


NY times now decides the wreath guy can be dismissed


	...Considering the father's wealth, the ransom asked, $10,000, was small. The theory that blackmail was a mere afterthought and subterfuge, to distract attention from other impulses, has some plausibility, for this very reason, but it is a possibility rather than a probability.
		

now says possible the blackmail was to distract from "other impulses", but a "possibility" not a "probability"

NY Times goes on to say NY police better than chicago police, Chicago police "have not enhacned their reputations"

compares case to Staten Island case of "Mrs. Bauer"


	...In Richmond County, however, accepting the jury's verdict as correct, the pursuit, after a little casting about, led straight to the man HOFFMAN, the piling up of evidence agasint him was intelligent and the decision against him seeon became almost inevitable.

	...Dislike of capital punishment may have had something to do with the nature of the verdict reached, and still more the Judge's charge to consider the prisoner's conduct both as to its compatibility with guilt and its incompatilibty with innocence. It is almost impossible to believe that an innocent man so soon would begin to guard against the suspicion which he expected to fall on him and still harder to believe that an innocent man would not have, ready-made, a better alibi than Hoffman was able to invent.

	Staten Island has a right to feel pride in its administration of justice, as illustrated in this case--in the skill of its police, the efficienecy of its District Attorney, the impartiality of its Judge and the commons sense of its jurors.


Not the first time they covered up a "noble" murder/rape and tried to blame it on a "slave"?


...

May 30, 1924, Chicago Tribune pg 1


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354883812/?terms=franks

headline "FRANKS CASE NEAR SOLUTION"

	MILLIONAIRE'S SON ON GRILL; GLASSES AGREE

	Nathan Leopold Jr. New Suspect.

	Nathan Leopold Jr., 4754 Greenwood avenue, 19 year old student marvel, son of a millionaire, and conencted with some of the wealthiest families in Chicago, was held this morning in the office of State's Attorney Robert E. Crowe, where he was being questioned about the murder and kidnapping of a 13 year old Robert Franks.

	Leopold had been taken to the criminal court building shortly after 1 o'clock after he had been charged with the ownership of the eye glasses which were found on the prairie at 121st street and the Pennsylvania tracks near the culvert in which the body of young Franks was discovered last Thursday.

	Had Been at Death Culvert.

	Leopold admitted the ownership of a similar pair of glasses; that a few days earlier he had been at the spot where Franks' body was found; that he had lost his glasses.

	Further questioning had elcited the admission that he was the owner of a typewriter thought to be similar to the one which the letter demanding a ransom of $10,000 for the return of the kidnapped Franks boy had been written. The officials questioning him had sent for this typewriter, while they continued their interrogation into the early hours in the morning.


leaves it open if he were the murderer so far, could have let him argue he simply lost his glasses, but the typewriter thing makes it sound like they'd already made up their mind

	
	Seven Others Arrested.

	Meantime four other arrests had been made in Chicago and three in Indianapolis as the result of the following up of the story that the kidnapers had used a gray WInton car in carrying out their crime. These arrests, while important, where somehwat dwarfed in significance by the developments in the state's attorney's office.


arrests were still going on anyway, but Chicago Tribune says Leopold arrest more important


	An earlier theory that CHarles Heath, a Chicago druggist, who is apparently dying from poison in a Lousville hospital, held the solution of the mystery had practically been abandoned. Heath's condition is believed to be indirectly due, however, to worry over the fact that he was suspected of knowing something about the Franks case and had been placed under surveillance by the Chicago police.


did they mention Heath before? should check

report now that he was a suspect but this theory abandoned, say he is dying of poison, condition "indirectly due" to worry over being suspect 


	Trace Glasses to Leopold.

	The clew which led to young Leopold being questioned came, as predicted, from tracing the sale of the eye glasses which were found near the body. Almer Coe & Co. had discovered earlier in the week that they were the maker of the glasses. They seared their records and found that a pair of such a prescription had been sold to young Leopold; that the discovered glasses tallied exactly with those they sold to Leopold.


reports earlier in week company that made glasses found out they made them. The "searched their records" and found out a pair was sold to Leopold

	
	...Richard Loeb, son of the late vice president of Sears, Roebck & Co., who was a companion of young Leopold, was also taken to the state's attorney's office, although suspicion was in no way directed against him.


mentions Loeb in questioning but says not under suspicion


	Crowe Conducts Quiz.

	When the boys arrived there State's Attorney Crowe himself began their examination.

	"Have you ever been in the vicinity of the place where young Franks' body was found?" was his first question.

	Leopold did not hesitate.

	"Yes, I have been there fifty times," he said.

	Then he explained.

	"You see, I am interested in ornithology. I frequently go there with classes and with companions."

	Thinks Glasses Are at Home.

	The state's attorney flashed before his eyes the spectacles with the horn rims which have played so important a part in the mystery.

	"Are these your glasses?" He asked. "I don't think so, was the answer. I think mine are at home."

	There was a pause in the inquiry.

	Again detectives visited the Leopold home and searced the premises. They could find no trace of the glasses which young Leopold believed were there, but they did find a case with the name of Almer Coe & Co. printed on the lid.

	With their return and report the questioning turned upon whether it was possible that young Leopold had lost his glasses near the death culvert He admitted that he might have done so.

	"I told you I had been there frequently," he said. "I believe I was there either the Friday or the Saturday just before the murder. I might have dropped them on that occasion."

	Leopold said that young Loeb had sometimes accompanied him on excursions to the vicinity of the culvert, and this was corroborated by young Loeb.


Leopold gave different account on first questioning


	...Then the interrogatory turned to other phases of the Franks case. Leopold was shown the letter in which $10,000 had been demanded of Jacob Franks for the return of his son unharmed.

	"This letter was written by an educated man," said Mr. Crowe. "Do you think that you could have written such a letter?"

	Could Write a Better Letter.

	"Yes, I could easily duplicate it, if I couldn't write a better one," he said. "There is one mistake in the letter. The word kidnaping is spelled kidnapping. I noticed it at the time." Then he admitted owning and operating a typewriter.

	"I've written many articles on birds and nature," he explained.


	...Once Harvard School Student.

	He said he had been a student of the Harvard school, the one attended by young Franks, before going to the university.

	The question drited into a channel which he appeared to find welcome. It was that of perversion.

	"Yes, I have made a study of perversion, although I have never practiced any forms of it," he admitted. "I was a deep student of the writings of an Italian who made a study of perversion and wrote about it during the sixteenth century. At one time I thought of making a free translation of the writings of this author, who created thrity-two different forms of perversion.

	"I was dissuaded by one of the professors of the University of Chicago, who told me such a translation would be too sordid a thing to distribute among my friends, as I had intended to do. I finally gave up the idea, but I don't think he was altogether right. There may have been the sordid side to his writings, but there were some beautiful sides to the work of the old Italian."


Chicago Tribune hanging him up for target practice

get impression author doesn't like him and doesn't want him to get away with it, letting Leopold incriminate himself and putting it in the paper


who was this Renassiance Italian who did a "study of perversion?"

Florence was famous for sodomy of young boys around that time: http://articles.latimes.com/1997/nov/02/books/bk-49205/2

the sodomites would get persecuted (?) by the Catholic church, cut off their testicles and penis https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/LGBT_history#Florentine_homosexuality

guessing whatever happened then, justice or not, would fit in with Neitzche whiny narrative of "the christians are holding me back from doing what I want"

In Germany "florentine" became byword for "sodomite," with sodomy referring specifically to the rape of young boys as was done in ancient greece


http://articles.latimes.com/1997/nov/02/books/bk-49205/2
	"In a letter in 1523 to Niccolo Machiavelli," Rocke writes, "Francesco Vettori [Florence's ambassador to the Papal Court], responded to his friend's concerns about his own son Lodovico's intimacy with a younger boy. Vettori recommended indulgence, and recalled their own youthful experience: 'Since we are verging on old age, we might be severe and overly scrupulous, and we do not remember what we did as adolescents. So Lodovico has a boy with him, with whom he amuses himself, jests, takes walks, growls in his ear, goes to bed together. What then? Even in these things perhaps there is nothing bad.' "



judging by LA times article and what is written of culture in Italy around that time, whatever Leopold read on study of "perversion" then probably didn't give him very good guidance...


same article continued:


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354883823/

	Declares He is an Atheist.

	Leopold then declard that he was an atheist and discussed atheism at some length.

	He was brought back to the Franks case. He denied knowing young Franks, but said he was acquainted with the family by reputation. Young Loeb, who was present during all the questioning said he knew the murdered boy personally and had often played tennis with  him. Young Loeb is taking a history course at the University of Chicago.

	During the course of his somewhat desultyory examination young Leopold only once offered anything that savored of a defense.

	He said that Wednesday afternoon that young Franks disappeared he and another boy, whom he did not name, had gone to Lincoln park.

	"I wwne to study the birds," he said. "After we left Lincoln park we went to the Coconut Grove at 53rd street and Eillis avenue. Then we got a bottle of gin and went riding in Washington park. We picked up a couple of girls and we wook them riding with us, but they were of the kind that go home with t heir boots muddy and we made them do it."

	He said he had arrived home the evening the Franks boy disappeared at about 11 o'clock.


lied and gave alibi, but sounds like Chicago Tribune didn't buy it


goes on to describe police raid of 4 people in connection to the gray Winton, concurrent to this

doesn't write about them in any way that makes them sound guilty

continues (none were Charles Heath)

	
	...When police searched Heath's home they found several postcards from him to his wife. One of them read: "Tell Rodney not to get caught. There is a job for him here in Lousville." The police believe this refers to Rodney Wolfe.


Rodney Wolfe the husband of one of the 4 people arrested, who himself was arrested in Indianapolis


article following this one:


	HEATH, SUSPECT, MAY DIE

	Louisville, Ky, May 29--[Spcial.]--

	Two Chicago detectives are watching at the beside of Charles F. Heath, who is in the City hospital here, suspected of knowledge of the Franks kidnaping and murder in Chicago. Heath is a druggist and lives at 2351 Harper avenue.

	Apparently he has twice tried to commit suicide, and apparently the cause was worry over the suspiciouns that had been entertained against him by the Chicago police.

	Heath is unconscious from some mysterious cause--apparently an overdose at some drug like veronal.


reading between the lines, the Tribune does not sound happy with this. While not outright accusing the Chicago police of wrongdoing, the pin the blame of his death on Chicago police

this story could easily continue later into a story on Chicago police corruption, maybe something an astute reader would notice at the time


	Late last week he was under surveillance of the police in Chicago because he had attempted suicide and was in Mercy hospital. The police had been instructed to look carefully into the cases of all would-be suicides.

	On Sunday, in a manner as yet unexplained, Heath escaped from the hospital. The next heard of him was in Lousville this morning.



how did he escape?


goes on about how maid discovered him unconscious, surgeon decided he was under influence of drug or poison


	...All day he has been unconscious. A number of clippings of Chicago newspapers were found in the man's pocket. All had to do with the Franks mystery.

	A letter, apparently written by Heath, intimated that he intended to commit suicide.

	"Please notify Mrs. C. F. Heath, 6251 Harper avenue, Chicago," the letter read. "Please give me full Masonic rites. Thell them that I will not be with them any more."

	His Condition Improves

	C. C. Krause, who lives at 2620 Portland street, this city, and who said he was a cousin of Heath, appeared at the hospital tonight.

	"I saw Charles last Tuesday afternoon," said Krause. "He came to my house, said that he had sold his drug store in Chicago, and that he had come here for a job. He was in good spirits. He left me Tuesday night at 10:30 o'clock going to his hotel."

	Late tonight physicians at the city hospital said that they believed Health's chances for recovery were improving, but that his life was still in the balance.


reported quote from Krause that Heath was in good spirits, which goes looks bad for police theory of suicide


	TRACE CHICAGO MOVEMENTS

	Investigation in Chicago revealed that Heath had been under surveillance of Chicago police until last Sunday, when he managed to elude the officers detailed to watch his bedside at Mercy hosptial. He had been taken to the hospital the day before following an alleged first attempt at suicide by swallowing three bichlordie of mercury tables and a quantity of veronal at his home.

	The police surveillance had resulted from an order of Cheif of Police Collins that all suicides and attemptd suicides be closely checked following his receipt of an anonymous letter purportedly from the Franks slayer declaring the writer's intention of killing himself.


"alleged suicide" and "purportedly from the slayer"--article invites reader to be skeptical


	A quick checkup had revealed that on the night of May 21, the date of the kidnaping, Heath had been absent from his home until a late hour and that his movements were not readily traceable.

	This check was still under way under the supervision of Captain of Detectives Schoemaker when the officers were surprised on Sunday to learn that Heath was no longer at Mercy Hospital.


this makes it sound like he could have been guilty then escaped

more interesting--if a "quick checkup," and police watching, how did he escape, and why?

if checkup finished earlier, Heath escape would have been even weirder

Heath escaping means that he would have another opportunity to commit "suicide" supposedly outside of police watch

goes on to report he was fired day of kidnapping and quote his wife saying he "moped around for two  days," got a "place with some whole-sale drug house" then found him in a "stupor" that night with veronal and mercury tablets on a table.

Wife says she believes "policemen hovering over his bedside at Mercy hospital freightened him half to death." Goes on to say it was "too much for him" and he is "simply suffering delusions now."

"delusions" quote might do him a favor if they were deciding whether or not he should die at that point

a 2015 article in ChicagoNow would cite Heath as another victim of the Franks murder case


a pg 1 story:


	HOW EYEGLASSES THROW NEW LIGHT ON FRANKS CASE

	State's Attorney Crowe explaiend early today how the search for the owner of the glasses found near the body of Robert Franks led to Nathan Leopold Jr.

	"Realizing that the glasses constitued the most direct clew to the solution of the mystery, I palced Assistant State's Attorney Joseph Savage in charge of that phase of the investigation," Mr. Crowe said. "I told him to devote every effort toward tracing the ownership of the glasses."

	"He found that the glasses had a special type of hinge, one made by the Bobrow Optical company of Brooklyn, N. Y. Comparatively few glasses sold in Chicago have this type of hinge.

	"Mr. Savage then went to the Almer Coe firm of opticians in Wabash avenues Eleminating all prescriptions for glasses filled with those having hinges other than this type, they began a search for records of glasses corresponding in detail to those found near the culvert.

	"The search of their records showed that the prescription for the mystery lenses fitted glasses sold to young Leopold. Our questioning of him resulted."


Crowe says how they searched records to find owner of the glasses, "realizing" they were "the most direct clew," although he doesn't give a timeline.


...


also from NY Times dated May 30th:

pg 1

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/30/104252547.html?pageNumber=1


	LOUSISVILLE, Ky., May 29-A battered photograph of a girl whose appearance closely resembles that of the daughter of Jacob Franks, father of the kidnapped and slain Robert Franks, was found tonight by detectives after a careful search of the room in which Charles Ford Heath of Chicagoy was found unconcious from veronal poisoning.

	Physicians at the hospital late tonight held out little hope that Heath would regain consciousness.


this is all of article

pg 1 article on arrests:

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/30/104252546.pdf


	FIVE ARRESTS MADE IN FRANKS KILLING
	One Is a Wealthy Youth Who Admits Owning Spectacles Found Near Boy's Body.

	TYPEWRITER ALSO A CLUE

	Four Men Arrested in Room Where It Was--Paper Like That of Ransom Note.


	CHICAGO, Friday, May 30. — Five new arrests made in the early hours of this morning appeared to bring nearer to a solution the mystery of the kidnapping and death of Robert Franks, 13-year-old son of Jacob Franks, whose body was found Thursday of last week in a culvert in the Calumet River district. 

	Most important of the arrests was that of the admitted owner of the spectacles which were found near the Franks boy's body. He is Nathan Leopold Jr., 19 years old, only son of Nathan Leopold; reputed millionaire residing at 4,754 Greenwood Avenue, within a few blocks of the Franks residence.

	Leopold, a student at the University of Chicago and an advanced thinker, admitted the ownerhsip of the glasses almost as soon as he was charged with it. He also told States Attorney Robert E. Crowe that he was in the habit of roaming about the prairie in the vicinity of the place where the Frank boy's body was found.

	He said he had been in the neighborhood of the culvert either Friday or Saturday the week before the Franks boy's body was found. Examination develoepd the fact that he considered himself an advanced thinker and that he professed atheism.

	Meantime the detectives made four arrests in a raid in an apartment and seized a portable typewirter and a batch of writing paper similar to that upon which the letter in which a ransom had been demanded for the return of the Franks boy had been written.

	Early yesterday the police thought they had a clue in the attempted suicide at Lousville, Ky., of Charles F. Heath, a Chicago druggist. He was found unconcious in a hotel and had left two farewell notes and a phial, which had contained veronal. A batch of newspaper clippings, describing the Franks slaying, was found among his effects.

	On the way in a police ambulance to the City Hospital, Heath babbled continuously of the Franks case, intimating in the rambling sentences of his delirium that "he knew all about that murder in Chicago," and that he was a "dead ringer for the kidnapper."


reading the Chicago Tribune and NY times on the same story would give the reader very different impressions on who the killer might be and how close police were


article goes on about Heath, attempted suicide, police surveillance and the investigation into his movements on May 21

	
	...The investigation was still under way when the police were surprised on Sunday to learn that Heath was no longer at Mercy Hospital. The hospital authorities insist he had been discharged but the police doubt this.

	Tonight Heath's wife, Mrs. Anna Heath, and his mother, Mrs. Cora Heath, were taken to the State's Attorney's office and examined. Mrs. Heath attributed her husband's suicide attempts to despondency through losing his position in a south side drug store on the day before the slaying. She scorned the suggestion that her husband had killed the Franks boy.




...


May 31, 1924, NY Times pg 1

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/31/99450417.html
	TWO STUDENTS HELD IN FRANKS SLAYING

	Nathan Leopold Jr., Owner of Spectacles Found Near Body, Offers an Alibi.

	KNEW KIDNAPPED YOUTH

	Companion, Also Millionaire's Son, Bears Out Part of His Story-Their Typing Tested

	CHICAGO, May 30. — Following his arrest early this morning, after ownership of the spectacles found near the body of the kidnapped and slain Robert Franks had been traced to him, Nathan E. Leopold Jr., 19 years old, son of Nathan Leopold, a millionaire box manufacturer, denied any knowledge of the crime.

	He admitted owernship of the spectacles and said he took an unusual interest in literature pertaining to perversion. His chum, Richard Loeb, 18 years old, the son of a millionaire, Albert H. Loeb, Vice President of Sears, Roebuck & Co. corroborated part of his story.

	Leopold admitted that he knew Robert Franks, but said the acquantance was slight on account of the difference in their ages, Leopold being 19 and Franks 13.

	The police were reported late tonight to have found two bottles of poison in Leopold's room, but they gave no explanation of what he had said, if anything, regarding it.

	Sidney Stein, frequently a companion of Leopold, was the alst witness to be called in the investigation into the habits of Leopold and his whereabouts on the evening of May 21, the date on which Frank was kidnapped.


NY Times reports Leopold held, denied knowledge of crime, admitted owning glasses and "unusual interest in literature pertaining to perversion," knew Franks slightly, police found two bottles of "poison" in his room, Sidney Stein called in on habits and whereabouts of Leopold


	Leopold wrote for Milton D. Smith, assistant State's attorney, many samples of his lettering of the address "Mr. Jacob Franks, 2,052 Ellis Avenue, Special Delivery," the object being to compare Leopold's work with that on the letter demanding $10,000 ransom.

	Several specimens of Leopold's typing were examined by H. P. Sutton, a typewriter expert, who stated that the youth's typewriter was not the one used by the ransom letter writer. 



expert Sutton concluded Leopold's typewriter was not used. Loeb would later tell police Leopold typed the ransom letter, and that they destroyed the typewriter http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html


	Leopold, who described himself as the "youngest graduate of the University of Chicago, explained frequent vistis to the swamp where the boy's body was found by his interest in ornithology. He had been there often with "birding" classes, he said, and swelled his allowance of $125 monthyl by teaching three classes in ornithology when he was not studying law at the university.

	The evening of the kidnapping he spent with Loeb, he insisted, first in LIncoln Park and later in riding about with two girls, finally ending the night at a cabaret. Loeb insisted he was not with Leopold that night.

	Leopold presented a manly, straight-forward appearance and an intelligence, quick-thinking mind. "I want you to get this correctly," he said to a reporter. "Judge Crowe asked me whether I had ever read any works dealing either directly or indicrectly with any form of perversion. I replied that I had, and among them mentioned "I ragionamenti" of Pletro Aretino. I also mentioned several others."

	Then he told of his plan to translate that work from Italian to English and "get out a limited edition of some 200 or 300 copies, fully annotated and containing a long preface and a justification of Aretino," which were to be distributed only to scholars and those who had a legitimate interest in it.


NY times sounds like they like Leopold, I guess since his alibi was a "night at a cabaret", the "youngest graduate of the University of Chicago" while "teaching three classes" and his "manly, straightfoward appearance" and "quick-thinking mind." Seems to represent the elitism characteristic of NY Times, and they emphasize that in their report of him.

after mentioning his alibi of "riding about with two girls and night at a carabet," followed by "Loeb insisted he was not with Leopold that night." An early hint they don't like Loeb? in Leopold-Loeb letters, Loeb came across as the "bottom," if that makes sense. According to Neitzche this would mean Loeb is weak and detestable I guess.

Leopold clarified that the work he wanted to translate was "I ragionamenti" by Pletro Aretino but he mentioned "several others" after being asked specifically about reading works of "perversion." Apparently, leopold is responding to the Chicago Tribune report on the interview or similar reports.

The work he wanted to translate was about something related to female prostitutes. Aretino wrote a lot on sex stuff but doesn't seem like sodomy of boys was his thing. He blackmailed people and wrote "pornographic literature" and once blackmailed Michealangelo for being gay (http://rictornorton.co.uk/michela.htm). He was born in Florence and died in Venice.


	He refused to permit a psychiatrist to test his mentality "until I have an opportunity to consult an attorney or obtain my father's permission."

	"My theory of the Franks case is that he was kidnapped for ransom by some one who knew him," he said. "I have been reading the papers about it ever since he was killed."

	"Do you think you should be released?" he was asked.

	"No, it would be criminal on the part of the police to let me go now on account of the glasses. I thought all along that the glasses were the best clue for the police to follow, never thinking they were mine. I didn't know I had lost them but now I am sure I did, and it was on one of my many trips to that vicinity. I think the last time I was there was on the Sunday preceding the Franks murder."

	From an automobile similar to Leopold's a chisel, wrapped with adhesive tape and breaing bloodstains, had been flung on the night of the murder of Franks. The slain boy had been hit over the head with some weapon three times.


Leopold lied hardcore on murdering Franks to NY Times, who published in a positive light toward Leopold. His alibi is that he had lost his glasses there at some point and didn't realize it.


	Nathan Leopold Sr., expressed full confidence in the innocence of his son, in a formal statement saying that it was the desire of both himself andhis son to aid the authorities in running the murderer to earth and that, at the present time, he had no intention of seeking his son't release from custody through court proceedings. Loeb, as well as Leopold, is being held for further examination.





May 31, 1924, NY Times pg 16


small article:

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/31/99450595.html?pageNumber=16

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/31/99450595.pdf

	LOUISVILLE, KY., May 30.--C. F. Heath, the Chicago druggist, in a hospital here suffering from poison, was said today to have a chance to recover. Police here hae been unable to connect Heath with the Franks kidnapping case. It is believed that should he regain consciousness he will be unable to throw any light on the mystery.


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/31/issue.html


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/05/31/99450596.pdf

	INDIANAPOLIS, May 30.--Three men held here who, according to information from Chicago may be wanted there in connection with the Franks case, were arrested Saturday night. A quantity of nitroglycerine, seldge hammers and other tools for blowing safes were found in their hotel room.



...


May 31, 1924, Chicago Tribune pg 1


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354884134/?terms=Franks

headline "SHAKE LEOPOLD-LOEB ALIBI"


	FRANKS CASE SUSPECTS UPSET BY CHAUFFEUR

	Auto in Garage All Evening, He Says.


	At 3 o'clock this morning Nathan E. Leopold Jr. and Richard Loeb, sons of rich south side families, held for investigation in the murder of Robert Franks, were making statements to State's Attorney Crowe and Assistant State's Attorney Savage.

	While the reports of their statements were fragmentary it was said they were relating their knowledge of the murder of the Franks boy.

	This came after hours of persistent questioning. The break came after Sven Englund, a chauffeur fro the leopold family, had shattered the alibi of the prisoners by declaring that the automobile of young Leopold had not been out of the garage between the hours of 1 and 10 p. m. on the day of the murder.


Leopold alibi was he was out driving car "with two girls" to a "cabaret" the night of the murder, but Sven Englund shattered with report that Leopold's car was still in the garage.

Chicago tribune says Englund's wife corroborated her husband's story since she got a prescription the day of the murder, and "this was taken to mean that the alibi established by the two youths had suffered seriously."

says Chauffer's statement was told to Loeb, who was "perceptibly disconcerted" and exclaime d"For God's Sake! Is he sure? and kept silence for the moment.

	
	...Had Been Gaining Favor.

	Previously both young men, who had been in custody for ours on suspicion of having knowledge of young Franks' disappearance and death, had steadily been gaining favor with the investigators. Their stories clicked true and their demeanor had been frank and outspoken. There was a feeling that both young men, and particularly Leopold, had been caught in a most remarkable net of circumstances while thoroughly innocent.

	One by one there had been an apparenty weakening of the circumstances that had seemingly incriminated the two millionaries' sons and University of Chicago students, in the murder. They were still in custody; some circumstance sthey had not explained away, but at midnight their straightforward answers had won them belief, and what was more to them for the moment, respect.


Cheufeer testimony a surprise? maybe NY times types thought they'd get away with it, then Englund settled things otherwise.


	Seek Girl's Story.

	State's Attorney Robert E. Crowe had the spectacles that proved Leopold had been at the culvert wehre Robert Franks' body was found. Leopold had an alibi. corroborated by Loeb and needing only the confirmation of two girls, Edna and May, to give preponderance to his claims to having been elsewhere when Robert was kidnaped and killed.

	Both had been drinking the afternoon of Wednesday, May 21, on the lake front off Grace street, left there about 5 p. m. (the time Robert disappeared at 49th street and Ellis avenue) and the drinking continued far into the evening. Both told that to different questioners without having time to consult.

	In the evening, about 8:20 o'clock, at Sixty-third street and Kenwood avenue, they "picked up" the girls, their stories coincided, and at 10:20 p. m. the girls left them at the entrance to the 9 hole golf course in Jackson Park.

	Neither knew the last names of their chance acquantances.


later Loeb would tell authorities "we planned that story" of being drunk with women on night of murder. Loeb addressing Leopold:

http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html
	"And then the thing I wish to point out.  I have been made a fish right along here.  Now this story that you speak of in your testimony, this story of the finding of all this alibi, all these women, and being drunk in the Coconut Grove and everything, we planned that definately.  It was definately decided that the story was not to go after Wednesday noon, which would be a week after the crime.  We were to protect our story.  We were to just say that we didn't know what we were doing, and there was no evidence.  We felt that you were safe with your glasses after a week had passed, that your glasses being out there would not necessitate an air-tight alibi, because we didn't figure anything else, and we figured that you would be safe enough after a week not to know exactly where you were on that particular Wednesday afternoon."

	"Who felt that?" Crowe asked.

	"I told the same story exactly here to Mr. Savage."

	"All right," said Crowe.

	"When you came down Thursday and you told another story which you had agreed not to tell, I came down to Mr. Crowe and he questioned me, and questioned me about my actions and everything else, and I denied ever being drunk, I denied being with you, Leopold, and I denied being up at the Coconut Grove, and those things being put together made me absolutely certain that you had told the stories you shouldn't have told. 

	"Then he started to talk about the Park, about being out at Lincoln Park.  He mentioned parks.  He brought it around, but I knew what he was driving at.  That was Lincoln Park, and when he did that I stepped in to try to help you out.

	"I think it is a damn sight more than you would have done for me.  I tried to help you out because I thought that you at least, if the worst comes to the worst, would admit what you had done and not try to drag me into the thing in that manner.  Well now, that is all I have to say." 


Loeb says they decided they planned the alibi, decided against it, Leob says he didn't tell it, but Leopold did.

Loeb says he covered for Leopold but "it is a damn sight more than you would have done for me"

Leopold respond with some excuse and that Loeb is a liar


	...The reason for changing the story was, as you remember, I was very indefinate, and I was urged to remember, quite strongly, what I had been doing, and I am sorry that you were made a fish of and stepped into everything and broke down and all that, I am sorry, but it isn't my fault.


get a sense of why NY Times likes him--Loeb has some sembelnce of trust or honor, if it can be called that, while Leopold plotted to use him and make him look like the liar to take the blame, assuming Loeb was telling the truth. Apparently Neitzche would be proud.

working theory is that Neitszchites have continued to blame Loeb and white-wash Leopold in this tradition ever since


Why did the two women corroberate the story?


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354884134/
	Insists Glasses Were Clean.

	The young man has not known, or had not taken into consideration, the one feature the police consider strong that the spectacles, when found, bore no indications of having been there longer than a few hours. If lost there on Leopold's last admitted visit to the "death spot," the Sunday previous, police were certain they would be weather beaten, spatter with mud from rain or dew and dust--but they were not.


caught him in a lie saying he left glasses there before murder

goes on about searching for his typewriter (which they had already thrown away)


	...A letter written by Nathan to Richard had at first resulted in embarrasment to both youths. It was signed "Babe," which turned out to be the name Nathan is called at home and by all his schoolmates. A sentence that was regarded as at least peculiar was easily and satisfactorily explained by both. Their manly appearance and evident fearlessness was heavily in their favor.


a letter with a peculiar sentence from Leopold to Loeb "embarrased" them but they explained it away


goes over alibi


	...I met 'Dick' after class and we went downtown and had dinner at Marshall Field's grill. In the afternoon we went up to the north end of Lincoln park. I wanted to see a heron-gull.

	"We drank quite a bit there and when we started south Dick was pretty drunk and I advised him not to go home. ...later we picked up the two girls, whom we later dropped in Jackson park. I took Dick home with me for a few hours, then drove him home about 1 a. m."


Leopold's alibi: Loeb went with him to Lincoln Park because Leopold wanted to see a heron-gull, both drank but dick got too drunk, Leopold giving him advice, picked up two girls but girls didn't want to sleep with them so dropped them off, Leopold drove Loeb home


even the alibi story comes off as panning Loeb

article says Loeb corroborated the alibi


	...Young Rubel Is released.

	Richard rubel, also the son of a wealthy father living at the Madison Park hotel, was questioend because of his acquantance with both Loeb and Leopold, but was released when he convinced the authorities he knew little about either of them and nothing about the Franks murder.


Rubel was the person mentioned in the letter from Leopold to Loeb. In the letter Leopold was talking about their legal jeoprady with regards to an unspecified crime and spoke of Rubel as someone both spoke to in relation to this


	In the course of conversation with policemen and reporters the sentence, "Let him who is without sin cast the first stone," was used by young Leopold.

	"Le him who is not guilty of this crime cast the first stone," young Leopold paraphraised; "get me the stone and I'll throw it."


Leopold was brazen about lying

was Loeb similar? this is important since some contemporary and modern writers on this try to paint Loeb as the mastermind who corrupted Leopold, and Leopold says the same in his memiors


	Regard Heath as Cleared.

	As the questioning of Nathan progressed the police both here and in Lousville announced the conclusion that C. F. Heath, Chicago druggist dying of poison in the Lousville hospital, was not connected with the Franks murder.

	Lieut. William Shoemaker, speaking for the local police, said it had been established that Heath had been at work in a local drug store until 6 o'clock the night of the kidnaping and slaying, and that this practically eliminated him.


earlier it was reported that a check couldn't "trace his movements" on the night of the murder

couldn't they have interviewed his boss at the drug store right away? it's weird this didn't get "established" until after Leopold and Loeb were caught in a lie



on pg 2 another article saying Leobold's fater wants to help the police "for justice and truth"


pg 2


	...IN FICTION THE "CLEW" SOLVES ALL; NOT SO HERE

	It's Like the Story Until the End


article says clues usually don't end up tracing to perp in real life like they do in fiction, but this time they did

goes over how they traced glasses to Leopold

	
	...Last Tuesday Prosecutor Savage and Detective Gourtland carried the spectacles to Almer Coe a& Co.


"Last Tuesday" would be May 27th


	Identify the Glasses

	Mr. Coe, William D. Glennon, secretary of the company, and Jacob Weinstein, the manager, looked at the spectacles. They at once identified them. The frames were made especially for their company by the Brobow Optical Co., of Brooklyn, they said; and the ALmer Coe & Co. "diamond point" mark was on the lenses.

	They recognized the frames by a peculiar hinge on them, the like of which is not on the frames sold by any other Chicago optician.

	"Would it be possible for you to go through your records and trace this particular pair of glass down: to determine the man you sold them to?" was asked.

	Finally the opticians said it could be done.

	Find the Bill of Sale.

	They searched for two days in the records of their four stores. Late Wednesday, the bill of sale for the spectacles sold Leopold on Nov. 1, 1923, was found. The presecrption for the lenses tallied exactyl with the technical description of the eyes fitting the lenses in the "single clew."

	Nathan Leopold Jr., was arrested late Thursday. He is the type of man the oculist told the police would wear such glasses--a student, a scholar, a reader. A man who might suffer at times from eye strain.

	...The slender clew of the murder mystery of fiction had been found in fact.



...


Chicago Tribune May 31, 1924, pg 3


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354884162/?terms=Franks
	BIG EXPERIENCE EITHER WAY, IS NATHAN'S VIEW

	Watches Own Emotions; Upholds Alibi.

	BY MAURINE WATKINS.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Maurine_Dallas_Watkins
	Maurine Dallas Watkins (July 27, 1896 – August 10, 1969) was an American journalist and playwright. In the 1920s she wrote the play, Chicago (1926). After her death, it was adapted by Bob Fosse and others as a successful musical for stage, running from 1975 to 1977 in New York, and a 2002 film version.

	...For the Tribune, where Watkins worked for seven months, she covered the murders and the subsequent trials of Belva Gaertner, a twice-divorced cabaret singer, and Beulah Sheriff Annan. Watkins often used acerbically amusing reportage, and focused on the farcical, cynical, and sensational aspects of the two cases, the press and public interest, and the legal proceedings. She highlighted two attractive "jazz babies" claiming to be corrupted by men and liquor. She characterized Beulah as "beauty of the cell block" and Belva as "most stylish of Murderess Row." Both women, after months of press coverage in Chicago's seven daily papers, were found not guilty at trial. Watkins believed they were guilty.


https://etda.libraries.psu.edu/files/final_submissions/9095
	Leopold and Loeb Mute Watkins’s Voice

	As the movie cameras were following Beulah Annan, giving Watkins fodder for didactic, yet humorous, observations on men, women , celebrity and justice, another murder was grabbing the nation’s attention and changing, if only temporarily, Chicago’s bemused attitude toward its criminal element.

	As noted earlier, the kidnapping and “thrill killing” of young Robert Franks by wealthy and brilliant Na than Leopold and Richard Loeb cast a shadow over the city, as everyone from reporters to social scientists to average citizens struggled to understand how intelligent boys from “good” homes could kill just for the experience of having taken a life .

	As also noted previously, the Tribune promised its readers comprehensive coverage by a team of its best reporters – including Watkins, who would provide “a review of the Loeb youth’s life and family.” 96

	Her first bylined story about the murder appeared jus t one day after Watkins’s article about the verdict in the Beulah Annan case, and it was markedly different in tone. In fact, Watkins’s coverage of the young victim’s funeral came close to melodramatic, reading more like a piece by a sob sister than a mob sister. While her coverage of the Annan case contained frequent, mocking references to the “Hula Lou” song, she led her funeral story with a quote from a psalm – “I will lift up mine eyes to the hills” – followed by the slightly maudlin paragraph, “But her mother heart lay buried behind the marble slab with its words of gold: ‘1909 – Robert Franks – 1924.’”

	A few paragraphs later, Watkins described “the little white coffin in the library,” adding, in syrupy prose, “There before the fireplace where he us ed to dream, it stood, covered with a blanket of crimson rosebuds.” The bereaved mother, Watkins noted, was in a mute haze of grief until she met a group of her deceased son’s schoolmates, at which point she “ran her hands hungrily over their faces. Some with the round features of childhood, others slim in adolescence – and four days ago her son had been with them!” 98 The exclamation point, which she’d wielded with sarcasm or to point out hypocrisies in previous articles ma de an already overblown observat ion even more maudlin, in this case.

	Watkins partially regained her more predominant cynical, sarcastic perspective a few days later, when she was among a crowd of reporters who interviewed Nathan Leopold shortly after he was arrested and before he’d co nfessed . Although the Tribune ultimately assigned Genevieve Forbes Herrick the task of tackling the psychological aspects of the case, Watkins produced the first in - depth and perceptive profile of the boy wh o would eventually be charged with the murder an d who took credit for being the “mastermind” behind the killing .

	Discussing her work on the case for the New York World in 1927, Watkins – after noting that she was the only woman reporter to interview Leopold and Loeb on the day before they confessed – r ecalled how she approached her single opportunity to ask a question, calling it “the biggest gamble I ever took” as a journalist. And the query she developed must have seemed like an odd one to at least some of her fellow scr ibes. She asked of Leopold, “‘ What three men do you consider the greatest whoever lived?’”

	Watkins insisted that she wasn’t trying to be esoteric or clever; on the contrary, she told the World that she simply wanted to ask something that would generate a response that would allow her to fill column inches. She explained, “‘I wasn’t thinking about the crime. I was thinking about my story – how I could get two columns out of one question.’”

	Leopold’s response – N ietzs che, Haeckel and Epicurus – proved telling for Watkins, though. She explained that N ietzs che believed in “‘the superior man,’” while Haeckel rejected immortality, and Epicurus “‘advocated the right of the individual to do as he pleased.’” “‘With that sort of philosophy as a foundation,’” Watkins explained, “‘one coul d begin to see how they might have done it . . . At 1 they confessed . . . ’”

	In spite of Watkins’s cla im that the question was somewhat random, she almost certainly had more than just potentially filling space in mind when she asked it. The re sulting a rticle, as well as her analysis of Leopold’s response in her interview with the World , both indicate that she expected the inquiry to yield important insights – as it did.


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354884162/?terms=Franks
	...BY MAURINE WATKNIS

	"To regret an experience is to nullify it," wrote Oscar Wilde from the depths of Old Bailey.


http://law2.umkc.edu/faculty/projects/ftrials/wilde/wildeaccount.html
	Old Bailey, the main courthouse in London, had never presented a show quite like the three trials that captivated England and much of the literary world in the spring of 1895.

	...The first criminal trial of Oscar Wilde opened at Old Bailey on April 26, 1895.  Wilde and Alfred Taylor, the procurer of young men for Wilde, faced twenty-five counts of gross indecencies and conspiracy to commit gross indecencies.  A parade of young male witnesses for the prosecution testified regarding their roles in helping Wilde to act out his sexual fantasies.  Although Wilde was not prosecuted for sodomy, there was little doubt by the end of the trial that he might have been.  Almost all of them expressed shame and remorse over their own actions, and Wilde seemed to be left conflicted by their testimony.  (Later Wilde compared his encounters with "feasting with panthers."  Wilde wrote that "the danger was half the excitement.")

	..."The love that dare not speak its name" in this century is such a great affection of an elder for a younger man as there     was between David and Jonathan, such as Plato made the very basis of his philosophy, and such as you find in the sonnets     of Michelangelo and Shakespeare.  It is that deep, spiritual affection that is as pure as it is perfect.  It dictates and     pervades great works of art like those of Shakespeare and Michelangelo, and those two letters of mine, such as they are.      It is in this century misunderstood, so much misunderstood that it may be described as the "Love that dare not speak its     name," and on account of it I am placed where I am now.  It is beautiful, it is fine, it is the noblest form of             affection.  There is nothing unnatural about it.  It is intellectual, and it repeatedly exists between an elder and a         younger man, when the elder man has intellect, and the younger man has all the joy, hope and glamour of life before him.      That it should be so the world does not understand.  The world mocks it and sometimes puts one in the pillory for it.


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354884162/?terms=Franks
	And Oscar Wilde was one of the heroes of Nathan Leopold Jr., held for questioning in the Franks case. Oscar Wilde, along with Nietzsche, who said "I love the great destroyers, for they are the great adorers!" Nathan's other heroes are Ernest Haeckel, who denied the immortality of the soul, the freedom of the will, and the existence of a personal God; and Epicurus, who preached the doctrine which bears his name.

	Gives Socrates the Air.

	"I won't add Socrates," said the young man thoughtfully, " for I never though such a lot of that old bird!"

	Now Nathan is having an "experience" that seems to bring him no "regret," no worry, no alarm. A marvelous opportunity to study his own reactions! And with a sense of detachement he watches--as a scientist might--his own curious lack of emotion.


sounds like she gets him, has him pinned

doesn't come off as a fan in this paragraph, more like schadenfreude


	For thirty hours states attorneys hurled questions at him. He caught them lightly and deftly, answering suavely. He has not once taken the defensive. No question has shaken his calm or penetrated his urbanity.

	Reporters, three and four at a time, have asked him questions about love, philosophy, art, sports--relevant and irrelevant. And, Ceasar-like, he answered each in turn rapidly enough to keep the questioner busy writing on his separate question. A pause--long enough to light a cigaret, for Nathan has smoked without stopping--then a swift, decisive answer couched in judicial language, with perhaps a slightly cynical twist and a sudden smile.

	For he has a very winning smile, this slim youth of 19. Slender face, with full eyes whose white shows slightly below the pupil, and lips that are sensitive and mobile.


she sounds like she wants to make him one of her novel characters


	As to Brains He's There!

	Simply--but no "modestly" for modesty is only a "pose!"--he recounted his years of schooling at Miss Spaid's at a public school, at the Harvard school, U. of Chicago, U. of Michigan, then back to U. of Chicago where he recieved his PH. B a year ago. Simply--but not "superiorly" for that betrays and "inferiority complex!"--he named the fifteen languages he had studied, carefully spelling and explaining what they were.


comes off as mocking


	A superior mind. And a mind that knows its own superiority so well that it were needless to boast it--and foolish to conceal.

	An athiest, yes. But he does not reccomend athiesm for "hoi polloi." God, hethinks, is a good thing to hold the common people in check.

	"And I'm not a radical, communist, Socialist, nor bolshevist," he said with a charming laugh. "on questions of reform my temperature is decidedly normal!"

	For he lives in a world of his own creating, and the people around him are more or less shadows.


^^^

	"I belong to no social fraternity," he said. "Yes, I am a member of Phi Beta Kappa. What do I think of It? A ridiculous society, that attempts to unite the two most diverse kinds of brains; the naturally acute mind, and the grind, who wears horn shell glasses and carries a brief case!"

	Books? He has delved deeply in the past, particularly in the sixteenth century--"the wickedest century the world has ever known." Benvenuto Cellini? Yes! And Pietro Aretino, an authority on the erotic.

	"But I have never read a 'bad' book," he said with that slow, calm smile that admits the hearer cannot grasp his meaning, "for there is no such thing!"

	Likes Erotic Books.

	He doesn't care much for modern novels, but considers Cyril Hume's "Wife of a Centaur"--frankly erotic--the best book of the last decade.


sounds like she suspects him of raping Franks


	He has built for himself a world beyond religion, beyond morality, beyond convention--yet he accomodates himself to the world in which he lives. And he does not preach his convictions to others, for he realizes that such meat is only for the strong.


sums him up as Nietszcheite


	With his friends he smokes and drinks and "takes his pleasure where he finds it."

	"A regular fellow!" they say.

	In clear, precise language he dictated to the reporters a statement for the papers: "The police are more than justified in holding me in custody for a limited period, as I am the victim of an unusual set of circumstances."

	Breifly he enumerated: (1) his knowledge of the place where the body was found; (2) the discovery of his glasses in that spot; (3) his visit to the place just pervious to the crime; (4) his evening in the company of two girls he didn't know.

	He leaned back and took another cigaret.

	"And won't you thank President Burton and Dean Woodward of the Law School for their expression of sympathy and confidence in me?" he asked genially.

	"The most brilliant boy of his age I've ever known1" said State's Attorney Robert Crowe of the boy who has met--as a courteous superior--men of all ages and ranks.

	And the most concieted tribe on earth--reporters!--nibble their pencils and coughed suggestingly for spelling and definitions!

	If he's not connected with the crime--what an experience!

	And if he is connected--still it's experience!


sounds like she summed him up accurately as a pompous prick and hates him for it


...


May 31st, 1924 Chicago Tribune page 3


	RICHARD LOEB AS BEST FRIEND, LETTER'S THEME

	Nathan Turned More to Books than Persons.

	Nathan E. Leopold Jr., with his degree of bachelor of philosophy at the age of 19, found himself lonely in this age of "flippers and flappers," though it's said he did not hate "flappers."

	For companions, however, he preferred the tested great of the library for the temporarily famous of the campus.


two different profiles on the same page of Chicago Tribune give two different impressions

the author of this one is not named

	
	From the time that he was a small boy he had been known as "Babe." It was a family pet name which later was "wished on" him by his friends. Just as men over six feet frequently are called "Shorty" and fat men are hailed as "Slim," so the mental prodigy of his circle of friends was called "Babe," it fitted so well his scholastic honors.

	Richard His Best Friend.

	Richard Loeb, also a youth of unusual mental attainments, was his best friend. It had been a long association. It appeared that last November some misunderstanding was about to shatter it. So Nathan wrote an emotional letter about it.


Is that the letter where he threatened to kill him?

	
	...Thus watching birds and living with his friends of the book shevles and the stuffed specimens in his private museum, young Nathan esteemed his friend Richard more than do those who have many friends. So while to Nathan a cop seems a gaunal curiosity though a biped, his friend Richard, who could share his interests, was especially dear.


so far article paints Leopold as a lonely nerd who gets teased with Loeb one of his only friends


goes on to describe letter where Leopold says he threatened to kill Loeb

skips part where he talks about a crime and attempt to blackmail Loeb

comes off as trying to repurpose the letter as evidence of Leopold being lonely and Loeb his only friend (apparently Leopold liked Loeb for different reasons in actuality)


...

June 1 1924, NY Times pg 1

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/06/01/101599987.html?pageNumber=1

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/06/01/101599987.pdf

	TWO RICH STUDENTS CONFESS TO KILLING FRANKS BOY IN CAR

	Sons of Wealthy Chicagoans Hit Him With a Chisel and Then Gagged Him.

	THEN DISPOSED OF BODY

	Youth's Clothing, Which They Stripped From Him, Burned in Home of One Slayer.

	LONG PLANNED SUCH CRIME

	Once Thought to Kidnap Rosenwald's Grandsom--Chauffeur Upset Their Alibi


says the confessed, Leopold youngest U Chicago grad, Loeb youngest U Michigan, both around 19

	
	...They admitted that they had seized the boy, placed him in a hired automobile and slain him five minutes afterward while the car was driving through a heavily traveled street. First hitting him on the head with a chisel, they insured his death by choking him with a gag. They put acid on his face in an effort to so disfigure it that identity would be destroyed.


says confession admitted they killed Franks five minutes after kidnapping him by chisel then gag

Leopold confession:


http://www.famous-trials.com/leopoldandloeb/1746-leopoldconfession
	...The next problem was getting the victim to kill.  This was left undecided until the day we decided to pick the most likely-looking subject that came our way.  The particular case happened to be Robert Franks.  Richard was acquainted with Robert and asked him to come over to our car for a moment.

	...As soon as we turned the corner, Richard placed his one hand over Robert's mouth to stifle his outcry, with his right beating him on the head several times with a chisel, especially prepared for the purpose. The boy did not succumb as readily as we had believed so for fear of being observed Richard seized him, and pulled him into the back seat. Here he forced a cloth into his mouth. Apparently the boy died instantly by suffocation shortly thereafter.


Loeb confession:


http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html
	"We proceeded south on Ellis Avenue, turned east on 50th Street, and just after we turned off of Ellis Avenue, Leopold reached his arm around young Franks, grabbed his mouth and hit him over the head with a chisel.  I believe he hit him several times, I do not know the exact number.  He began to bleed and was not entirely unconscious.  He was moaning.  I proceeded further east on 50th, and turned, I believe, at Dorchester.  At this point Leopold --"

	"What time was it?"

	"This was around five o' clock, I don't know the exact time.  At this time Leopold grabbed Franks and carried him over back of the front seat and threw him on a rug in the car.  He then took one of the rags and gagged him by sticking it down his throat, I believe. 

	..."We turned around, and as we turned around, he seeing that Franks was unconscious, climbed into the front seat.  Up to that time he had been watching him from the back seat. 

	..."We dragged the body out of the car, put the body in the road (robe) and carried it over to the culvert.  Leopold carried the feet, I carried the head.  We deposited the body near the culvert,and undressed the body completely.  Our original scheme had been to etherize the body to death."

	"Where did you pour the hydrochloric acid on him?"

	"Right there.  The scheme for etherizing him originated through Leopold, who evidently has some knowledge of such things, and he said that that would be the easiest way of putting him to death, and the least messy.  This, however, we found unnecessary, because the boy was quite dead when we took him there.  We knew he was dead, by the fact that rigor mortis had set in, and also by his eyes, and then when at that same time we poured this hydrochloric acid over him, we noticed no tremor, not a single tremor in his body, therefore we were sure he was dead. 


They confessed they were looking for a little boy to kill by pouring acid on him, NY times reads confeession then reports on it to make it sounds like an accident


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/06/01/101599987.pdf
	...Ransom and the "adventure" of crime were the motives for the deed, although both recieved liberal allowance from their parents. Long having had kidnaping in mind...

	...Death Penatly for Both Crimes

	Kidnapping is a capital offense under the Illinois laws, so that should they be proved guilty of the kidnaping and murder the two youths could be sentenced to death on two counts.

	"I have a hanging case," said Robert E. Crowe, State's Attorney, after he had reviewed all angles of the confesssions. "The State is ready to go to trial immediately." Chief Justice Caverly of the Criminal Court, stating that he would urge an immediate trial, said: "Justice should be served within thirty days."


skips confessed intent to kill, calls it kidnaping with "ransom and adventure" motive

quotes Crowe saying its a hanging case as if due to a technicality in Illinois law (as if they were setting up for the death penalty debate already?)


	...Mr. Crowe declared the confessions had revealed that the students had no intention of returning the boy to his parents if the ransom had been paid. They expected to destroy all evidences of the crime.


quotes Crowe, previously introduced as hard-nose, and leaves it up to the reader whether or not this is Crowe's opinion--seems slimy

why not say outright what should be headline news on this? killers confess they were looking for a boy to kill and killed him


	The attitude of Leopold and Loeb when they were first arrested inclined the State's Attorney and the police to doubt their guilt. Both asserted their innocence and courted the fullest investigation, even to saying they did not desire freedom until they had been fully cleared, a position endorsed by their parents.


Remember yesterday's front page of NY times was almost gushing about Leopold

sounds like they're trying to cover their ass a little here


	...In offering an alibi, Leopold told of having spent the afternoon with Loeb in his automobile and the evening with Loeb and two girls in riding around and visiting cabarets.

	The suspiciouns of the State's Attorney became strongly aroused when Loeb contradicted Leopold and declared he was not with his chum in the evening.


Chicago Times said Loeb corroborated Leopold's story, NY Times said Loeb tanked it--which is true? (and why the difference?)


goes on to describe Chauffer "blast"ing Leopold's alibi, the elaborate ransom scheme

goes into a lot of detail on the ransom scheme

	...After their amazing confessions had been transcribed the prisoners were taken to the points that figured in their remarkable story.

	...Leopold had pointed to a spot in the Jackson Park lagoon where he said he had dumped the typewriter on which the "erudite" kidnapper's letter was written.

	As he pointed to this spot, the youth of superior intelligence, master of languages, ornithological, and athiest, expressed a wish to kill himself.


the real victim, according to NY Times


	Loeb the First to Break.


going with Loeb the bitch/snitch/Judas theme?

it's like culpability of the crime doesn't register for them, just who comes off to them as "weak" and who as "strong", like Neitzche's mindset


	Soon after 1 o'clock this morning Svin Englund, the Leopold family chauffuer, who had been waiting for four hours to confront the detectives ...There was no expectation that he knew of anything that might have a bearing on the cimre, and the questiosn asked him were merely perfunctory. He was one of a dozen called to verify slight details of th alibi, seemingly and assuredly given by his empoyer's son.

	Of his own volition Englund remakred that the red car driven by young Leopold had not been out of the home garage on the day of the kidnapping.


NY Times sounds upset by this

writes that expectation was Englund would verify the alibi, then offered key detail "on his own volition"


	...His statement startled the examineers. They had been on the point of believing the seemingly puncture-proof alibi and had almost ordered the students released.

	The statement of Englund was reiterated to Loeb. He blanched, trembled, cursed and said:

	"Is he sure?"

	He would not say another word for several minutes. His head, which had been held up high to this point, dropped. His eyes no longer looked back frankly and fearlessly into the eyes of the inquisitors as they had been doing for forty-eight hours. He shifted his head about and would look squarely at no one. Then he suddenly asked for State's Attorney Crowe.

	"I want to talk with him privately," he said, and in a moment was closeted with the prosecutor.


NY Times: Leopold's perfect puncture-proof alibi was ruined by Loeb's comparative lack of psycopathy (more or less)

Loeb an untermench?


	In the meantime Leopold was taken into another office and re-examined by Joseph Savage and Detective Chief Hughes. Word soon came out of both offices that the boys had broken down.

	When Mr. Crowe came out to call in a stenographer to take down Loeb's story he said:

	"This murder is solved. We have obtained a statement from each of the students. They say they killed Robert Franks. They want to tell all."

	"We did it for the experience, through a spirit of adventure," the two declared, as, after thirty hours of grilling, they finally signed the statements they had made. They added they were after the easy money, the $10,000 they had demanded of Jacob Franks for his son who was already dead.


	...The killing was deliberate and decided on in advance of the seizure of the boy, murder as well as ransom being part of the "adventure." Failing in other means, they intended to kill him with ether or acid.


does end up saying the intended to kill a kid with acid


	...In their confessions each of the students charge the other with wielding the chisel, which was thrown out of the car a short distance from the spot and later found.

	At the same time a gag was thrust into Franks's mouth so tightly that if the blows had not killed him he was strangled to death.


mentions each blaming the other for hitting him with chisel


	...Leopold Talked of Suicide.

	"Id like to jump off this bridge," Leopold pleaded as the car in which he, in custody of Chief Hughes and State's Attorney Crowe were riding, was driven over the high bridge in Jackson Park, while the scnes of the crime were being visited.

	The squad of detectives who had spent the morning with Leopold and Loeb checking up the details of their confessions hedged in about the young man.

	"If you ever wnent over this bridge you'd never come back," Chief Hughes said.

	That would suit me," Leopold replied, and gave a futile jerk toward the side before he settled back, surrounded by detectives.

	Leopold was apparently unaffected by the disvoery that he was one of the kidnappers and slayers. He made his confession to Mr. Crowe without nevousness, as if it were an every day occurance, and afterward posed nonchalantly for photographers, lighting a cigarrette as the cameras clicked.


NY Times makes Leopold out as a sort of crime-novel anti-hero


	..."Let's eat," suggested leopold and ordered a sandwich, pie and coffee, when he entered the cigar store with the detectives. A moment later Loeb came in, was recognized by Mrs. Barish and collapsed in a faint. He was carried back to the automobile and revived.


not very ubermensch-like of Loeb


	...The confessions, according to the police, point to Leopold, who smoked and smiled even while hew as telling how the Frnaks boy was slain, as the leader in the crime.

	Loeb's confession was interrupted while he put his head in his hands and sobbed. Leopold reads and speaks fifteen different languages. During his college course he made a habit of taking twice the ordinary number of hours of study.


NY times says Leopold the leader of the crime, contrary to some modern tellings

this is contrary to another apparent propaganda piece published the day before in Chicago Tribune, which was sneaky in using the Leopold-Loeb letter to make Loeb look like the ringleader by leaving some things out

article has a lot of contrasting Leopold "noble"-like behavior and Loeb "slave"-like behavior according to Neitzche


goes on to quote Franks saying they probably had ransom motive and should be in asylum


	...Julius Rosenwald, millionaire philanthropist, called at the State's Attorney's office when the news of the confession became known. He said he had come because his grandson had been mentioned in the newspapers in connection with the confessions as one of the boys picked as a possible victim.

	"I have come here," Mr. Rosenwald said, "to find out about that."

	He did not say anything about the identity of his grandoms but, referring to the slaers' confessed motive--ransom--continued:

	"It does not seem possible that two boy with some much money at their command should do a ting like this, especially for the motive assigned to them."


did Rosenwald influence how the case played out?


goes on to recall crime, including some callous parts:


	...The boy had been dead over five hours when this offer to spare his life was made.

	Despite the threat Mr. Ranks and Mr. Ettelson went to the Detective Bureau early in the morning, consulted Acting Lieutenant Robert Welling. It was decided to have the telephone watched but further plans were put off until morning for fear of the boy's safety.

	Lietenant Welling was asked to say nothing. Because of this no report of the missing boy was put on the Detective Bureau blotter. And it was becaus of this that the body of a boy, which was found in a ditch at 119th Street and the Pennsylvania ralroad tracks at 9:30 o'clock was not connected at once with the disappearance of Robert Franks.


blame Franks for investigation being slow initially?


continues with summary of recent events, ends with:


	...Their stories at first seemed to be beyond question, but the evidence of the Leopold chauffeur as to the car they alleged they used proved their undoing.



...



Chicago Tribune, June 1, 1924, pg 1


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354886108/

Headline "CLINCH YOUTHS' CONFESSIONS"

	TAKE LOEB AND LEOPOLD ON FRANKS DEATH ROUTE

	Find Little Victim's Boots; Dive for Type-writer; Crowe Says he Ha Case for a Hanging.

	AN UNPRECEDENTED CRIME

	In view of the fact that the solving of the Franks kidnaping and death brings to notice a crime that is unique in Chicago's annals and perhaps unprecedented in American criminal history, The Tribune this morning gives to the report of the case many columns of space for news, comment, and pictures.

	The diabolical spirit evinced in the planned kidnaping and murder; the wealth and prominence of the families whose sons are involved; the high mental attainments of the yourths; the suggestions of perversion;



article very different tone from NY Times

already one big difference: "suggestion of perversion" near headline, missing from NY Times article. The confession had important info on that; they confessed to removing Franks pants early before the rest of his clothes.


	the strange quirks indicated in the confession taht the child was slain for ransom, for experience, for the satisfaction of a desire for "deep plotting," combined to set the case in a class by itself.

	The Tribune has aimed to set the story forth in these general lines: the day's news developments following the early morning confession, told by Orville Dwyer; a consideration of the spychology and psyciatry of the case by Miss Genevieve Forbes; a review of the Loeb youth's life and family, by Miss Maurine Watkins; of the Leopold youth and his family, by Miss Maureen McKernan; the detective steps by which the case was worked out, by John Herrick; the Franks family, by Paul Augsburg; and other miscellaneous features of the crime.


	BY ORVILLE DWYER


opens saying expected to send to gallows, typewriter evidence, "the strongest case I have ever experienced"

says Leopold and Loeb "had broken down at precisely the same minute"


	...Brings Silk Pajamas.

	Leopold's valet arrived at the hotel last night with silk pajams for each of the boys and a change of clothes. These were left for the boys, as they were still sleeping. When Leopold and Loeb awakened after their first sleep they were asked if they were hungry.

	"Yes, I am very hungry," said Leopold. A turkey dinner was served a short itme later by waiters from the hotel. The policemen on gurad saw that all of the kinves and forks were removed when the waiters came for the trays.

	Soon after their meal the prisoners retired and were reported to be "sleeping like babies" by Sergeant Thomas O'Malley of the state's attoreny's office, who had been left in charge of the guard.


night and day between this an NY Times

this one seems like the kind of article elite wouldn't like? it's not calling for a dictatorship of the proletariat or anything

goes on to describe search uncovering incontrovertible evidence


	...Only Disputed Points

	State's Attorney Crowe declared the only conflicting statements in the two confessions were those dealing with which of the two youths had struck young Franks over the head with the cold chisel--the blow that kocked him unconscious.

	In order to clear this up the state's attorney brought them face to face and read their statements. Each accused the other of hatching the plot and of striking the blows that rendered young Franks unconscious.

	Nathan Striker of Blow?

	Thus it was finally settled and both boys agreed that Richard, who was driving, had called the boy into the car. Nathan had knocked him unconscious with the chisel and stuffed the gag into this mouth.


says both agreed Loeb was driving, called into car, and Leopold knocked him "unconscious" and stuffed gag into his mouth

how did history end up remembering his as Loeb did it?


goes on to report them with police retracing crime

reports same story of Loeb fainting, but more detail, says it was after store owner identified him as "Mr. Mason"


goes over their visit to different places, "VISIT DEATH CHISEL STORE"

reports on suicide wish by Leopold:


	...It was here that Nathan expressed a wistful desire to step off into the unkown.

	'I'd like to jump off this bridge," he said. Chief of Detectives Hughes grasped him by the arm. "If you ever went over this bridge," the chief said, "you never would come back." And he took a tighter hold on the student's arm.

	"That would suit me," Leopold replied as they led him off the bridge and back into the automobile.


tribune telling makes Leopold look more like a little bitch

NY times makes him out like some brooding anti-hero, "surrounded by detectives" like the guy from The Professional

continues going over finding grusome details of murder

has them quoted saying they threw Franks shoes and belt buckle out of window of car

goes over Englund testimony:


	...Englund calmly shatered the car alibi.

	"That's not right," he said. "That Willys-Knight was in the Leopold garage all day from 1 o'clock in the afternoon until 10 o'clock that night."


NY Times emphasized Englund waiting there for four hours, this was his employer's son, nobody expected him to do anything but verify the alibi and was one of 12 expected to do so

Chicago Tribune just "he calmy shattered their alibi", which makes him sound badass


their story on Loeb being told is in some places word-for-word for NY times


next article (on page 2):

	Confession Bares Crime Plot of Amazing Depth, Cruelty

	Last night the signed confessions of Nathan E. Leopold Jr. and Richard Loeb were sealed by State's Attorney Crowe and placed in a safety deposit vault, there to remain until the two millionaires' sons are brought to trial for the murder of young Robert Franks. They may be read to the grand jurors but the contents, word for word, will not be given to the public until they become a part of the court record of a murder trial without a parallel in criminal annals.


confession transcript not available to journalists? I guess they got details from interviewing people involved


	But quotations taken here and there from the statements, liberally from memory, by State's Attorney Crowe and his assistants give some idea of the amazing business-like manner in which the youthful scholars planned and executed their crime and the equally amazing frankness with which they recounted the details of the thing "that would give one a thrill."

	Planned Since Last Fall.

	"We had planned since last fall--some time in November, I think--to kidnap some rich boy, kill him and get money from his father for ransom."


opens up right away with "we planned to kill a boy"


goes on to quote one of them saying they planned to hit him on head and gag him


	...HE WAS WEAK

	"It was easier than we thought. He was weak. When he started to resist we hit him on the head and stuffed the gag into his mouth. We didn't need to use the ether. He must have been dead within five minutes after we started--while we were still going along 50th street."


this quote doesn't show up anywhere in confession: http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html

paraphrase at best

don't think they ever say anything like "it was easy"/"he was weak"

	
	[Which one hit him? That was the only point in the confession in which the old human failing of attempting to "pass the buck" cropped out. The boys each accepted half the blame, but they had to be brought together before this one point was cleared up.]

	"You hit him first, Dick." Leopold said.

	"No, Babe, don't you remember? I was driving. I couldn't have hit him first because he was in the back seat with you? I was the one that called him by name and got him into the car. You didn't know him Don't you remember?"

	That point was cleared up.


from the transcript:


http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html
	[Loeb:] At this time I was driving.

	"We proceeded north on Ellis Avenue until we caught a glimpse of Robert Franks coming south on the west side of Ellis Avenue.  As we passed him, he was just coming across or past 48th Street.  We turned down 48th Street and turned the car around, Leopold getting into the back seat.  I drove the car, then, south on Ellis Avenue, parallel to where young Franks was, stopped the car, and while remaining in my seat, opened the front door and called to Franks that I would give him a ride home.  He said, no, he would just as soon walk, but I told him that I would like to talk with him about a tennis racket, so he got in the car. 

	...Leopold reached his arm around young Franks, grabbed his mouth and hit him over the head with a chisel.

	..."This was around five o' clock, I don't know the exact time.  At this time Leopold grabbed Franks and carried him over back of the front seat and threw him on a rug in the car.  


Loeb says he's driving, Leopold in back seat, Loeb opened front door, Franks got in car in front seat, Leopold "reached his arm around" and hit him, later pulled him into back seat and gagged him


	[Leopold:] "Everything that he read there is true, is it?" Schoemaker asked.

	"Yes, sir."

	"I have some corrections," Leopold said.  "In the first place, the date as given by Mr. Loeb is about a month or two at the most before the crime took place.  As I remember it quite distinctly, we started planning this thing as early as November 1923.

	"In the second place, the suggestion was his, not mine.

	"In the third place, the Rent-A-Car is at 14th and not 16th Street.  The little restaurant to which he refers is also at 13th, not 1538 Wabash.  The hardware store to which he refers is not at 47th, but between 55th and 56th, on Cottage Grove Avenue.

	"I did not bind the chisel with tape; he did.  The hip boots were not my brother's, but mine.  The place that he mentioned getting the car was at 14th and not 16th Street.

	"At the time the Franks boy entered our car, I was driving, not Mr. Loeb and Mr. Loeb was in the back seat.  It was Mr. Loeb who struck him with the chisel, and not I.


when read to him Leopold had some corrections, some trivial, but some major: Loeb planned it and Leopold was driving, says Loeb hit Franks


	[Leopold:] "Richard Loeb.  He replied no, but Richard said, well, come in a minute.  I want to ask you about a certain tennis racket.  After he had gotten in, I stepped on the gas, proceeded south on Ellis Avenue to 50th Street.  In the meantime Richard asked Robert if he minded if we took him around the block, to which Robert said, no.  As soon as we turned the corner, Richard placed his one hand over Robert's mouth to stifle his outcry, with his right beating him on the head several times with a chisel, especially prepared for the purpose.  The boy did not succumb as readily as we had believed so for fear of being observed Richard seized him, and pulled him into the back seat.  Here he forced a cloth into his mouth.  Apparently the boy died instantly by suffocation shortly thereafter.  We proceeded out to Calumet Boulevard in Indiana, drove along this road that leads to Gary, being a rather deserted place.  We even stopped to buy a couple of sandwiches and some drinks for supper." 

	..."Then Dick opened the front door and yelled, 'Hey, Bob.'  He came over to the car and Dick asked him if he couldn't give him a lift home.  He declined, but Dick said, 'Come in a minute.  I want to talk to you about a tennis racket.'"

	"That was the time he got into the car."

	"Yes."

	"Where were you sitting at that time?"

	"I was sitting at the driver's wheel.  Dick was in the rear seat." 


Leopold's original confession was that he was driving, Leob was in back seat and opened front door to call to Franks, Loeb hit him and pulled him into back seat


	[Loeb:] "Well, I think that will be enough.  Are there any corrections you wish to make?"

	Richard said, "There are certain corrections that Leopold has made in mine that are not important, such as 14th street, and the boots being his, instead of his brother's, which don't amount to a damn, I mean it don't make any difference, they are not important, and don't affect the case.  However, I would like to say this.

	"In the first place he says that that chisel was wrapped by me.  It was wrapped by him, and wrapped by him in Jackson Park.  He brought it in and put it in the car and he wrapped that chisel while waiting there in Jackson Park in that little nine hole golf house.  All right. 

	"In the second place he mentioned that the idea of the thing, that the main thing was to get the place and the means of throwing that package, and he stuck on that idea of the train and it was his idea.  But he doesn't mention the method of the killing, that he had that very well conceived and planned out, as evidenced by the ether in the car, which was absolutely the notion that he followed through.  The boy was to be etherized to death, and he was supposed to do that, because I don't know a damn thing about it and he does.  He has a number of times chloriformed birds and things like that, and he knows ornithology and I don't know a damn thing about that.

	..."So there are one or two other things.  In the first place I never touched that body after the hydrochloric acid was poured on that body.  After the hydrochloric acid was poured on that body you stepped into that culvert with your boots on and you took hold of the feet and gave the body a push and the body splashed in there and it splashed on your pants too, and you worried about it."

	"Who hit him with a chisel?" interrupted Crowe.

	"He did."

	"Who is 'he'?" Crowe asked, getting it all down in the record.

	"Nathan Leopold Jr.  He was sitting up in the front seat.  I said he was sitting in the front seat.  I mean I was sitting up in the front seat," Richard fumbled.  "That is obviously a mistake.  I am getting excited.  This Franks boy got up in the front seat.  Now he was a boy that I knew.  If I was sitting in the back seat he would have gotten into the back seat with me.  He was a boy I know, and i would have opened the door and motioned him in that way.  As it was, he got in the front seat with me because I knew the boy and I opened the front door.  He didn't see Babe [Nathan Leopold] until he was inside the car.  He stood at the same place.  I introduced him to this Franks boy and then took him into the car.  I took him into the car and when he got in the car I said, 'you know Babe?  This is Bobby Franks'.  


Loeb appears annoyed and Leopolds small corrections. starts of with correciton Leopold wrapped the chisel. Says Leopold didn't mention planned method of killing, which Loeb says was to ether him and that was Leopold's job since Leopold was ornithologist and chloroformed birds. Loeb apparenty sees the killing as happening sometime after being struck in the head (says Franks "unconsicous" during ride).

Loeb insits he never touched the body after the acid was poured on it, and that Leopold grabbed the body by his feet

at this point Crowe interrupts: "who hit him with a chisel?"

Loeb says Leopold sitting in back seat, argues Franks would get in front seat since Leob was driving and Franks knew Loeb. Loeb says he opened the front door and motioned for Franks to get in.


	...[Leopold:] "Have you got anything to say to that?" asked Mr. Savage.

	"Yes I have," responded Leopold.

	"Nathan wants to say a word," said Mr. Savage.

	"His correction about what car I was driving down I think is correct.  Those are all absurd dirty lies.  He is trying to get out of this mess.  I can explain to you myself exactly how I opened the door to let the Franks boy in, and he got up from the back seat, leaned over forward and spoke to the boy from the back.  I was driving the car.  I am absolutely positive.


Leopold responds that Loeb is lying and trying to get out of it. He reasserts that he was driving and Loeb was in the back seat, but this time says he himself opened the front door.



Does this clear things up like Chicago Tribune says?

Leopold tends to change his story

but the transcript doesn't show the point being "cleared up," just clues pointing one way

why are their quotes so wrong?

they say upfront its from Crowe and associates from memory


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354886127/
	...And the clothing:

	"We drove around with him in the car for nearly four hours, until it got heavy dusk. Then we began undressing him in the car; took off everything but the underwear and stockings before we got to the culvert."


from confession:


http://www.crimearchives.net/1924_leopold_loeb/html/confessions.html
	We followed that for only a short distance, then turned down another deserted road, leading west.  We stopped the car, got out, removed young Franks' shoes, hid them in some bushes, and removed his pants and stockings, placing them in the car.  We did this in order that we might be saved the trouble of too much undressing him later on.


some of the bogus quotes make it sound worse "he was weak/it was easy," but on this hides key thing that pointed to rape

how did they get this wrong? Crowe would later point to the quote about clothes in court to argue there was rape. If this was Crowe, or he was there, how did he get in completely backwards in telling to the press?


	...Why did they do it?

	"Well, it was the kind of a thing there would be a thrill in and we wanted some easy money. We made a few mistakes. I should have picked up my glasses. I didn't know I dropped them. We thought we had the whole thing airtight, but it wasn't. That's all."




...


Chicago Tribune June 1 pg 3

genevieve forbes wrote a long article psychoanalyzing them

keeps comparing to Oscar wilde, said they should have written a book instead, and the main character of what they acted out was dumb for dropping glasses, Leopold more bold, hints at both being messed up for being smart at early age somehow. "dangers of precocity"

article gets sort-of poetic in some places (never trust a poet)

Forbes did cool story here that got Ellis Island commisioner fired: http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/opinion/commentary/ct-genevieve-forbes-ellis-island-immigration-flashback-perspec-0417-jm-20160414-story.html

this article on her written 2016 by Emilie Le Beau Lucchesi


from Forbes article:

	
	...It may or may not be significant that two weeks before the Frnaks boy was kidnaped Leopold changed his seat in his class on criminal law. For the entire semester he had sat in the front row. Several weeks ago he slipped into a seat in the very back of the room.


apparently not going for the "Leopold the Ubermench" thing

author goes on to speculate Leopold left the eyeglasses there on purpose

article ends asking: "What next?"



this is weird:


http://articles.chicagotribune.com/1997-06-08/news/9706300069_1_circulation-prospective-wives-women
	In 1921, Genevieve Forbes traveled steerage from Ireland posing as an immigrant. Her disclosures on the new arrivals' treatment led to a congressional hearing and a shakeup at Ellis Island.

	She was the first woman to interview Al Capone. "The people want booze, and I sell 'em what they want," he told her. She covered the Leopold-Loeb murder case. The trial judge thoughtfully delayed the sentencing over a weekend to accommodate her wedding to John Herrick, a fellow Tribune reporter on the case.


another pg 3 article:

	SEARCH FOR NEW THRILLS MOTIVE, SLAYERS ASSERT

	Delusions of Being Great Minds Responsible

	BY JOHN HERRICK.


opens up slamming Leopold and Loeb for their perverted fantasy world be shattered by a pair of glasses

	...Chauffeuer Supplies Key.

	A chauffeur who know, "because he had to repair the brakes," destroyed an alibi conceived by minds which had fed on text books as readily as novels, had searched for the key to understanding in the works of erotic writers and had pampered emotion for emotion's sake--destroyed it with the story of a "slip" which the most illiterate criminal would not have overllooked.

	A workman taking an unused path began the train of investigation which finally wrote into the criminal records of the city of Chicago the solution of one of the strangest crimes of local history--a solution as baffling in intangibility of motive as the crime itself.


writing style weird

remember Herrick the one who wrote the story with poetry about a "grey ghost" whispering the name "babe[y]" into Frank Sr.'s ear, ".Always Considered as "Baby.""

he later married forbes and judge dealayed Leopold Loeb case for their wedding

in these first passages emphasizes strangnesss of coincidences that led to Leopold's arrest

reminiscent of Joel Achenbach reporting on how "the martian" movie came about, sounded incrediulous and mocked the idea of story behind it


	...Crime Drama Unique.

	Never in Chcago, probably neverin the records of crime in any city int he world, has there ben a similar case.

	...In this crime, Leopold, to whom the confessions point as the leader--Leopold, who smoked and smiled even while he was telling the story of striking the Frnaks boy over the head--is the youngest student ever graduated from the University of Chicago. He is 19.


emphasizes drama of crime and romantacizes a bit

implies Leopold confessed to striking Franks, but that was not in confession and reported in same paper they blamed each other, then later reported resolved to say Leopold.

plays up mysteriousness of Leopold


	Loeb, the same age, who broke down first, whose tale of the murder was interrupted while he buried his face in his  hands and sobbed, was the youngest graduate of the University of Michigan.

	Leopold reads and speaks fiteen languages. During his college courses he habitually took twice the ordinary number of hours of study.

	PUZZLED FOR MOTIVE


says authorities cna't figure it out, they say they did for adventure and experience, "turned to the psychoanalyst as the only one who could straighten out the tangle of these minds"

	
	...And the psychologists had their theory. THey pictured these two, with thier brilliance of mind and their precocity, building up a structure of egotism. Theirs were the great minds of the world. And they had the ability to stand aside and watch themselves as they reacted to one stimuls after another.

	They had run through a scale of emotions, perverted emotions mostly. Then they had sought one more, and they picked on kidnaping and murder.


	...The need of money might have something to do with it, but stronger than this was the vision of seeing a whole city in turmoil. The "great minds," aloof on their self-constructed pedastal, were going to watch the "little minds" run about trying to solve this magnicent riddle of a dead boy hidden in the water of a ditch.

	So Robert Franks was killed.

	And so these adolescent spectators of their own emotions stood on the sidelines as the hunt for the killers went on. It was Leopold who went to the funeral of the object of their experiment, and who revisted the culvert in the swamp and helped the police in their investigations. Loeb took newspaper men in his car as they scoured the south side for news.

	The pair of glasses and the almost intense energy of the state's attorney's office and the police department that showed these intellects that they were not after all greater than the rest of the world they professed to scorn.

	Never in its history has theh drab old Criminal Court building, where criminals from petty theies to husband killers have been grilled and have had their day in court, seen the spectacle it saw early yesterday morning.


says motive might have been to watch "little minds" of city scramble

goes on to summarize case

summary misses some things

writing on glasses interestig

	...Places Glasses on Boy

	Strangely, it was these which postponed identification for a time. An undertaker's assistant, believing them to have been worn by the slain boy, palced them over the dead face.

	...GLASSES TO FORE

	Mr. Franks insisted on making a personal trip before he would believe the body was that of his son. And it was as he looked at the dead figure of his son, that the glasses suddenly became the focal point of the inquiry.


Franks father said "never wore glasses" no later than May 23rd, the search for owner of glasses didn't start till May 27th.


	...But Heath, too was eliminated.

	It was then that the spectacles, lost sight of for a time, became the center of interest. 



pg 4


	JACOB FRANKS THINKS SLAYERS OF SON INSANE

	Should Be Placed in Asylum, He Says.

	BY PAUL AUGSBURG.


qutoes J Franks, goes on about his life, disbelieve of Mrs. Franks


pg 5


	LEOPOLD FAMILY A BIG FACTOR IN CITY'S BUSINESS

	Stock Springs from German Refugees of '48.

	BY MAUREEN M'KERNAN.


goes over Leopold family, wealth, connections

grandfather Samuel F. Leopold came one of a "band of German Jews, most of them professional men, all highly idealistic, and well educated, who came to America under the leadership of Carl Schurz in the late '40's and early '50s"

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Carl_Schurz
	Breaking with Republican President Ulysses S. Grant, Schurz helped establish the Liberal Republican Party. The party advocated civil service reform and opposed Grant's efforts to protect African American civil rights in the Southern United States during Reconstruction.
	
	...Schurz moved to New York City after Hayes left office in 1881 and briefly served as the editor of the New York Evening Post and The Nation, and later became the editorial writer for Harper's Weekly.

	...U.S. Senator

	...In 1870, Schurz helped form the Liberal Republican Party, which opposed President Ulysses S. Grant's annexation of Santo Domingo and his use of the military to destroy the Ku Klux Klan in the South under the Enforcement Acts.


back to notes from article:

leopold sr married Florence Foreman

"as early as 1876 Nathan E. Leopold was known in transportation circles."

became pres of steamship comany, member of shipping comapny Leopold & Austrian

sisters intermarried with some of the city's largest fortunes

Florence Foreman daughter of Gerhart Foreman, Chicago banker.

her sisters are Mrs. Arthur Schwab, Mr.s Julius Rosneberg, and Mr.s Henry Steele.

	
"The daughers of that Samuel Leopold who fled Germany because he was too much of an idealist, married as well and as wisely as did their brother."

aunts on fathers side are Mr.s Sam Steele, Mrs. P.D. Block, Mrs. Henry Greenebaum, and Mrs. Leo Strauss

uncle Oscar G. Foreman


pg 5


	'DICK INNOCENT,' LOEBS PROTEST; PLAN DEFENSE

	Old Family Aghast at Confession.

	BY MAURINE WATKINS.

	"He couldn't have done it. We know he's innocent."

	That's what they said at first, the nearest relatives and friends of young Dick Loeb, in spite of the boy's confession to the murder of little Robert Franks.

	"Loeb" as the name of a murderer falls strangely on Chicago ears. For the people of that name are written in the book of Chicago's history as buildings and leaders in philanthropy, charity and educational movements.

	Abert H. Loeb, young Richard's father, is connected closely by business and social ties with Julis Rosenwald, the Jewish philanthropist. And the boy's uncle is Jacob M. Loeb, for many years a member of the board of education and its spritied president from 1916-1919.


goes over loeb family

came from Germany after unscucessfl revolution of 1848 "cultured immigrants of the higher type."

	...the real impetus to his career came when Ernest Magerstadt was made sheriff and appointed young Loeb, then a struggling lawyer, as his attorney.

	Through his partner he met the latter's brother-in-law, Julias Rosenwald, of Sears, Roebuck & Co., and in 1901 he gave up his law practice to become secretary of the concern. Seven years later he became vice president and treasurer, an office which he now fills.


smarired Anna Bohnen, "an active social and welfare worker"


	...Father Built Golf Course for Son.

	When he came home that June, his father, proud of the boy's brillian scholastic record, built a miniature nine hole golf course in the "back yard" at 5017 Ellis avenue. And there young Loeb "went around" with his friends. And in that same yard he played tennis--tennis with young "Bobby" Franks!

	Last fall Richard reentered Chicago university to work on his master's dgeree in history and there renewed his friendship with Nathan Leopold, who was studying law in the university and also teaching ornithology.

	Both were sons of wealthy parents; both had position among the Jewish "400"; both had brilliant minds.


https://books.google.com/books?id=7XkzdlMKTcgC&pg=PA134&lpg=PA134&dq=%22Jewish+400%22&source=bl&ots=BTRuGCV5KS&sig=z2jwB82xirWcPnzkBNUaIZW5kSI&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjLoYnBw4baAhUL44MKHeAtArMQ6AEIOTAG#v=onepage&q=%22Jewish%20400%22&f=false
	Listing the German-Jewish forebears of both families along with their various intermarriages to members of other rich Chicago Jewish families, journalists concluded that the Leopold and Loeb clans formed part of an elite and somewhat mysterious "Jewish '400'." In a comparable commentary, another reported asserted that "Nathan Leopold, Jr. is related to every branch of a little royalty of wealth which Chicago has long recognized."


back to article:


	Of the two, Leopold seems to have the more dominating personality and the training--not by practice, but by philosophical thought--that would best fit him to plan such a crime. Leob's education was along general lines, but Leopold had specialized at an age when specialization is dangerous.

	And to this shadowy world, where he ruled as king, he admitted Loeb--for "Narcissus" mast have his mirror!

	...Were they bored by a life which left them nothing to be desired, no obsticles to overcome, no goal to attain?

	Needed New Thrills?

	Were they jaded by the jazz-life of gin and girls so taht they needed so terrible a thing as murder to give them new thrills ?


author pointing to "affluenza?


	...A confession which the family still refused to believe--Mr. Loeb, confined to his bed, his wife weeping alone, and the two brothers hurrying from their homes.

	"He is innocent," they say, "and confessed merely to get sleep. It can be repudiated when he comes to trial!"

	Attorney Charles Adler has been in conference all day Saturday; he is associated with James Hamilton Lewis and it is possible that the ex-senator may be cheif counsel for the defense.

	Mr.s Jacob Loeb, the boy's aunt, is in San Francisco. As she called the Chronicle for "latest developments in the case," this message flashed over the wire from State Attorney Robert E. Crowe:

	"We have a hanging case and are ready to go to the jury today!"


I like this author


pg 5:

no author listed


	SLAYERS EVOLVE ELABORATE PLAN TO GET RANSOM

	Would Hae Had Cash Tossed from Train.

	Prosecutors and detectices ...characterized the plans of Nathan Leopold and Richard Loeb ... as perhaps the most elaborate and most likely of success ever evolved in a kidnapping plot.

	No band of hardened, veteran criminals, it was stated, ever plotted more carefull, with more acumen. had Jacob Franks followed out their instructions ... it is almost certain, the detectives said, they would not have been apprehened and in addition, gone free with the money.

	Had Elaborate Plan


Leopold and Loeb's plan sucked

why write this?


...


https://chicagology.com/notorious-chicago/leopoldloeb/

some summarys and clippings from reporting on the case


http://history.journalism.ku.edu/1920/1920.shtml
1924 — Leopold and Loeb
	Nathan Leopold and Richard Loeb

	Another "trial of the century." The two teenagers from highly privileged Chicago families, Nathan Leopold and Richard Loeb, kidnapped, killed and mutilated a 14-year-old neighbor. The case challenged previously held notions of juvenile killers with below-average IQs. Leopold would describe the pair as evil geniuses who were above normal standards of morality. Their attorney, Clarence Darrow, introduced the psychiatric defense into the legal system. The jury and the press accepted Darrow's argument that society, schools and violent social conditions were to blame, and the killers avoided execution.

...


------




https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/06/04/104700039.html?pageNumber=6
	Indications of a Third Murder.
	CHICAGO, June 3 (Associated Press). — An unofficial investigation has begun into the possibility that Nathan Leopold and Richard Loeb may have been connected with the death several months ago of Melvin Wolf, who left the home of his wealthy grandparents to mail a letter and whose body was found in Lake Michigan. Relatives were never satisfied with the decision of authorities that he committed suicide.


in same issue as "FRANKS WOULD HANG MURDERERS HIMSELF"



Chicago Tribune Jun 3rd:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/354887975/
	LEOPOLD, LOEB LINKED WITH TRACY MURDER

	Jail Doors Closed on Accused Pair.

	...Chief of Detectives Hughes and Detectives Johnson, Crot, and Gourtland announce that evidence is being sought to support the charge that Loeb and Leopold shot and killed Freeman Louis Tracy, a student of the University of Chicago, on Nov. 25.

	BY JAME DOHERTY

	...Two incidents had tended to direct strong suspicion against the youths. These were Ream's recognition of them and the finding of two automatic revolvers in Leopold's room yesterday.

	Tracy's body was found on the morning of Nov. 25, 1923, a steel jacketed bullet through the temple.

	...Ream had been accosted at about 2 a. m. Nov. 20 ...He said two men in a large touring car forced him into the automobile at pistol points, beat him into unconsciousness

	...Suspects Other Thrills.

	...working on the theory Leopold and Loeb had not performed their first experiment on a human body when they kidnaped Robert Franks





https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/06/06/104040295.html
	TOPICS OF THE TIMES.
	FRIDAY, JUNE 6, 1924, P. 16

	What is reported to have been the consensus of opinion among the psychiatrists now convened at Atlantic City as to the Franks murder case is to the effect that the real responsibility for the act of LEOPOLD and LOEB rests with their parents.


Tribune June 16


https://www.newspapers.com/image/354904868/?terms=Franks
	TWO EXPERTS SEE ABNORMALITY IN FRANKS SLAYERS

	..."abnormal" and should not be hanged for the "experiment" they practiced

	...Leopold. It was he who engineered the entire plot and worked out all the intricate details, the aliensts believe. And for what reason?

	Leopold is an experimenter in human emotions, say the mental examienrs. He wanted to kill a human being so he could learn "what a man who has committed a cold blooded murder thinks about." He was curious to know how it felt to wake up the morning after and realize he had taken the life of a fellow human.

	He had practically no moral sense, some of the intricate tests to which has been submitted during the alst three days revealed, it was said.

	...He believes that persons of unusual intelelctual attainments, who have been carefully trained, are above ordinay laws of mankind and that it is not wrong for them to do waht might be wrong to a duller person.

	...He May Be Cured.

	His case, it was declared, is subject to treatment and may be cured. It is necessary that such eprsons be put under great restraint and supervision of mental and physical specialists who understand dealing with abnormalities.

	Both youths present the most amazing pathological case that has come to the attention of the doctors who have had them under observation, it was agreed. 




https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/07/19/104700989.html
	LOEB SLAYER, HE ADMITS.
	SATURDAY, JULY 19, 1924, P. 4

	Loeb admits he did the actual killing


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/07/28/119042184.html
	LOEB 'MASTER MIND' OF FRANKS SLAYING, ALIENISTS REPORT
	MONDAY, JULY 28, 1924, P. 1

	CHICAGO, July 27. -- Richard A. Loeb was the "master mind," Nathan F. Leopold Jr. was a mental slave, according to the psychiatric report, based on their examinations of the slayers of Robert Franks by Dr. Carl M. Bowman of Boston and Dr. H.S.… More



https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/08/07/104046570.html
	EXPERT SAYS LOEB ADMITTED HE WAS THE ACTUAL SLAYER
	" He Told Me He Struck the Blow" That Killed Boy, Dr. Glueck Testifies.
	CHICAGO, Aug. 6 (Associated Press). — The defense in the trial of the kidnappers and slayers of Robert Franks temporarily exhausted its source of expert testimony today, forced an early adjournment, and tomorrow will introduce the first of its lay witnesses, who will continue to give Judge John B. Caverly evidence on which is based the plea for mitigation in the punishment of Nathan F. Leopold Jr. and Richard Loeb. 



https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/08/08/99454344.html?pageNumber=1
	STATE ACCUSES GIRL OF LYING FOR LOEB
	FOUR CHUMS TESTIFY
	Crowe Cries 'Perjury' as Former Sweetheart Declares Youth 'Irrational and Infantile.'
	CHICAGO, Aug. 7 (Associated Press). — The prosecution tonight claimed a rout of five witnesses called by the defense today to testify in furtherance of its plea for mitigation when Judge John R. Caverly sentences Nathan F. Leopold Jr. and Richard Loeb for kidnapping and murdering young Robert Franks. 


I think this is the article Meg Greenfield wrote about

sets up Crowe as bad guy, a running theme in NY Times articles since May


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/09/07/98807256.html?pageNumber=175
	LOEB CASE INTRODUCES NEW PSYCHOLOGY
	Judge Caverly's Rulings Mark Modern Era in Criminal Procedure
	JUDGE CAVERLY'S procedure in the Leopold-Loeb case at Chicago is an expression of a marked tendency, daily becoming more manifest, to place at the service of our courts the new knowledge of human psychology they must have if they are to do justice to the community as well as to the offender. 

	...Judge Caverly met the issue presented to him like a man of the modern world. He may nto have known much about the new psychology--few of us do--but he was not, like the State's Attoreny, content to repose on the wisdom of the nineteenth century. He, at least, was willing to learn, so he admitted to the evidence.


remember they brought in a bunch of "eiminent psychologists" and tried to get Frued on the stand


	He was untroubled by the fact, of which he cannot have been wholly unconcsious, that in so doing he was opening the steel-barred doors of the criminal courts to a new concept of responsibility for crime. For that is what his decision amounted to.

	...What makes the CHicago hearing most momentous for criminal procedure is the fact that three or four of the best of those specialists--men who are in the forefront of this epoch-making enterprise of discovery--contibuted their wisdom to the proceedings. These men were not of the ordinary run of "alienists", who make a buisness of testifying in capital cases on the legal issue of insanity. They are among the makers of the new science of human nature.

	It is not for a layman to say whether they were right or wrong in the interpretation of the mental conditions of the two defendants. Buy if they were wrong, nobdoy could be right.

	It might be well to emphasize at this point that Judge Caverly was well within the law, as well as far-sighted and courages, in deciding to admit evidence in mitigation of the Leopold-Loeb crime. No informed and reasonable mind can doubt that the procedure he adopted was legally correct from a technical standpoit. The prevailling impress that, after a plea of guilty, no trial is necessary is sound.

	...Whatever Judge Caverly's decision next Wednesday may be, the Leopold-Loeb case will go down in the annals of criminal procedure as a triumph for modern ideas of justice enlightened by the science of human psychology. That it should have received such precedented publicity will make its influence on criminal jurispudence so much the more profound.



https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/09/12/301992222.html?pageNumber=19
	Governor Has Pardoning Power.
	SPRINGFIELD, Ill., Sept. 11 — It is within the power of the Governor to pardon Richard A. Loeb and Nathan F. Leopold Jr., according to a statement made in the executive office of Governor Small today.



https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/09/15/104051208.html?pageNumber=16
	LEOPOLD AND LOEB CALLED MODERNISTS
	Should Have Been Put to Death, Says Rev. Dr. John Roach Straton.
	The Franks murder case was the subject of sermons yesterday by the Rev. Dr. John Roach Straton at the Calvary Baptist Church and the Rev. Charles Francis Potter at the West Side Unitarian Church. Dr. Straton last night criticized the sentence of Leopold and Loeb, the two slayers, to life imprisonment as being "too lenient," and said that the case marked an "almost criminal breakdown in the efficiency of our criminal law." 



https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/10/02/101615982.html?pageNumber=26
	FRANKS CASE JUDGE FOUND IN HOSPITAL
	Friend of Caverly Says He Had Nervous Breakdown After Decision — Now Improving.
	CHICAGO, Oct., 1. — Judge John R. Caverly, who on Sept. 10, sentenced Richard Loeb and Nathan Leopold Jr., to life imprisonment for the murder of Robert Franks, was stricken with a nervous breakdown immediately at the close of the trial, but is much improved in a hospital here, former Judge C.A. McDonald announced today after visiting the Judge. 


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1924/10/28/101618547.html?pageNumber=1
	Albert Loeb, Father of Franks's Slayer, Dies In Chicago Home Where Crime Was Planned
	CHICAGO, Oct. 27. — Albert H. Loeb, father of Richard A. Loeb, who, with Nathan F. Leopold Jr., is serving a life sentence in Joliet Prison for the kidnapping and murder of Robert Franks, died tonight in his Chicago home, within a short distance of the residence which had housed the victim of the crime that shortened his life. 

	...Before he collapsed under the knowledge that his favorite was a boy lsayer Mr. Loeb, as Vice President of Sears, Roebuck & Co., the Chicago mail-order house, was rated as one of Chicago's keenest business men.

------



https://books.google.com/books?id=tnKBCwAAQBAJ&pg=PA22&lpg=PA22&dq=Leopold+Carl+Sandburg+released+from+prison&source=bl&ots=BJXBqz8Phs&sig=6n64Ma7XG-zJBMxeqZtmu7sd4Os&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwiZ-YK00YbaAhWMiYMKHWdICSwQ6AEIXzAJ#v=onepage&q=Leopold%20Carl%20Sandburg%20released%20from%20prison&f=false
	...In time, inmates who participated in the malaria experiments were given some consideration toward release by the Illinoise governor, but political issues constantly inhibited parole boards from freeing Leopold. One board chaired by Joseph Lohman, a former Cook County (Chicago) sheriff who later serverd as dean of the school of Criminlolgy at the University of California, Berkely, seemd on the verge of releasing Leopold after a number of impressive witnesses testified on his behalf. But that board was fired, and a different one appointed within hours after a new governor was sworn in on January 1, 1953. It would be another five years before Leopold was released. That release was helepd greatly by the appearance before the parle board, speaking for Leopold, of the eminent poet Carl Sandburg and Father Eligius Wier, the Catholoc chaplain when Leopold was admitted to Joliet and his friend thereafter.

	Others supporting Leopold included Hans Mattick, who had worked closely with Leopold when Mattick served in the prison as a sociologist-actuary, offering predictions on the likelihood of the success of individual inmames if they were to be paroled.





https://www.newspapers.com/image/139972792/
	LEOPOLD REWNEWS PLEA FOR PAROLE

	Puts Blame on Loeb.

	Leopold told the board he was led into the 91924 murder of 14-year-old Bobby Franks in Chicago by his idol, Richard Loeb.

	"I wish to God I could explain more," Leopold said.

	Leopold, son of a wealthy family, said when the murder occured he was 19 and an "intelligent savage" with no more sense. Loeb, who was killed in a prison browl in 1936, plotted the crime, Leopold said.

	He made his plea for parole after his attorney had presented witnesses, affidavits, letters an dother evidence in favor of supervised freedom for Leopold.

	...Among the supporters for Leopold's plea was Carl Sandburg, 80-year-old poet and historian, who told the board Leopold would be a good risk for parole.

	"I told warden (Joseph) Ragen some time ago I wanted to meet Leopold," Sandburg testified. "I told him I regarded him as a hero."

	Newsmen got the impression that Sandburg was classifying Leopold as a hero. However, Sandburg told newsmen later he said he referred to warden Ragen as a hero and not to Leopold.



------


http://www.thecrimson.com/article/1957/11/29/the-parole-of-the-century-pthe/
	The Parole of the Century
	NO WRITER ATTRIBUTED November 29, 1957

	The case of Nathan Leopold, participant in the sensational Loeb-Leopold murder of 1923, comes before the Illinois Parole Board this January. Last year, Leopold's parole was granted, only to be vetoed by Governor William J. Stratton. The explanation for Stratton's refusal to parole Leopold was that it is politically inexpedient; public antipathy to his release is believed to be great.

	There is more at stake in this case than the release or continued imprisonment of one man. To refuse a deserved parole damages the whole penal system of this country. Public pressure should not be allowed to determine the validity of the parole system. Even the people who believe in retributive penal justice should be satisfied by the thirty-five years Leopold has served. 

	...Meyer Levin, who intelligently examined the Loeb-Leopold case in his recent book Compulsion, believes that the murder served as a catharsis for Leopold's psychic problems, releasing him into a normal mental life. 

	...It is often argued that the release of people like Leopold removes much of the fear of punishment deterring acts of crime. Anyone at all familiar with the motivations of criminals knows that fear of punishment plays little part in the anticipation of a criminal act. There is no reason to assume that the release of Leopold or of anyone else will have any effect whatsoever on the crime rate. 

	...These are more positive arguments for Leopold's release. Besides being a model prisoner, Leopold has redesigned the prison library, learned to be a medical technician, taught classes in prison, served in cancer experiments, and participated on the board for parole prediction on which he has written two published articles. Leopold, who speaks thirty-six languages, is obviously intelligent and could be a potentially very valuable member of society. Indeed, he has often reiterated that, if released, he will go to Puerto Rico and serve as a medical technician for the natives in the manner of Albert Schweitzer. 

	Even if Leopold were totally lacking in intellectual abilities or altruistic purpose, there would be no logical reason for not granting him a parole. It is quite obvious that Leopold would long ago have been released if he had not participated in the "Crime of the Century," and if his parole would not raise a public clamor. It is to be hoped that Governor Stratton can transcend political expediency and not again veto the expected parole. If he does block Leopold's release, he is in effect declaring invalid the idea of the parole system.



https://www.wsws.org/en/articles/2001/09/loeb-s08.html
	A landmark in the fight against capital punishment in the US
	Lessons of the 1924 Leopold and Loeb murder case
	By Shannon Jones 



https://books.google.com/books?id=c8ptkc_pdkQC&pg=PA515&lpg=PA515&dq=%22Nathan+Leopold,+Sr%22&source=bl&ots=br-RjtwoE5&sig=vRwYjZYrOI8XI8p0zynveC0ZxsI&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjNidSiqv_ZAhUF24MKHXpODxkQ6AEIYzAN#v=onepage&q=%22Nathan%20Leopold%2C%20Sr%22&f=false
	Irving Stone re-created a scene, and dialogue, in which Loeb throws his arms around Darrow, begging him to "Save their lives! Get them a life sentence" and promising, "Money's no object. We'll pay you anything you ask." Stone and others place the nocturnal visit on June 2







https://www.smithsonianmag.com/history/leopold-and-loebs-criminal-minds-996498/
	Leopold and Loeb’s Criminal Minds
	In defense of murderers Leopold and Loeb, attorney Clarence Darrow thwarted a nation’s call for vengeance


	By Simon Baatz
	Smithsonian Magazine | Subscribe
	August 

	...Loeb wanted to commit a crime that would set all of Chicago talking. What could be more sensational than the kidnapping and murder of a child? If they demanded a ransom from the parents, so much the better. It would be a difficult and complex task to obtain the ransom without being caught. To kidnap a child would be an act of daring—and no one, Loeb proclaimed, would ever know who had accomplished it.

	...Darrow’s opposition to capital punishment found its greatest source of inspiration in the new scientific disciplines of the early 20th century. “Science and evolution teach us that man is an animal, a little higher than the other orders of animals; that he is governed by the same natural laws that govern the rest of the universe,” he wrote in the magazine Everyman in 1915. Darrow saw confirmation of these views in the field of dynamic psychiatry, which emphasized infantile sexuality and unconscious impulses and denied that human actions were freely chosen and rationally arranged. Individuals acted less on the basis of free will and more as a consequence of childhood experiences that found their expression in adult life. How, therefore, Darrow reasoned, could any individual be responsible for his or her actions if they were predetermined?


...



https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/opinions/1988/12/02/clarence-darrows-lesson/13d197e2-88f8-45d0-ac96-37089050cfdc/?utm_term=.fa2dc5ce656b


https://www.washingtonpost.com/opinions/we-would-impeach-trump-at-our-peril/2017/09/25/71c6f4aa-a21f-11e7-ade1-76d061d56efa_story.html?utm_term=.3032d45b9ba3


https://www.washingtonpost.com/opinions/whos-worse-for-the-nation--trump-or-pence/2017/08/07/d6815e12-7ba0-11e7-9d08-b79f191668ed_story.html?utm_term=.5e8e4ee73393




...


http://www.thevintagenews.com/2017/12/02/leopold-and-loeb/
	n fact, most observers believe that it was Loeb who did it but conversely, an eyewitness, Carl Ulvigh claimed that just minutes before Franks got in the car, it was Loeb who was driving the vehicle.

------


NY Times and Tribune back-and-forth good example of secretive communicating via press, "active measures"


like letters to Franks saying daughter next, killer sorry and will kill himself, would be understood as "sorry, if you keep going with this it will cost you, we have someone to frame"

"search for clews" means "search for someone to frame"


NY Times reporting "tribune will post tomorrow message that they will no longer report clews and tips that will impede investigation" means asking reporters at Tribune to stop frustrating efforst to find someone to frame

"investigation" means search for someone to frame


"fear Gertrude Barker may have been kidnapped because she could tell police license plate" sounds like a message that would have different meaning to different readers--like saying her life would be in jeoprady if she went to police since she was a witness. Reports had map of her route to show they knew she was there, tips that she was kidnapped were reported as "dismissed"



criminals will go to greath lengths to hide how they communicate:


https://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/worldnews/europe/italy/7655167/Mafia-godfather-used-radio-DJ-to-send-coded-messages.html
	'Mafia godfather' used radio DJ to send coded messages
	An alleged mafia godfather has been accused of using a DJ at a local radio station to send and receive coded messages. 

	Salvatore Pesce, who was jailed five years ago on suspicion of international narcotics trafficking, reportedly used Radio Olimpia, in the Calabrian town of Rosarno, to communicate with gangsters operating outside the prison.

	The station, which operated an unlicensed transmitter, was one of five companies raided and closed down by police in an operation that led to the arrest of 30 people accused of involvement in the Calabrian mafia or 'Ndrangheta, the Guardian reports.

	Michele Prestipino, the deputy chief prosecutor of Reggio Calabria who co-ordinated Operation All Inside, claimed that Radio Olimpia was "an important means of communication in the context of the clan's strategies".

	The scheme was uncovered when police listening to a conversation between Pesce and his wife noticed he was talking about requesting certain songs on the radio. Initially the officers put it down to a love of music, but then they realised that Pesce was using the songs to find out about the outcome of his application for release.

	According to a transcript leaked to the daily Il Giornale, Pesce told his wife, after scribbling down the name of a tune: "If it's positive you send me [this] song on the radio tonight. If it's negative you send me another."



http://www.businessinsider.com/the-head-of-the-sicilian-mafia-used-sheep-code-to-communicate-2015-8
	The head of the Sicilian Mafia, on the run for over 20 year, has been using "sheep code" to communicate with allies, the BBC reports.

	Eleven men associated with mob boss Matteo Messina Denaro were arrested recently, and according to the Italian police, Denaro communicated with them by leaving bits of papers under a rock in a field near a farm in western Sicily.

	The communication method called "pizzini" includes writing the messages in a secret code, according to AFP.

	Among the men arrested during raids across Sicily on Monday, two were over 70 years old, one of them, Vito Gondola, had the responsibility to call or text the members of the clan to let them know when a new message was ready.

	Police said many of the messages used to alert fellow criminals that a new "pizzini" was ready referred to sheep.

	Among the lines used were: "The sheep need shearing ... the shears need sharpening" or "The hay is ready." The Italian police said they do not believe the mafia members were discussing agricultural matters.

	Another phrase used was "I've put the ricotta cheese aside for you, will you come by later?"



https://boingboing.net/2017/04/25/quelli-che-il-calcio.html
	 Quelli che il Calcio (That which is Football) is one of Italy's top sports broadcasts and it is played in the country's prisons; it has a ticker that you can send SMSes to that then show up on screen.

	So Italy's mobsters hit on an ingenious plan to get messages to their bosses who were held incommunicado in prison: they sent coded messages to the broadcast that the mob-bosses saw and decoded.

	They were caught, though, and now the show has discontinued the SMS-ticker.

	    The show’s presenter, Simona Ventura, said she was “shocked” by the revelation


https://books.google.com/books?id=PY2RAgAAQBAJ&pg=PA81
    But dark clouds began to appear over this Okhrana-Bolshevik symbiosis. Lieutenant-Colonel I.P. Vasiliev started a secret campaign, attempting to expose Malinovsky's ties to the Okhrana. He sent a number of anonymous letters to the Menshevik newspaper Luch, stating that Malinovsky was an Okhrana agent. The paper's editors ignored what they considered to be slanders, but rumors began to spread. Vasiliev then wrote an anonymous letter to Lidia Dan, the wife of the Menshevik leader F.I. Dan, offering to meet her secretly and prove that he was a high Okhrana official and that he had evidence of Malinovsky's duplicity. He suggested that Dan signify her agreement to this meeting by a certain newspaper advertisement; she ignored the offer.



association of criminal organizations with press important--assocation with soviets and western press during cold war has a lot of documentation, French press with Okrhana leading up to WWI also supposedly a lot of documentation


apparently Tribune associated with Chicago mafia:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jake_Lingle
	Lingle's death brought to the public's attention his connections with gangsters.[2][5] Lingle turned out to have been setting the price of beer in Chicago and involved in organized dog racing and gambling. He had maintained two homes plus a suite at the Morrison Hotel and had a six-figure stockbroker account. High-placed friends of his in the police department resigned.[6] Not only did some people discover what Lingle's occupation really was, but also they learned about the gangs and about those with whom Lingle was associated.[7] [8]

	...Once other journalists learned about Jake Lingle's association with mobsters and his gambling activity, they began questioning the Chicago Tribune about it. In response, the Tribune said that it had not been aware of Lingle's activities. However, Frank Wilson, an IRS agent, said Robert McCormick, who was the Tribune's proprietor, had arranged a meeting between Lingle and himself when he was investigating the Al Capone case, and claimed this proved that the Tribune knew about Jake Lingle's involvement with gangs.[7]


https://books.google.com/books?id=aTghCgAAQBAJ&pg=PA851&lpg=PA851&dq=Jake+Lingle+Leopold&source=bl&ots=BV0ivmZZe9&sig=6nBXmstE52x5KBfSIGRJhcTLIlI&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwj27-OIoYjaAhVJ3IMKHQrbChEQ6AEITzAF#v=onepage&q=Jake%20Lingle%20Leopold&f=false

Lingle apparently covered Leopold-Loeb case but not sure what he said (yet)



Leopold Loeb case says something about Chicago and organized crime there

I think it's been said the cops were all crooked and working for the mob--so whey did they go to such much effort trying to frame someone for some rich boy's murder/rape? Why (apparently) did they let him get off the hook before? and why did they end up getting in argument with NY Times about it?

points to something with different motive than just organized crime and wider-reaching.


https://www.npr.org/2010/08/09/128872365/what-you-didnt-know-about-gangster-al-capone
	On how Chicago's population felt about the mob

	"I think at times Chicago's population felt terrorized, but it wasn't the machine guns that did it. ... There were hardly any incidents in which innocent civilians were killed in these gang wars. It was really the gangsters being killed. And because the police weren't doing anything to stop these guys, the fact that some of them died didn't stir a lot of sympathy among most Chicagoans. The real issue for most Chicagoans was the damage it did to the city's reputation. We already had an image of corrupt politics, we had a mayor who was widely perceived as being one of the most venal in the country's history, and then you've got these gangsters walking down the street with machine guns shooting it out on Michigan Avenue in broad daylight. This is, as you can imagine, not good for business. So the city's business leaders are really the first to raise a ruckus and say, 'Something must be done about this.' "


	...And one of the keys was that Capone was not tried by a jury of his peers. The jury was really hand-chosen — really hand-selected — by this judge. It was difficult to find men who were willing to convict bootleggers because everybody drank. But this was a jury that was not only willing to convict, it was eager to convict. To say they threw the book at Capone is a massive understatement.



...


not sure about this thesis but is interesting:


https://cdr.lib.unc.edu/indexablecontent/uuid:1e02579b-8ed6-4741-bd22-d87bf4990616
		Local newspapers are practically direct in
	dicators of the Camorra-dominated towns. 
	In his book Gomorra
	, Saviano describes a case in whic
	h a truce between two camorrist 
	families (the Spagnoli and the Di Lauro) is act
	ually printed in the local daily newspaper.

	...Through linguistic codes the Camorra contro
	ls who understands the news and what 
	information or interpretation to make unders
	tood. Consequently, depending on what gets 
	printed on a local level, it influences what 
	gets transmitted on a national level. Officially 
	there are two to three deaths 
	related to the Camorra a day in the Campania region. But, only 
	when the violence reaches catastrophic levels
	 does the news reach ears beyond the region. 
	Real events are silenced esp
	ecially by the Camorra’s way in which it manipulates news for 
	its own benefit. For example, when an innocen
	t person is accidentally
	 killed by a camorrist, 
	instead of showing the suffering that the family
	 feels as a consequence of their loss, the 
	newspapers will most likely reverse that pa
	in and suffering to the camorrist’s favor, 
	encouraging sympathy for him rather than th
	e wronged innocent.


this is what happened with Leopold--press ended up drumming up sympathy for him while victims like Franks, Heath, Barker on sidelines


	The innocent are silenced 
	and the guilty hold a monopoly on the communica
	tive platform. This kind of silencing 
	prohibits people from truly understanding wh
	at is happening in their own world.  
	Another way in which the Camorra exercises 
	its power within the media is with how 
	headlines are phrased for stories of “cronaca ne
	ra”; for instance, “Giustiziato Sindacalista.” 
	This headline indicates that one
	, the member of a la
	bor union of the town did something very 
	wrong, according to the Camorra, and that two, 
	he was executed without trial for these 
	actions; something perfectly fine according to
	 the Camorra. He was executed without trial 
	and, according to the headline, without any objec
	tions. Behind this headline is a power that 
	can decide to make justice, which is above al
	l not the state, and assassinate because a person 
	19 
	with an influential role erred.


"ability to make justice" demonstrated in Leopold-Loeb case too

media back and forth comes off as making a deal, deciding what's off limits for investigation and court case ahead of time

the Tribune article that said "killer's had ransom motive"/"no longer pursing pervert" and also said "glasses too small for a man, letter from detective novel",  "letter from well educated person," "voice judged to be young" and other things that make clear they know it was Leopold and Loeb sounds like an offer:

we know it's Leobpold and Loeb, we're going to say it was a ransom motive and killed accidently and we're not going to investigate "perversion"

so it's saying give them up and we'll go easy on them

the next day in NY Times it's reported that Franks family got death threats and a letter from the "suicidial" killer, apparently the response to this offer 


	Saviano’s main 
	point is that these headlines create a strange 
	world that is NOT separate from ours, although 
	it may seem that way. On
	 the contrary, it is a 
	world of business, of massacres; a world that dr
	esses major cities (Milan, Paris, Berlin, etc); 
	a world that is described usi
	ng banal, distorted, hyperbolic 
	and indifferent words, all of 
	which outsiders cannot understand unless tran
	slated by a bilingual person, much like 
	Giovanni Falcone. Both Saviano 
	and Falcone are examples of
	 having fluency in both the 
	“untainted” and the deformed languages. 

	...	Writer and activist Roberto Saviano has a 
	similar type of access to the Camorra’s 
	system. By growing up in the Camorra territory
	 and speaking its language, he was able to 
	infiltrate its deformed structure and language
	 of signs. The Camorra distorts not only the 
	economic system, which takes effect on both 
	national and global levels, but also the 
	Campania region’s communication system. The 
	“System” is so dominating that it even 
	overpowers the original structures of a fr
	ee market economy and freedom of speech. The 
	local newspaper headlines tend to present st
	ories from the Camorra’s point of view, 
	glorifying its crime and arrest
	s while ignoring or manipulatin
	g the stories of victims of 
	violence in order to sympathize with the cam
	orrists. While the Camorra abuses its power by 
	controlling how stories are writte
	n and publicized, the local audi
	ence of the media is, at the 
	same time, knowledgeable about the Camorra’s lingui
	stic code and silent 
	about its system of 
	domination.  



would be good to find other examples of a back and forth or deal being made with accompanying venona intercepts or entry in Mitrokhin archives

it's a shame historians don't have venona for this incident, they'd probably be able to learn a lot from it (this is probably why they don't like the NSA)


studying Camorra a good metaphor for other secretive organizations like them?


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Omert%C3%A0
	The basic principle of omertà is that it is not "manly" to seek the aid from legally constituted authorities to settle personal grievances. The suspicion of being a cascittuni (an informant) constituted the blackest mark against manhood, according to Cutrera. An individual who has been wronged is obligated to look out for his own interests by avenging that wrong himself, or finding a patron—but not the State—to do the job.[3]


could be part of why they didn't like Loeb, emphasized he talked first


also doesn't capture culture or how they work very well--Okhrana were running things in Bolshevik revolution, and clear the cops were on their side in Leopold-Loeb case


on culture of Yakuza:

https://www.c3.co/blog/interview-with-yakuza-reporter-jake-adelstein-about-the-mafia-magazine-they-dont-see-themselves-as-bad-guys/
	So what do they really do?

	They actually make their money on financial fraud, stock market manipulation, extortion, blackmail, racketeering, and illegal gambling – things we generally find socially unacceptable. Unlike their American or Mexican counterparts they do have some things that they don’t do, and the organization discourages their members from doing. In a Yakuza neighborhood, where they have an office, you’re not going to see houses getting broken into and people getting robbed on the street on their way home. One of the reasons Japan has a low crime rate is probably because the Yakuza play a role in keeping petty crime down and their members are discouraged from engaging in what we call street crime.   The Japanese Yakuza are like Goldman Sachs with guns. The difference is that the Yakuza follow a minimum code of ethics.

	So they’re just involved in sophisticated crime?

	Yeah, and there’s actually a lot more money to make. Lets say you have a head of a bank that has a mistress in one of the clubs you own, then you blackmail him. You can make a hell of a lot of money. The Japanese Yakuza are like Goldman Sachs with guns. The difference is that the Yakuza follow a minimum code of ethics.

	I’ve read that the magazines contain poetry and fishing articles. How are the fishing articles going to help the image?

	Because it’s like: “hey, they’re like you and me. These guys fish. They have hobbies.” You don’t really think of a menacing gangster sitting at the river patiently fishing, that’s not a particularly terrifying image. I’m surprised they don’t have articles about being a good dad or something, maybe that will be in the next issue.

	So, it’s a form of propaganda?

	Yes. They call themselves “ninkyō dantai”, meaning chivalrous organization, while the police call them “bōryokudan”, meaning violent groups. They insist that they take the outcasts, the juvenile delinquents, and the drug addicts and give them jobs and teach them discipline. Are they a force of good in Japanese society? No. Clearly they are parasites and leeches on society, they jack up construction prices, most of them have no honor and are sociopaths.


	...Does the group need the magazine for internal communication with it’s 27 000 members?

	Well, the Yamaguchi-Gumi is in a heavy surveillance fight with the police, and they are not big fans of writing emails. The preferred method of communication is still the fax machine, which is very hard to track. So if you want to get a message out to everyone without assembling them all, one of the easiest ways to do it is putting out a publication. It’s easily distributed and it can be mailed, unlike an email. In that sense, it’s an effective means of communicating. The directives and the thoughts of the current leaders can be spread to as many people in the organization as possible.


theory that mafia orgs work as stand-in for Okrhana/commies/whatever you call based partly on hunch they are used that way in real life--Black Hand in Serbia did dirty work for Okhrana, so did that organization (Dragon something?) that the general who invaded Manchuria was in



https://www.britannica.com/topic/Camorra
	Although greatly weakened, the society was not yet extinct. In 1911 popular attention was drawn to the fact of its survival by a famous murder case in which some 20 alleged Camorristi were brought to trial. Among them was the man reputed to be its chief, who was extradited from the United States. The severe sentences that were passed on those convicted dealt a shattering blow to the organization. Many Camorristi fled to the United States, where, according to some sources, they carried on bloody feuds with the Mafia until about 1920, when that organization absorbed the surviving Camorra members. 


maybe this useful?


https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=it&u=https://www.laterza.it/schedalibro.asp%3Fisbn%3D9788858127506&prev=search
	Ten years after its first publication, and on the twenty-fifth anniversary of the bloody season of the massacres of 1992, the new edition of a book considered a fundamental document for understanding the mechanisms of Cosa Nostra.

	What started as a judicial inquiry has become a book attempting to explain the power of a garment wrapped in mystery for almost half a century. The title anticipates everything else: The Provenzano Code . A code that is like a road that has crossed Sicily. With him, the Godfather, on the bridge of command.


https://cdr.lib.unc.edu/indexablecontent/uuid:1e02579b-8ed6-4741-bd22-d87bf4990616
	Sciascia’s other novel about
	 the mafia, Il contesto
	, also addresses this idea of the 
	emergence of language preceding the collec
	tive reality. In the book Midnight in Sicily
	, Peter 
	Robb focuses on Il contesto
	, mainly because it has the effect
	 of a “concentrated hit of the 
	daily papers in Italy [...]. Hideous deaths, 
	disturbing coincidences, plenty of detail, 
	enveloping menace and no real kno
	wledge at all” (160).  Robb 
	writes of the novel: “[...] the 
	logical processes of detection, 
	clarification and resolution are 
	reversed, and what seems at 
	first a reasonably straightforward problem, sus
	ceptible to rational solution, starts spiraling 
	down into a murky vortex of hidden powers, obs
	cure relationships and concealed motives” 
	(Robb 159-160). Just as in the 
	pizzini
	, what may appear devout religious faith is in reality 
	code for business proceedings; what seems to be
	 a grammatical error is
	 intentional and laden 
	with connotations; nothing can be passed off as
	 void of meaning. The problem comes with 
	assigning meaning to signs and symbols, just as
	 one would do in a textual analysis. Whether 
	their foundation is the mafia or the trad
	ition of the detec
	tive novel, both the 
	pizzini 
	and the 
	novels of Sciascia illustrate an authentic 
	meditation behind their codes – a heightened 
	awareness of expression, resulting in an enigma 
	for the reader.


in Leopold Loeb metaphors don't seem that enigmatic--NY Times writes like it's a tragedy that Englund testified against Leopold, emphasizes the expectations that 12 were going to support his alibi, Englund waiting hours just to say that, and it makes it pretty clear to tease out what their stance on it is


I think pizzini mostly refers to hidden peices of paper with an agreed upon code? a message in the newspaper I guess would be more ad-hoc. Both apparently serve the same purpose--to have an argument in court that no communicaiton, no illegal deals were going on if discovered


	...What is more, since he no longer belonged to Cosa Nostra 
	and its code of honor, Buscetta’s
	 testimonies to Judge Giovanni
	 Falcone did not represent a 
	breach of the communicative modes of a ma
	n of honor: speaking in
	 codes but always 
	speaking the truth. Falcone considered the langu
	age and behavior of Cosa Nostra as an 
	acquired culture; and in fact, 
	he demonstrated fluency in th
	is language, earning him respect 
	from Buscetta and therefore the willingness to
	 testify. From Buscetta’s testimony, Falcone 
	recalls an interesting example 
	of communication: a cynical anec
	dote as an indirect means of 
	expressing an urgent message. Falcone refe
	rs to the conversation with Buscetta:
	I  was  talking  to  Buscetta  about  a  
	murder;  he  was  convinced  it  was  a  
	Mafia  assassination,  I  was  less  sure.  Buscet
	ta  said,  ‘I  want  to
	  tell  you  a  little  
	story.’ I understood at once 
	that he wanted to tell me something indirectly. ‘A guy  has  an  infection  in  an  unfortunate  
	place,  on  his  buttocks.  He  goes  to  the  
	doctor and says to him, ‘Doctor, I wa
	s stepping over some barbed wire, I got 
	scratched,  and  now  the  wound  is  infect
	ed.’  The  doctor  examines  him  and  
	declares, ‘As far as I can tell, it doesn
	’t seem to have been caused by barbed 
	wire.’ The other replies, ‘Doctor, I swear
	 the infection occurred as I said, but 
	you  cure  it  as  if  it  was  what  you  think...’  Buscetta’s  message:  ‘You  don’t  
	believe this is a Mafia crime, but I am sure
	 it is. Investigate it 
	just as if it were 
	a Mafia crime.’ (Falcone 36)

	To one who is not fluent in the communicative 
	code of Cosa Nostra, 
	this story would make 
	no sense. But, for one who is clearly fluent in 
	this type of discourse, 
	the story reveals a very 
	clear message. So, while the delivery of the mess
	age is indirect, the me
	aning of the message 
	is on the contrary direct.


reminiscent of HLI guy on secret communication between people with shared history



...


https://books.google.com/books?id=8YgwDwAAQBAJ&pg=PT190&lpg=PT190&dq=communist+%22secret+language%22+newspaper&source=bl&ots=hZ2cAeK3aB&sig=sN-eK-EUc0p2hKkN7D3c0S9P7is&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwia7tCvxojaAhVI44MKHeY2BrAQ6AEIUjAG#v=onepage&q=communist%20%22secret%20language%22%20newspaper&f=false


says Leys analyized Chinces communist jargon for "secret language," said to be important in understanding what was going on in politics


...


this seems closer:


https://books.google.com/books?id=VnV6DQAAQBAJ&pg=PA21&lpg=PA21&dq=communist+newspaper+secret+message&source=bl&ots=SwN6Ju7LJw&sig=RSBpCBr_NrWEKBZLHWcuytSUuME&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwiRlt32x4jaAhWB2YMKHVsLDUYQ6AEIMDAB#v=onepage&q=communist%20newspaper%20secret%20message&f=false
	By Timothy Melley

	...At the height of the cold war, Strauss advanced an unusual but influential theory of reading. In "Persecution and the Art of Writing" (1952), he suggested that in countries wehre writeres are compelled to espouse government views, they might engage in the literary equivalent of leaving secret messages in thier work. Such messages would be discernible only to those elite readers capable of penetrating the obvious. "Persecution," says Strauss,

		gives rise to a peculiar technique of writing, and therewith to a peculiar type of literature, in which the truth about all crucial things is presented exclusively between the lines. That literature is addressed, not to all readers, but to trustworthy and intelligent readers only. It has all the advantages of private communication...(25)


	This literary theory not only contains the elements of persecution central to paranoia, it also suggests that semiprivate communications are buried in public documents, and it release on a technique of interpretation in which apparent accidents or "blunders as would shame an intelligence high school boy" are to be read as "intentional." (Strauss 30). Strauss's quasi-gnostic method, then, is barely separable fromt he aranoid view in which "nothing can seem accidental and everything therefore appears to be somehow consciously intended" (sass 61).


author seems to be a little hard on Strauss, addressing him with name-calling instead of argument, which is a shame since he has an interesting idea.

Did Melley do this on accident or was it intentional?


Melley is into espionage stuff:


https://www.thenation.com/article/suspicious-minds-timothy-melley/
	Timothy Melley, a professor at Miami University, is also interested in how American fiction has been influenced by institutionalized deception from on high,  particularly with regard to the covert sectors of government that came into being during and after World War II. But his account—which he eventually frames in explicit opposition to Baxter’s—locates the origins of deniability much earlier than Nixon. If deniability has an author, Melley argues in The Covert Sphere, it is George Kennan, who in 1948 penned National Security Council directive NSC-10/2, the document that changed the CIA, then barely one year old, from a purely intelligence-gathering outfit into an agency charged with “propaganda, economic warfare, preventive direct action, including sabotage, anti-sabotage” and so on. Crucially, NSC-10/2 ordered that these operations be implemented in such a way that, if discovered, “the US Government can plausibly disclaim any responsibility.”


	...As the first-ever government agency with deniability written into its charter, the CIA was from the beginning a storytelling machine. It was no coincidence that in its early days the organization was full of literature students and writers recruited by influential scholars of English, or that for decades it operated as perhaps the most generous literary patron in the West, funding scores of novels, translations and literary journals. And so it is oddly apt that most Americans know most of what they know about the covert sector—or, more accurately, half-know most of what they half-know—not from fact-oriented discourses like journalism, history and the law, but instead from novels, films, TV shows, comic books and narrative video games: in other words, through fictions, some of them quite outlandish, some chock-full of accurate information and insight, most somewhere in between, and all of them more or less dismissible as “just fiction.” 


sounds like he's onto something--a lot of the journalists who lie write like novelists (or become novelists later)


	...Often, Melley claims, those at the top of the totem pole are the most ignorant of all, because what is required of them is not knowledge but its opposite: public expressions of shock when, against the odds, this or that unsavory activity comes to light. Even if those technically “inside” the covert state know a bit more than John Everyman, it is certainly plausible that they hanker to know more—to view the monster from above, and to see its many tentacles writhing at once. Like the rest of us, some often have nowhere better to turn than fiction. 


Melley says "those at the top often ignorant," seems true with U.S. presidents, Oppeneheimer at first, Ludendorff, Mao, etc.


	...Such a proposition is difficult to prove, but Melley attempts to marshal compelling evidence. In the 1960s, he notes, CIA employees reportedly watched Mission Impossible each week in search of ideas for new gadgets.


likes to make fun of CIA?


	...Melley devotes an entire chapter to the notoriously muddled notion of “brainwashing,” a nonsensical term for a process of total thought control that has never really existed outside of novels, movies, and hysterical think-tank studies and news stories about the Communist threat. Much of the hysteria about brainwashing was stirred up by government PR specialists: Edward Hunter, the first journalist to use the term, was a former employee of the Office of Strategic Services, the World War II forerunner of the CIA. 


don't they all think religion is brainwashing? this is silly, everyone knows what brainwashing is


here he talks about a conspiracy (or not...) that conspiracies defend capitalism (?)

https://books.google.com/books?id=mnHjAwAAQBAJ&pg=PT201&lpg=PT201
	..."By identifying moral agency with the 'inner self' rather than with political and economic sovereignty, they effectively redefined the founding ideals of freedom and democracy in ways that did not directly conflict wiht the revolution in property relations" under industrialization (37). "They thereby provided ideological cover for class inequality even as they envisoned a society founded in spiritual rather than material relations" (72). Along similar lines, in Empire of Conspiracy, Timothy Melley suggests that anti-institutionalism and paranoia about social control can lead to social complacency; "the directive to *fight* [the system] is a declracation of war on a unified and reified 'system.' This directive has the effect of encouraging resisitence to social commitiments *in genera.* While such resistance might be liberating for some, it also amounts to a defense of the liberal values undergirding free market capitalism--atomism, privacy, competitiveness, and *strict* opposition to the social order" (Melley 2000, 57).


https://www.thenation.com/article/suspicious-minds-timothy-melley/
	What Melley’s account reveals most about his favorite books is how dismayingly similar they are—and not just in their self-aware “I can’t go on, I’ll go on” approach to storytelling. Almost every book he discusses has at its center a character drawn by circumstance into the dysfunction of the covert sector. In The Last Thing He Wanted, the narrator discovers that her father is an arms dealer. In Democracy, the main character is having an affair with a CIA agent. Both main characters in A Book of Common Prayer are married to prominent players in the secret government. John Wade, the amnesiac veteran from In the Lake of the Woods, is a direct participant in a military atrocity and the cover-up. The principal narrator of Coover’s The Public Burning is Vice President Richard Nixon himself. DeLillo’s Nicholas Branch works in the belly of the CIA, and his Lee Harvey Oswald is, well, Lee Harvey Oswald. 

	...But one of Melley’s central claims is that the nature of the covert sector has contributed to postmodern shifts in the nature of all public knowledge—not just knowledge about CIA coups, for example. The authors he spotlights are similarly obsessed with the idea of the secret services as pockets of the national unconscious. 


Melley into spy stuff and CIA coups


http://www.conspiracyeffect.com/2017/06/20/a-symptom-of-mass-cultural-anxiety/

https://www.nytimes.com/roomfordebate/2015/01/04/are-conspiracy-theories-all-bad-17/a-symptom-of-mass-cultural-anxiety
	A Symptom of Mass Cultural Anxiety

	Timothy Melley, a professor of English at Miami University, is the author of “The Covert Sphere: Secrecy, Fiction and the National Security State.”

	UPDATED JANUARY 5, 2015, 9:48 AM

	Belief in conspiracy theory is a cultural symptom, one that sheds light on the way people perceive power and public knowledge in our democracy.


https://books.google.com/books?id=T754mmWA8VsC&q=MKUltra#v=snippet&q=MKUltra&f=false
	Timothy Melley

	...That is, MK-ULTRA seemed a failure only because it did not produce the kind of magical and total mental control described by the propagandist Edward Hunter and his alarmist cohort. But Hunter's vision of total control...



dude sounds like a conspiracy theorist to me (who says that's a bad thing? :D)


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Leo_Strauss

Strauss also looks sketchy

possibly very sketchy

https://chicagology.com/notorious-chicago/leopoldloeb/
	Related to Other Bankers.
	These aunts, on his father’s side, are Mrs. Sam Steele, Mrs. P. D. Block, Mrs. Henry Greenebaum, and Mrs. Leo Strauss. The Greenebaum family started one of the first banks in Chicago, now under the management of the third generation. The Steele family has long been noted in mercantile life. Leo Strauss is an uncle of Judge Henry Horner.

	An uncle of young Leopold is Oscar G. Foreman.

	Leo Strauss is now in business with the elder Leopold, who is president of the Fiber Can corporation. A son of Leo Strauss is married to the daughter of L. Block, president of the Inland Steel company.


same Leo Strauss? probably not he was 25 at the time of writing



https://themindlessphilosopher.wordpress.com/tag/ubermensch/
	Known as the father of neo-conservatism, the political philosophy of  the late German-American philosopher, Leo Strauss, has created more animus between liberals and conservatives than the epic “tastes great/less filling” debate. In fact, Leo Strauss is probably the most influential modern philosopher no one has ever heard of.

	Have you ever heard the name Paul Wolfowitz?

	If you haven’t, I’m guessing you’re not an American.

	If you are an American and you haven‘t, God help you.

	What’s important to know about Paul Wolfowitz is that he was a student of Leo Strauss.  AND he was a Deputy Secretary of Defense in the George W. Bush administration. That means Paul Wolfowitz had the ear of the Secretary of Defense, Donald Rumsfeld.

	No big deal, right?

	Well, that would be no big deal if Leo Strauss hadn’t spent his entire philosophical career lamenting modern political theory and what he saw as modernity’s liberal, relativistic values, and “the corroding effects of mass culture.” Strauss writes:

	    Many people today hold the view that the standard in question is in the best case nothing but the ideal adopted by our society or our “civilization” and embodied in its way of life or its institutions. But, according to the same view, all societies have their ideals, cannibal societies no less than civilized ones. If principles are sufficiently justified by the fact that they are accepted by a society, the principles of cannibalism are as defensible or sound as those of civilized life.

	 

	Strauss explains that moral relativism and “the uninhibited cultivation of individuality” is “bound to lead to disastrous consequences” and nihilism.

	It would be no big deal if Strauss hadn’t taught at the University of Chicago from 1949 to 1968,  allowing Strauss to influence a generation of students (they’re called “Straussians”). And it wouldn’t be a big deal that Leo Strauss taught guys like Paul Wolfowitz and influenced a generation of Straussians if Strauss hadn’t believed and taught his students that philosophy should be esoteric, and not understood by everybody, and that knowledge is something that is hidden to most people and only understood by a few individuals (namely Strauss and his students).

	It wouldn’t be a problem that Strauss taught guys like Paul Wolfowitz if Strauss hadn’t taught his students that society should be structured so that the wisest should rise to the top (mind you, Strauss believed that he and his students were the wisest) and that it’s perfectly within a government’s power to lie to and ignore the will of the people.

	It wouldn’t be a big deal if Straussians hadn’t been affecting American domestic and foreign policy for the last 12 years*.

	It wouldn’t be a problem if Strauss’ followers didn’t go into politics and influence and entire administration to follow Strauss’ wacked-out ideas.


sounds like another elitist prick

told students to esoterically hide their ideas or something

taught at U of Chicago (where N Leopold learned Neitzche) around 1949 to 1968


from Leo Straus' book Persecution and the Art of Writing:

A large section of the people, probably the great majority of
	the younger generation,2 accepts the government-sponsored
	views as true, if not at once at least after a time. How have they
	been convinced? And where does the time factor enter? They
	have not been convinced by compulsion, for compulsion does
	not produce conviction. It merely paves the way for conviction
	by silencing contradiction. What is called freedom of thought
	in a large number of cases amounts to-and even for all practical
	purposes consists of-the ability to choose between two or more
	different views presented by the small minority of people who
	are public speakers or writers. s If this choice is prevented, the
	only kind of intellectual independence of which many people
	are capable is destroyed, and that is the only freedom of thought
	which is of political importance. Persecution is therefore the
	indispensable condition for the highest efficiency of what may
	be called logica equina. According to the horse-drawn Parmen-
	ides, or to Gulliver's Houyhnhnms, one cannot say, or one
	cannot reasonably say "the thing which is not": that is, lies are
	inconceivable. This logic is not peculiar to horses or horse-
	drawn philosophers, bu t determines, if in a somewhat modified
	manner, the thought of many ordinary human beings as well.
	They would admit, as a matter of course, that man can lie and
	does lie. But they would add that lies are short-lived and cannot
	stand the test of repetition-let alone of constant repetition-and
	that therefore a statement which is constantly repeated and
	never contradicted must be true. Another line of argument
	maintains that a statement made by an ordinary fellow may be
	a lie, but the truth of a statement made by a responsible and
	respected man, and therefore particularly by a man in a highly
	responsible or exalted position, is morally certain. These two
	enthymemes lead to the conclusion that the truth of a statement
	which is constantly repeated by the head of the government and
	never contradicted is absolutely certain.

	This implies that in the countries concerned all those whose
	thinking does not follow the rules of logica e q u i n a ~ in other
	words, all those capable of truly independent thinking, cannot
	be brought to accept the government-sponsored views. Persecu-
	. tion, then, cannot prevent independent thinking. It cannot pre-
	vent even the expression of independent thought. For it is as
	true today as it was more than two thousand years ago that it is a·
	safe venture to tell the truth one knows to benevolent and trust-
	worthy acquaintances, or more precisely, to reasonable friends. 

	Persecution cannot prevent even public expression of the hetero-
	dox truth, for a man of independent thought can utter his views
	in public and remain unharmed, provided he moves with cir-
	cumspection. He can even utter them in print without incurring
	any danger, provided he is capable of writing between the lines.

	The expression·"writing between the lines" indicates the
	subject of this article. For the influence of persecution on litera-
	ture is precisely that it compels all writers who hold heterodox
	views to develop a peculiar technique of writing; the technique
	which we have in mind when speaking of writing between the
	lines. This expression is clearly metaphoric. Any attempt to
	express its meaning in unmetaphoric language would lead to
	the discovery of a terra incognita, a field whose very dimensions
	are as yet unexplored and which offers ample scope for highly
	intriguing and even important investigations. One may say
	without fear of being presently convicted of grave exaggeration
	that almost the only preparatory work to guide the explorer in
	this field is buried in the writings of the rhetoricians of
	antiquity.

	To return to our present subject, let us look at a simple ex-
	ample which, I have reason to believe, is not so, remote from
	reality as it might first seem. We can easily imagine that a his-
	torian living in a totalitarian country, a generally respected and
	unsuspected member of the only party in existence, might be
	led by his investigations to doubt the soundness of the govern-
	ment-sponsored interpretation of the history of religion. Nobody
	would prevent him from publishing a passionate attack on what
	he would call the liberal view.
	H
	~
	would of course have to state
	the liberal view before attacking it; he would make that state-
	ment in the quiet, unspectacular and somewhat boring manner
	which would seem to be but natural; he would use many tech-
	nical terms, give many'quotations and attach undue importance
	to insignificant details; he would seem to forget the holy war of
	mankind in the petty squabbles of pedants. Only when he
	reached the core of the argument would he write three or four
	sentences in that terse and lively style which is apt to arrest the
	attention of young men who love to think. That central passage
	would state the case of the adversaries more clearly, compellingly
	and mercilessly than it had ever been stated in the heyday of
	liberalism, for he would silently drop all the foolish excrescences
	of the liberal creed which were allowed to grow up during the
	time when liberalism had succeeded and therefore was ap-
	proaching dormancy. His reasonable young reader would for the
	first time catch a glimpse of the forbidden fruit. 


have to look into this guy more

but apparenty he was into Neitzche and in this passage sounds like he's talkging about some his ideas

like talking about secretly writing between the lines to critique the history of religion imposed on other people, which is something Neitzche was obsessed with (looked at history of religion and decided it was a slave revolt or something)

Neitzhce thought morality was persecution of nobles and had a victim complex and tentivley sounds like Strauss is taking the same view here

I guess hes saying the persecuted ubermench intellectuals can write between the lines of their subversive ideas to communicate with each other


	The attack, the
	bulk of the work, would consist of virulent expansions of the
	roost virulent utterances in the holy book or books of the ruling
	party. The intelligent young man who, being young, had until
	then been somehow attracted by those· immoderate utterances,
	would now be merely disgusted and, after having tasted the
	forbidden fruit, even bored by them. Reading the book for the
	second and third time, he would detect in the very arrangement
	of the quotations from the authoritative books significant ad-
	ditions to those few terse statements which occur in the center
	of the rather short first part.
	Persecution, then, gives rise to a peculiar technique of writ-
	ing, and therewith to a peculiar type of literature, in which the
	truth about all crucial things is presented exclusively between
	the lines. That literature is addressed, not to all readers, but to
	trustworthy and intelligent readers only. It has all the advan-
	tages of private communication without having its greatest
	disadvantage-that it reaches only the writer's acquaintances. It
	has all the advantages of public communication without having
	its greatest disadvantage-capital punishment for the author. But
	how can a man perform the miracle of speaking in a publication
	to a minority, while being silent to the majority of his readers?


this is what Neitzche wanted to do, and his solution was to say "don't read this if you don't get it" but he got a lot of flak for his ideas obviously

I guess Strauss is proposing a refinement of this to communicate between "trustworthy and intellignet readers only"


apparently one of their metaphors in communicating is "jews = malevolent sociopaths" and "goya = everyone else," which makes this passage from Melley book more interesting:


https://books.google.com/books?id=VnV6DQAAQBAJ&pg=PA21&lpg=PA21&dq=communist+newspaper+secret+message&source=bl&ots=SwN6Ju7LJw&sig=RSBpCBr_NrWEKBZLHWcuytSUuME&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwiRlt32x4jaAhWB2YMKHVsLDUYQ6AEIMDAB#v=onepage&q=communist%20newspaper%20secret%20message&f=false
	...Kurt Vonnegut's 1961 novel *MOther Night* addresses a situation like Pound's thorugh the story of Howard Campbell, an American artist-turned-agent who transmits secret Allied codes in his highly popular pro-Nazi radio program. After the war, however, Campbell finds that no one knows about his secret work or believes he was really an Allied spy. Vonnegut's novel makes clear that whatever value the hidden messages may have had for American intelligence, their more obvious content did extraordinary harm by encouraging Germans to embrace Nazi principles.


maybe Melley more like "good guy" and Strauss a bad guy

if people like them like to communicate between the lines, what is being said here?


...


Lenin's crew doing communication "between the lines" as described by Strauss?


https://www.marxists.org/archive/trotsky/1930/hrr/ch36.htm
	Lenin is in hiding. He is intently watching the papers, reading as always between the lines, or catching in personal conversations – not very frequent – the echo of ideas not thought out, intentions not expressed.



Soviet citizens reading news with assumption of lies and "between the lines" writing:


https://worldhistory.us/european-history/the-soviet-union-by-political-and-economic-anecdotes.php
	The anecdote below, about the Moscow based news agency TASS, makes light of Soviet attempts to cover up the truth and the poor quality of their coverage. Because of the heavy censorship in the Soviet Union, many citizens were forced to read between the lines and make inferences to gauge what the press was really saying. The presence of the anecdotes below shows that people were aware of the press’ nature and its tendency to distort the news. They were tempted by other sources of media coverage like the foreign radio stations because they could not trust Soviet reports.

	How do we learn about world news? From the denials of TASS[11]

	Why did Pravda adopt the following format?

	XXXXXXXXXX

	XXXXXXXXXX

	XXXXXXXXXX

	So that people would find it more difficult to read between the lines.[12]


also in this article: https://www.upi.com/Archives/1986/04/29/Soviets-used-to-sketchy-information-on-disasters/5011297812864/


Melley points out Lee Oswald did the same:

https://books.google.com/books?id=VnV6DQAAQBAJ&pg=PA21&lpg=PA21&dq=communist+newspaper+secret+message&source=bl&ots=SwN6Ju7LJw&sig=RSBpCBr_NrWEKBZLHWcuytSUuME&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwiRlt32x4jaAhWB2YMKHVsLDUYQ6AEIMDAB#v=onepage&q=communist%20newspaper%20secret%20message&f=false
	The obvious problem with it is the difficulty of confirming whether patterns in a text are intentional--or, more pointedly, whether they are even patterns. In DeLillo's Libra, to take merely one example, Lee Oswald's Straussian attempts to "read between the lines" of a communist newspaper never provided him with a clear sense of mission because he cannot locate the "message buried in the text" (372). Even if Oswald were a good reader (and he is not), this sort of confusion would be inevitable because attempts to locate hidden messages hinge upon the paradoxical assumption that any message one can easily detect must not be the *truest* message of the text.


think this is important, especially with soviet government official press releases in mind where everyone knew they were bullshit--if everyone knew they were lying or putting messages between the lines, and they knew everyone knew, they can use that as a way to manipulate people more subtly and get away with it




another example:

https://books.google.com/books?id=8X_3k6saECcC&pg=PA284&lpg=PA284&dq=communists+OR+soviets++communicate+%22between+the+lines%22&source=bl&ots=1dpokWweE9&sig=KKg1MGjMb1D8EzeIWvD16nX9dbE&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjD-ozW2ojaAhUH0IMKHbacAxoQ6AEIYDAG#v=onepage&q=communists%20OR%20soviets%20%20communicate%20%22between%20the%20lines%22&f=false
	The return of the Czechoslovak leaders from Moscow brought radical changes. "Disciplining" of the Czechoslovak mass media was categorically demanded by Soviets as one of the basic conditions for the "normalization process." Censroship was reimposed. The media were ordered to avoid even using the term "occupation" or criticizing the invading countries or the presence of foreign troops on Czechoslovak territory. The editorial boards of the weeklies Student and LIterani LIsty--the spokesmen of the most liberal elements--decided to cease publication. Other journalists continued in an effort to resist occuptatin by writing between the lines, but it had already become obviosu that thoroughgoing Soviet-type normalization was only a matter of time.


might find examples of this communication in underground revolutionary organizations hiding from government, a literal example of what Strauss was saying


this guy wrote a book rleated to this:


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/C._Turner_Joy
	From July 1951 until May 1952, he was also the senior United Nations Delegate to the Korean Armistice talks. His experience in this role led him to write a book, How Communists Negotiate. In the book, he detailed a number of different tactics that were used during the talks to delay, frustrate, and create useful propaganda for the North Koreans. 


sounds mostly like its on their seeing negotation as extension of war rather than show of good faith, don't see anything on negotiating between lines in press


...


this article is sketchy but speaks to the same idea:

https://www.nsa.gov/news-features/declassified-documents/cryptologic-quarterly/assets/files/Reading_Between_the_Lines.pdf
	Ideology: Words with Various Interpretations

	Paying ideological homage is a way of life for writers in the Soviet Union. Much of the tribute they pay for the privilege of getting their work published is purely perfunctory. Of course, some ideology, written by Communist true believes, can be taken at face value. Then there is an in-between area of ideological rhetoric, seemingly superficial at first glance, that carries a significant secondary message, either intelltionally or unintentially.


like in Lenin's writings "proletariat" = "us," "dictatorship of the proletariat" = "us in dictatorship"


the example in this article is bad


...


http://www.radio.cz/en/section/panorama/dictionary-of-communist-totalitarianism-decodes-the-language-of-propaganda

some research some communists propagandists interested in particulars of how they use language


...


Neitzche into same idea of "enlightened" ubermench communicating amazing deep thoughts in confusing language as Strauss:


https://muse.jhu.edu/article/543768/summary
	Although he finds in it an “ingenuity and daring” that is “remarkable,”1 Richard Schacht evidently does not like our book on Nietzsche’s Beyond Good and Evil. We argue for an “esoteric” Nietzsche, one who sometimes writes in a way that is deliberately misleading, hence does not mean what he initially seems to mean. 

	...Why Attempt an Esoteric Interpretation of BGE?

	Our first reason is that Nietzsche practically invites us to do so in BGE 30:

	    The exoteric and the esoteric as philosophers formerly distinguished them, among the Indians as among the Greeks, Persians and Moslems, in short wherever one believed in an order of rank and not in equality and equal rights—differs one from another not so much in that the exoteric stands outside and sees, evaluates, measures, judges from the outside, not from the inside: what is more essential is that the exoteric sees things from below—but the esoteric sees them from above! There are heights of the soul seen from which even tragedy ceases to be tragic.
	    (BGE 30) [End Page 353]

	It is uncontroversial that Nietzsche believed in “an order of rank” and not in equality and equal rights.


...


https://www.tandfonline.com/doi/pdf/10.1080/09668136708410571


good article on Bolsheviks being best in communication but not directly related


...


https://picclick.ca/How-to-Understand-Communist-Language-Double-Meaning-1953-253467458171.html

a 1953 book "How to Understand Communist Language Double Meaning"


https://picclick.ca/How-to-Understand-Communist-Language-Double-Meaning-1953-253467458171.html#&gid=1&pid=2

	INTRODUCTION

	All statements emanating directly or indirectly form the Soviet Government, whether they appear in Government communiques, the Moscow press, the press of foreign Communist parties, or the manifestors of international organisations dominated by Communists, have to be read in a special way if their intention is to be understood. Two main points have to be borne in mind. One is that the statements, taken at their face value, suggest a preoccupation with the principles and ideals which is in strong contrast with the actualities of Soviet government and Sovient policy. The other is that what appear to the general reader to be, and literally are, statements of fact, have a secondary meaning to Communist readers as instructions and orders. The Soviet Government often uses this secondary meaning, understood by all Communists, to convey guidance on tactics to the Communist parties of the world, through published speeches and manifestos, without too blatantly inciting to subversive activities.


sounds like these guys know what's up


says they have three examples from commie newspapers

from pictures there, the book goes over the campaign for Lysenkoism and directives related to that

illustrates how "double meaning" can give tips on more macabre stuff they do



also maybe interesting:

https://archive.org/stream/CommunicationMethodsOfCPUSA/Communication+Methods+of+the+Communist+Party%2C+USA+%5B1954-11%5D+%281%29_djvu.txt

"Communication Methods of the CPUSA"


FBI under hoover


https://archive.org/stream/UnderstandingJewishInfluence_355/Understanding-Jewish-Influence-A-Study-in-Ethnic-Activism_djvu.txt

...


https://archive.org/stream/brainwashingstor00huntrich/brainwashingstor00huntrich_djvu.txt


interesting books


says similar thing to "how commies communicate" book:

https://archive.org/stream/CommunicationMethodsOfCPUSA/Communication+Methods+of+the+Communist+Party%2C+USA+%5B1954-11%5D+%281%29_djvu.txt

 
	Communist publications, both domestic and foreign, under cover of ideological and Aesopian language, contain directives, instructions, and orders for Party personnel.


	...Extreme security consciousness was precipitated in early 
	November, 1947, following a press conference in Los Angeles, California, 
	by O. John Rogge, former Assistant Attorney General of the United States. 
	Rogge alleged that there would be a "dramatic round-up of dozens of 
	Communist leaders and fellow travellers. " timed to coincide with the 
	convening of a special session of Congress later that month. Party 
	officials believed this information to be authentic and promptly issued 
	instructions for stringent precautions in all districts. 

	Immediately following Rogge's news conference, according 
	to a reliable source, Robert Thompson, a member of the National Board 
	of the Communist Party, USA, communicated with Archie Brown, a 
	California State Communist Party official. Thompson indicated that his 
	"kid” was "sick" and that "the crisis" was likely to come in the next 12 to 24 hours. 

	Other Communist Party districts throughout the country 
	received similar ’’sick" messages. In each instance, the message 
	dealt with the alleged illness of an aunt, an uncle or a cousin of the 
	individual called, and recommended that this individual should spend 
	at least two days with the ’’ill" relative. As a consequence, Communist 
	leaders went into hiding; books and records of all types were destroyed 
	or hidden; bank accounts were closed and bail funds established.


getting messages with double meaning representing instructions

"kid" was "sick" for communists like "sheep" needed "shearing" for mafia guys

important point is that this method of communication can be used in public messages, like in newspaper articles, with reduced chance of most people catching on and (probably more importantly) plausible deniability in court if conspiracy alleged


pg 8-11 go over Communist Party paranoia about telephones being tapped and communications practices for security

earlier says mostly used couriers


around pg 14 - 15 about comms with Moscow


pg 27

	
	...In the latter part of 1949, according to a reliable source, Andrew Remes, Chairman of the Wisconson Communist Party, was assigned by the National Committee of the Communist Party, USA, to contact trusted professional people -- doctors, lawyers, dentists -- whose offices could be utilized for mail drops or meeting places. This source reported that during the same period, the Communist underground in New York began to organize a clandestine mail system on every level.


secret communist dentists


pg 33 "COMMUNIST PUBLICATIONS"


	In a limited sense, perhpas, Communist publications can be considered as a form of open code, which will be described later in this paper. However, Communist publications are being treated here separately for the reason that open code pertains primarily to correspondence and conversation rather than to published material.

	One informed source has stated that the necessity today for the presence of a Comintern representative in the United States in order to furnish Soviet direction no longer exists. Under present conditions, this source observed, all that is required is for a pominent Communist official abroad to write an article or deliver a speech and Communist leaders everywhre in the world examine and analyize the article or speech for its true meaning and intent.

	According to this source, the American Communist Party receives its broad policy in this manner, following the dictates and instructions laid down and readily apparent in newspapers and periodicals published in Moscow and elsewhere in Communist-ruled countries. American Communist leaders, this source said, have only to study, dissect, interpret and apply the directives and orders contained in these publications.

	Louis F. Budenz has stated that an editor of a Communist publication has to be skilled and adept in the Communist "code” in order to unravel and interpret rapidly the practical political instructions sent by Moscow under cover of ideological and Aesopian language contained in the books, publications and documents which are published in Moscow in many languages -- including English -- for the guidance and direction of Communists in the United States and elsewhere,, Budenz said: 

		"There are two parts to this code of instructions — each of them highly important,, The first division consists of the works of Marx, Engels, Lenin and Stalin, ‘the great Marxist classics, ‘ and those auxiliary works which serve as footnotes or additions to these classicso Their purpose is to inflame the party member with zeal, to provide him with the ideas that will confirm his devotion to the cause, and to steel him for the objective of overthrowing the government of his country, 

		"The second division comprises the theoretical and practical organs provided as sources of direction and information. They explain and develop the immediate line which the party is following. Outstanding among these is the New Times , arriving here in English as an alleged supplement of the Moscow newspaper Trud: it is the successor in part of The Communist International magazine, which of course had to end when the Communist /r International supposedly ceased to exist. With that now v goes the Cominform’s publication, recently issued from Bucharest, and which under the guise of giving the official reports of the satellite states conveys a wider understanding of current tactics. Next there is The Bolshevik, the theoretical organ of the Communist Party of the Soviet Union, ’the model party’ for all other Communist groups, and therefore read with the utmost respect and attention. 

		Then there is Political Affairs, the theoretical organ of the Communist Party of the Untied States, formerly called The Communist.

		"As a Red reportorial organ, although also containing directives, there is available World News and Views . This is a successor to the former famous International Press Correspondence. 

		"Every leading Communist keeps himself abreast of these publications, studying them carefully, line by line, to catch the nuance and emphasis of each quotation or expression. From that he learns with rare exactitude just what Moscow wants of his party and of him."

		. . .

		"The Aesopian language of the Communsits is indeed the cleverest device ever hit upon to conceal subersive intentions and instructions...."


	Other reliable sources have indicated that all members of the Communist Party in the United States assiduously and avidly read the Daily Worker, The Worker and Political Affairs as important, firsthand sources of information relative to the Party's policies and line [what about the New York Times?]. Members are cognizant of the fact that many articles in these publications embody directives and instructions from the top echelon to the membership and that they must be able to read between the lines in order to ascertain their true purpose and design.


pg 60 "Current Use of Open Code"

	
	...Messages hidden behind seemingly innocent and fatuous phraseology in written communications or telephone conversations by Communists generally pertain to such commonplace topics as personal health, family affairs or the weather. Such double talk is so worded that it conveys certain meanings which the writer and the recipient or the speaker and the listener understand because of their past knowledge, experiences and contacts.


open code working due to shared history, understanding between communicators

	
	The increased use of double meaning language in communications and conversations by Communists became evident after 1946-47. A member, as an illustration, would be apprized over the telephone of a meeting in such double talk language as "We are having a card party at Bill's house tonight," or a meeting would be referred to us a "bridge game," "pinochle" or "stud poker."


then reported in NY Times as "FBI SPIES ON COMMUNISTS FOR GOING TO BRIDGE GAME FOR POLITICAL REASONS"

buried on 3rd page would mention they had a warrant the whole time

	
	Double meaning language on the telephone, such as "The material you ordered will be ready on October 14" would indicate the date of the meeting. Similarly, phraseology like "The material is ready to be picked up" would show that the person wanted to be contacted.

	While use of the telephone is generally frowned upon at the present time, it is recognized by the Party that in certain instances this medium is necessary and permissible. When such is the case, comrades involved work out a prearranged code. First names are used as code names which have been agreed to previously. Telephone drops and alternate meeting places are also decided upon beforehand when use of the telephone is contemplated. A prearranged code is devised for use in naming the data and time of meeting. For example, it might be agreed that when X calls Y and says he will see Y at 10 P. M. on April 25, this in fact, means that Y should either add or subtract a day or more from the date mentioned, and should add or subtract an hour or more from the time mentioned. From time to time, the code is changed by the individuals involved. There is no set rule in such matters, since the code is improvised and is left entirely to the discretion and imagination of the individuals concerned.


communists would let agents improvise and pick their own codes for communicating with each other


	...Code Names, Initials and Numbers

	Prearranged code names are commonly used by Pary personnel over the telephone and in written communications. Activities of underground organizations in all districts are now conducted through the use of code names, initials and numbers in place of a person's true name. Simple aliases like "Jack", "Helen," "Zeke," "Josh" and "Bob" are generally used by underground personnel. The chairman of one district was referred to as "Grand Exalted Ruler." One district organizer was called "THe Rabbi." In another locality, club meeters were arranged by telephone with the caller saying "THis is number 3. We will meet at the previously appointed time at the home of Number 4."

	Communist Party leaders in one southern state have been known to converse on the telephone for an hour about many different persons without once mentioning a name, referring only to these individuals by initials, nicknames or brief descriptions, such as "the shorty fellow," "our good friend" or "the relative."


party members would get good at speaking in open code



...


did open code and double-meaning come up in Smith Act case?


http://caselaw.findlaw.com/us-supreme-court/341/494.html
	But the Court of Appeals held that the record supports the following broad conclusions: By virtue of their control over the political apparatus of the Communist Political Association, 1 petitioners were able to transform that organization into the Communist Party; that the policies of the Association were changed from peaceful cooperation with the United States and its economic and political structure to a policy which had existed before the United States and the Soviet Union were fighting a common enemy, namely, a policy which worked for the overthrow of the Government by force and violence; that the Communist Party is a highly disciplined organization, adept at infiltration into strategic positions, use of aliases, and double-meaning language; that the Party is rigidly controlled; that Communists, unlike other political parties, tolerate no dissension from the policy laid down by the guiding forces, but that the approved program is slavishly followed by the members of the Party; that the literature of the Party and the statements and activities of its leaders, petitioners here, advocate, and the general goal of the Party was, during the period in question, to achieve a successful overthrow of the existing order by force and violence. 


...


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Peter_Deriabin


this guy might be legit


here he mentions open code for communicating with moscow and other interesting things:

https://books.google.com/books?id=P9MJAAAAIAAJ&pg=PA11&lpg=PA11&dq=communist+%22open+code%22+-software&source=bl&ots=IoamMP-LO_&sig=nFYQjd5OyMG4r3AaMe1InQC_TFU&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjS3s_foInaAhVH64MKHSxmAe8Q6AEINjAC#v=onepage&q=communist%20%22open%20code%22%20-software&f=false


...


famous uses of open code?


https://books.google.com/books?id=4TRKAAAAQBAJ&pg=PA170&lpg=PA170&dq=communist+%22open+code%22+-software&source=bl&ots=5AscpSjew-&sig=3XkCUNooEXJ4EczasFUM-j8pAKQ&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjS3s_foInaAhVH64MKHSxmAe8Q6AEIOTAD#v=onepage&q=communist%20%22open%20code%22%20-software&f=false
	...However, of greater concern was MI5's revelation that Peierls had received his original security clearance through the intervention of John Strachey MP, who was himself an espionage suspect. A former minister of food, and then Secretary of State for War for the last year of the Attlee administration, Strachey was a confirmed Marxist, and had been recorded holding an "open code" telephon conversation with Donald Maclean shortly before the latter's defection in 1951. According to a CIA report dated February 1952, Strachey had also "been responsible for having the surveillance on Bruno Pontecorvy lifted, which reportedly made possible Pontecorvo's escape to Russia" in 1950.